UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                     to                     
Commission file number: 001-16751
ANTHEM, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Indiana  35-2145715
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification Number)
220 Virginia Avenue
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (800) 331-1476
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class  Trading symbol(s)  Name of each exchange on which r egister ed
Common Stock, Par Value $0.01  ANTM  New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: NONE
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.  Yes  ¨ No  x
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and
(2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the
registrant was required to submit such files).  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting
company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.:
Large accelerated filer ☒  Accelerated filer☐
Non-accelerated filer☐
  Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐    
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).  Yes   ☐   No x
The aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-affiliates of the registrant (assuming solely for
the purposes of this calculation that all Directors and executive officers of the registrant are “affiliates”) as of June 28, 2019 was
approximately $72,160,040,688.
As of February 6, 2020, 252,329,919 shares of the Registrant’s Common Stock were outstanding.
 DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Part III of this Annual Report on Form 10-K incorporates by reference information from the registrant’s Definitive Proxy Statement
for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held May 21, 2020.
Anthem, Inc.
 
Annual Report on Form 10-K
For the Year Ended December 31, 2019
 
Table of Contents
 
PART I  
ITEM 1. BUSINESS 3
ITEM 1A.RISK FACTORS 22
ITEM 1B.UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS 39
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES 39
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 40
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 40
PART II  
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES 41
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA 43
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS
OF OPERATIONS 44
ITEM 7A.QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 68
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 70
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE 142
ITEM 9A.CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 142
ITEM 9B.OTHER INFORMATION 145
PART III  
ITEM 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 145
ITEM 11.EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 145
ITEM 12.SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS 145
ITEM 13.CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR
INDEPENDENCE 146
ITEM 14.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES 146
PART IV  
ITEM 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 147
ITEM 16.FORM 10-K SUMMARY 151
SIGNATURES 158
-1-
References in this Annual Report on Form 10-K to the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “Anthem” or the “Company” refer to
Anthem, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and, unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries. References to
the term “states” include the District of Columbia, unless the context otherwise requires.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K, including Part II, Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results
of Operations,” contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-
looking statements reflect our views about future events and financial performance and are generally not historical facts. Words such as
“expect,” “feel,” “believe,” “will,” “may,” “should,” “anticipate,” “intend,” “estimate,” “project,” “forecast,” “plan” and similar
expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These statements include, but are not limited to: financial projections and
estimates and their underlying assumptions; statements regarding plans, objectives and expectations with respect to future operations,
products and services; and statements regarding future performance. Such statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties, many of
which are difficult to predict and generally beyond our control, that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in,
or implied or projected by, the forward-looking statements. You are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking
statements that speak only as of the date hereof. You are also urged to carefully review and consider the various risks and other disclosures
discussed in our reports filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission from time to time, which attempt to advise interested
parties of the factors that affect our business. Except to the extent otherwise required by federal securities laws, we do not undertake any
obligation to republish revised forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date hereof. These risks and
uncertainties include, but are not limited to: trends in healthcare costs and utilization rates; our ability to secure sufficient premium rates,
including regulatory approval for and implementation of such rates; the impact of federal and state regulation, including ongoing changes
in the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended, or
collectively, the ACA, and the ultimate outcome of legal challenges to the ACA; our ability to contract with providers on cost-effective
and competitive terms; competitive pressures and our ability to adapt to changes in the industry and develop and implement strategic
growth opportunities; reduced enrollment; unauthorized disclosure of member or employee sensitive or confidential information, including
the impact and outcome of any investigations, inquiries, claims and litigation related thereto; risks and uncertainties regarding Medicare
and Medicaid programs, including those related to non-compliance with the complex regulations imposed thereon; our ability to maintain
and achieve improvement in Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or CMS, Star ratings and other quality scores and funding risks
with respect to revenue received from participation therein; a negative change in our healthcare product mix; costs and other liabilities
associated with litigation, government investigations, audits or reviews; the ultimate outcome of litigation between Cigna Corporation, or
Cigna, and us related to the merger agreement between the parties and the potential for such litigation to cause us to incur substantial
additional costs, including potential settlement and judgment costs; risks and uncertainties related to our pharmacy benefit management, or
PBM, business, including non-compliance by any party with the PBM services agreements between us and each of Express Scripts, Inc.,
or Express Scripts, and CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., or CVS Health, as well as agreements governing the transition of pharmacy benefit
management services provided to us from Express Scripts to CVS Health Corporation; medical malpractice or professional liability claims
or other risks related to healthcare services and PBM services provided by our subsidiaries; general risks associated with mergers,
acquisitions, joint ventures and strategic alliances; possible impairment of the value of our intangible assets if future results do not
adequately support goodwill and other intangible assets; possible restrictions in the payment of dividends from our subsidiaries and
increases in required minimum levels of capital; our ability to repurchase shares of our common stock and pay dividends on our common
stock due to the adequacy of our cash flow and earnings and other considerations; the potential negative effect from our substantial
amount of outstanding indebtedness; a downgrade in our financial strength ratings; the effects of any negative publicity related to the
health benefits industry in general or us in particular; failure to effectively maintain and modernize our information systems; events that
may negatively affect our licenses with the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association; large scale medical emergencies, such as future public
health epidemics and catastrophes; changes in economic and market conditions, as well as regulations that may negatively affect our
liquidity and investment portfolios; the impact of international laws and regulations; changes in U.S. tax laws; intense competition to
attract and retain employees; and various laws and provisions in our governing documents that may prevent or discourage takeovers and
business combinations.
-2-
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS.
General
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving
approximately 41 million medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2019. We are an independent
licensee of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association, or BCBSA, an association of independent health benefit plans. We serve
our members as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield, or BCBS, licensee for Colorado,
Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City area), Nevada, New
Hampshire, New York (in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia (excluding the Northern
Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business as Anthem Blue Cross,
Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also conduct business through
arrangements with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we also serve customers in
numerous states across the country as Aim Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, CareMore, Freedom Health, HealthLink,
HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. Also, in the second quarter of 2019, we began providing
pharmacy benefits management, or PBM, services through our IngenioRx subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance
operations in all 50 states and the District of Columbia through our subsidiaries.
In the second quarter of 2019, we began using our new pharmacy benefits manager called IngenioRx to market and sell a PBM
product to fully-insured and self-funded Anthem health plan customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of
the health plans we own. This comprehensive product portfolio includes features such as drug formularies, a pharmacy network,
prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities. In July 2019, we announced our first contract win with a
third-party health insurer, Blue Cross of Idaho, and we began providing PBM services under that contract beginning on January 1,
2020. Also beginning in the second quarter of 2019, we began delegating certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims
processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., or CVS Health, which is a subsidiary of CVS Health
Corporation, pursuant to a five-year agreement with CVS Health, or the CVS PBM Agreement. We intend to retain the
responsibilities for IngenioRx’s clinical and formulary strategy and development, member and employer experiences, operations,
sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy. From December 2009 through December 2019, we delegated
certain PBM functions and administrative services to Express Scripts, Inc., or Express Scripts, pursuant our PBM agreement with
Express Scripts, or the ESI PBM Agreement. In January 2019, we exercised our contractual right to terminate the ESI PBM
Agreement earlier than the original expiration date of December 31, 2019, due to the acquisition of Express Scripts by Cigna
Corporation, or Cigna. We began transitioning existing members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019,
and completed the transition of all of our members on January 1, 2020. Prior to the termination of the ESI PBM Agreement,
Express Scripts managed the network of pharmacy providers, operated mail order pharmacies and processed prescription drug
claims on our behalf, while we sold and supported the product for our members, made formulary decisions, sold drug benefit
design strategy and provided front line member support. We expect IngenioRx to provide our members with more cost-effective
solutions and improve our ability to integrate pharmacy benefits within our medical and specialty platform. Notwithstanding our
termination of the ESI PBM Agreement, the litigation between us and Express Scripts regarding the ESI PBM Agreement
continues. In March 2016, we filed a lawsuit against Express Scripts seeking to recover damages for pharmacy pricing that is
higher than competitive benchmark pricing and damages related to operational breaches. Express Scripts filed an answer to the
lawsuit disputing our contractual claims and alleging various defenses and counterclaims. For additional information regarding this
lawsuit, see Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy
Benefit Management Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K.
On June 6, 2019, we announced our entrance into an agreement to acquire Beacon Health Options, Inc., or Beacon, the largest
independently held behavioral health organization in the country. Beacon serves approximately 40 million individuals across all 50
states. This acquisition aligns with our strategy to diversify into health services and deliver both integrated solutions and care
delivery models that personalize care for people with complex and chronic conditions. The acquisition is expected to close in the
first quarter of 2020 and is subject to standard closing conditions and customary approvals.
-3-
In May 2017, we announced that we were terminating the Agreement and Plan of Merger, or Cigna Merger Agreement,
between us and Cigna. Both we and Cigna have commenced litigation against the other seeking various actions and damages,
including Cigna’s damage claim for a $1.850 billion termination fee pursuant to the terms of the Cigna Merger Agreement. For
additional information about the ongoing litigation related to the Cigna Merger Agreement, see Note 13, “Commitments and
Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
At Anthem, we believe in working together to achieve our mission of improving lives and communities, simplifying healthcare
and expecting more. As we seek to accomplish these goals through a collaborative focus on execution and delivering for those we
serve, our vision is to be the most innovative, valuable and inclusive health partner. We focus on ensuring quality products and
services that give members access to the care they need. With an unyielding commitment to meeting the needs of our diverse
customers, we are guided by the following values:
• Leadership – Redefine what is possible
• Community – Committed, connected, invested
• Integrity – Do the right thing, with a spirit of excellence
• Agility – Delivery today, transform tomorrow
• Diversity – Open your hearts and minds
By striving to live our values each day and in every interaction, we are committed to simplifying as well as radically
reinventing the healthcare experience for all Americans.
We offer a broad spectrum of network-based managed care plans to Large Group, Small Group, Individual, Medicaid and
Medicare markets. Our managed care plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations, or PPOs; Health Maintenance
Organizations, or HMOs; Point-of-Service, or POS, plans; traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including Consumer-
Driven Health Plans, or CDHPs; and hospital only and limited benefit products. In addition, we provide a broad array of managed
care services to self-funded customers, including claims processing, stop loss insurance, actuarial services, provider network
access, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs and other administrative services. We provide an array
of specialty and other insurance products and services such as PBM services, dental, vision, life and disability insurance benefits,
radiology benefit management and analytics-driven personal healthcare. We also provide services to the federal government in
connection with our Federal Health Products & Services business, or FHPS, which administers the Federal Employees Health
Benefits, or FEHB, Program.
An ongoing focus on healthcare costs by employers, the government and consumers has continued to drive the growth of
alternatives to traditional indemnity health insurance. HMO, PPO and hybrid plans are among the various forms of managed care
products that have been developed. Through these types of products, insurers attempt to contain the cost of healthcare by
negotiating contracts with hospitals, physicians and other providers to deliver high-quality healthcare to members at favorable rates.
These products usually feature medical management and other quality and cost optimization measures such as pre-admission
review and approval for certain non-emergency services, pre-authorization of outpatient surgical procedures, network credentialing
to determine that network physicians and hospitals have the required certifications and expertise, and various levels of care
management programs to help members better understand and navigate the healthcare system. In addition, providers may have
incentives to achieve certain quality measures, may share medical cost risk or may have other incentives to deliver quality medical
services in a cost-effective manner. Also, certain plans offer members incentives for healthy behaviors, such as smoking cessation
and weight management. Members are charged periodic, prepaid premiums and generally pay co-payments, coinsurance and/or
deductibles when they receive services. While the distinctions between the various types of plans have lessened over recent years,
PPO, POS and CDHP products generally provide reduced benefits for out-of-network services, while traditional HMO products
generally provide little to no reimbursement for non-emergency out-of-network utilization, but often offer more generous benefit
coverage. An HMO plan may also require members to select one of the network primary care physicians, or PCPs, to coordinate
their care and approve any specialist or other services.
Economic factors, greater consumer and employer sophistication and accountability have resulted in an increased demand for
choice in both product/benefit designs and provider network configurations. As a result, we continue to offer our broad access PPO
networks with multiple benefit designs, but are also focused on leveraging our provider collaboration
-4-
initiatives with our Accountable Care Organization, or ACO, partnerships to develop both narrow and tiered network offerings. This
array of network and product configurations allows both the employer and the employee to design and select the combination of
benefit designs (e.g., traditional PPOs, high deductibles, health reimbursement accounts, health savings accounts, PCP based
products, tiered copays) and networks (e.g., broad, narrow, tiered, closed or exclusive provider, and open) that optimize choice,
quality and price at the consumer, employer and market level. We believe we are well-positioned in each of our states to respond to
these market preferences.
For our fully-insured products, we charge a premium and assume the risk for the cost of covered healthcare services. Under
self-funded products, we charge a fee for services and the employer or plan sponsor funds or reimburses us for the healthcare costs.
In addition, we charge a premium to underwrite stop loss insurance for Local Group and National Account employers that maintain
self-funded health plans.
Our medical membership includes seven different customer types: Local Group, Individual, National Accounts, BlueCard®,
Medicare, Medicaid and FEHB. BCBS-branded business generally refers to members in our service areas licensed by the BCBSA.
Non-BCBS-branded business refers to members in our non-BCBS-branded Amerigroup, Freedom Health, HealthSun, Optimum
HealthCare and Simply Healthcare plans, as well as HealthLink and UniCare members. In addition to the above medical
membership, we also serve customers who purchase one or more of our other products or services that are often ancillary to our
health business.
Our products are generally developed and marketed with an emphasis on the differing needs of our customers. In particular,
our product development and marketing efforts take into account the differing characteristics between the various customers served
by us, as well as the unique needs of educational and public entities, labor groups, federal employee health and benefit programs,
national employers and state-run programs servicing low-income, high-risk and underserved markets. Overall, we seek to establish
pricing and product designs to provide value for our customers while achieving an appropriate level of profitability for each of our
customer categories balanced with the competitive objective to grow market share. We believe that one of the keys to our success
has been our focus on these distinct customer types, which better enables us to develop benefit plans and services that meet our
customers’ unique needs. Further, IngenioRx was built to simplify pharmacy care and focus on the whole person, and we expect it
will make it easier for our customers to achieve the best possible health outcomes at the lowest possible total cost of care.
We market our Individual, Medicare and certain Local Group products through direct marketing activities and an extensive
network of independent agents, brokers and retail partnerships. Products for National Accounts and Local Group customers with a
larger employee base are generally sold through independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer who work with
industry specialists from our in-house sales force. In the Individual and Small Group markets, we offer on-exchange products
through state- or federally-facilitated marketplaces, referred to as public exchanges, and off-exchange products. Federal subsidies
are available for certain members, subject to income and family size, who purchase public exchange products. 
Being a licensee of the BCBS association of companies, of which there were 36 independent primary licensees including us as
of December 31, 2019, provides significant market value, especially when competing for very large multi-state employer groups.
For example, each BCBS member company is able to utilize other BCBS licensees’ substantial provider networks and discounts
when any BCBS member works or travels outside of the state in which their policy is written. This program is referred to as
BlueCard® and is a source of revenue when we provide member services in the states where we are the BCBS licensee to
individuals who are customers of BCBS plans not affiliated with us. This program also provides a national provider network for our
members when they travel to other states.
For additional information describing each of our customer types, detailed marketing efforts and changes in medical
membership over the last three years, see “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations” included in Part II, Item 7 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Our results of operations depend in large part on our ability to accurately predict and effectively manage healthcare costs
through effective contracting with providers of care to our members, product pricing, medical management and health and wellness
programs, including service coordination and case management for addressing complex and specialized health care needs,
innovative product design and our ability to maintain or achieve improvement in our CMS Star ratings. CMS Star ratings affect
Medicare Advantage plan reimbursements as well as our eligibility to earn quality-based bonus payments for those plans. See
“Regulation” herein for additional information on our CMS Star ratings.
-5-
Advances in medical technology, increases in specialty drug costs, increases in hospital expenditures and other provider costs,
the aging of the population and other demographic characteristics continue to contribute to rising healthcare costs. Our managed
care plans and products are designed to encourage providers and members to participate in quality, cost-effective health benefit
programs by using the full range of our innovative medical management services, quality initiatives and financial incentives. Our
market share and high business retention rates enable us to realize the long-term benefits of investing in preventive and early
detection programs. Our ability to provide cost-effective health benefits products and services is enhanced through a disciplined
approach to internal cost containment, prudent management of our risk exposure and successful integration of acquired businesses.
In addition, our ability to manage selling, general and administrative costs continues to be a driver of our overall profitability.
The future results of our operations will also be impacted by certain external forces and resulting changes in our business
model and strategy. The continuing growth in our government-sponsored business exposes us to increased regulatory oversight.
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended, or
collectively, the ACA, has changed and may continue to make broad-based changes to the U.S. healthcare system. The ACA
presented us with new growth opportunities, but also introduced new risks, regulatory challenges and uncertainties, and required
changes in the way products are designed, underwritten, priced, distributed and administered. Changes to our business environment
are likely to continue as elected officials at the national and state levels continue to enact, and both elected officials and candidates
for election continue to propose, significant modifications to existing laws and regulations, including changes to taxes and fees. In
addition, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal district court decision invalidating the ACA, or the “2018
ACA Decision”, which judgment has been stayed pending appeal, continue to contribute to this uncertainty. We will continue to
evaluate the impact of the ACA as additional guidance is made available and any further developments or judicial rulings occur. For
additional discussion, see “Regulation” herein and Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In addition to the external forces discussed in the preceding paragraph, our results of operations are impacted by levels and mix
of membership which can change as a result of the quality and pricing of our health benefits products and services, aging
population, economic conditions, changes in unemployment, acquisitions, entry into new markets and expansions in or exits from
existing markets. These membership trends could be negatively impacted by various factors that could have a material adverse
effect on our future results of operations such as general economic downturns that result in business failures, failure to obtain new
customers or retain existing customers, premium increases, benefit changes or our exit from a specific market. See Part I, Item 1A
“Risk Factors” and Part II, Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
During 2019, we modestly expanded our participation in the Individual ACA-compliant market. Our strategy has been, and
will continue to be, to only participate in rating regions where we have an appropriate level of confidence that these markets are on
a path toward sustainability, including, but not limited to, factors such as expected financial performance, regulatory environment,
and underlying market characteristics. We currently offer Individual ACA-compliant products in 91 of the 143 rating regions in
which we operate.
We believe healthcare is local and that we have the strong local presence required to understand and meet local customer needs
with regard to any product they are enrolled in with us. Further, we believe we are well-positioned to deliver what customers want:
innovative, choice-based and affordable products; distinctive service; simplified transactions; and better access to information for
quality care. Our local presence, combined with our national expertise, has created opportunities for collaborative programs that
reward physicians and hospitals for clinical quality and excellence. We feel that our commitment to health improvement and care
management provides added value to customers and healthcare professionals. Ultimately, we believe that practical and sustainable
improvements in healthcare must focus on improving healthcare quality while managing costs for total affordability. We have
implemented initiatives driving payment innovation and partnering with providers to lower cost and improve the quality of
healthcare for our members, and we continue to develop new and innovative ways to effectively manage risk and engage our
members. Further, we are expanding our financial arrangements with providers to include payment models that encourage value-
based care. We believe focusing on quality of care rather than volume of care is the foundation for improving patient outcomes. Our
value-based payment model supports patient-centered care by improving collaboration between providers and health partners and
delivering to our patients the right care, at the right time, in the right place. In addition, we are focused on achieving efficiencies
from our national scale while optimizing service performance for our customers. Finally, we expect to continue to rationalize our
portfolio of businesses and products
-6-
and align our investments to capitalize on new opportunities to drive growth in our existing markets and expand into new markets
in the future.
We continue to enhance interactions with customers, providers, brokers, agents, employees and other stakeholders through
web-enabled technology and improving internal operations. Our approach includes not only the sales and distribution of health
benefits products on the Internet, but also implementing advanced capabilities that improve services benefiting customers, agents,
brokers, and providers while optimizing administrative costs. These enhancements can also help improve the quality, coordination
and safety of healthcare through increased communications between patients and their physicians.
In pursuing our vision of being the most innovative, valuable and inclusive partner, we intend to transform healthcare by
providing trusted and caring solutions and delivering quality products and services that give customers access to the care they need.
At the same time, we will focus on earnings, organic membership growth, improvements in our operating cost structure, strategic
acquisitions and the efficient use of capital.
Significant Transactions
The significant transactions that have occurred over the last five years that have impacted or will impact our capital structure or
that have influenced or will influence how we conduct our business operations include:
•Launch of IngenioRx (2019);
•Acquisition of America’s 1st Choice (2018);
•Acquisition of HealthSun Health Plans, Inc., or HealthSun (2017);
•Acquisition of Simply Healthcare Holdings, Inc., or Simply Healthcare (2015); and
•Use of Capital—Board of Directors declarations of dividends on our common stock; repurchases of our common stock;
and debt repurchases and new debt issuances (2019 and prior).
For additional information regarding certain of these transactions, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions,” Note 12, “Debt,” and
Note 14, “Capital Stock,” to our audited consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
Competition
The managed care industry is highly competitive, both nationally and in our local markets. Competition continues to be
intense due to aggressive marketing, pricing, government-sponsored programs bid activity, business consolidations, new strategic
alliances, new competitors in the market, a proliferation of new products, technological advancements, the impact of legislative
reform, and increased quality awareness and price sensitivity among customers.
We believe that participants in the managed care industry compete for customers based on quality of service, price, access to
provider networks, access to care management and wellness programs (including health information), innovation, breadth and
flexibility of products and benefits, expertise and reputation (including National Committee on Quality Assurance, or NCQA,
accreditation status), brand recognition and financial stability. Our ability to attract and retain customers is substantially tied to our
ability to distinguish ourselves from our competitors in these areas.
Also, a health plan’s ability to interact with employers, customers and other third parties (including healthcare professionals)
through electronic data transfer has become a more important competitive factor, and we have made significant investments in
technology to enhance our electronic interaction with providers, employers, customers and third parties.
We believe our exclusive right to market products under the most recognized brand in the industry, BCBS, in our most
significant markets provides us with greater brand recognition over competitive product offerings. Our provider networks in our
markets enable us to achieve efficiencies and distinctive service levels by allowing us to offer a broad range of health benefits to
our customers on a more cost-effective basis than many of our competitors. We strive to distinguish our products through provider
access, service, care management, product value and brand recognition.
Product pricing remains competitive and we strive to price our healthcare benefit products and design our Medicare and
Medicaid bids consistent with anticipated underlying medical trends. We believe our pricing and bid strategy, based on
-7-
predictive modeling, proprietary research and data-driven processes, has positioned us to benefit from the potential growth
opportunities available through entry into new markets, expansions in existing markets and as a result of any future changes to the
current regulatory scheme. We believe that our pricing and bid strategy, brand name and network quality will provide a strong
foundation for membership growth opportunities in the future.
To build our provider networks, we compete with other health benefits plans for the best contracts with hospitals, physicians
and other providers. We believe that physicians and other providers primarily consider customer volume, reimbursement rates,
timeliness of reimbursement and administrative service capabilities along with the reduction of non-value added administrative
tasks when deciding whether to contract with a health benefits plan.
At the sales and distribution level, we compete for qualified agents and brokers to recommend and distribute our products.
Strong competition exists among insurance companies and health benefits plans for agents and brokers with demonstrated ability to
secure new business and maintain existing accounts. We believe that the quality and price of our products, support services,
reputation and prior relationships, along with a reasonable commission structure, are the factors agents and brokers consider in
choosing whether to market our products. We believe that we have good relationships with our agents and brokers, and that our
products, support services and commission structure compare favorably to those of our competitors in all of our markets. Typically,
we are the largest competitor in each of our BCBS branded markets and, thus, are a closely-watched target by other insurance
competitors.
In addition, the PBM industry is highly competitive, and IngenioRx is subject to competition from national, regional and local
PBMs, insurers, health plans, large retail pharmacy chains, large retail stores, supermarkets, other mail order pharmacies, web
pharmacies and specialty pharmacies.
Reportable Segments
We manage our operations through three reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business and
Other. We regularly evaluate the appropriateness of our reportable segments, particularly in light of organizational changes, merger
and acquisition activity and changing laws and regulations. Prior to the second quarter of 2019, our Other segment included certain
eliminations and corporate expenses not allocated to either of our other reportable segments. Beginning with the second quarter of
2019, our Other segment also includes IngenioRx, our pharmacy benefits manager, which began operations during the second
quarter of 2019. In addition, during the second quarter of 2019, we reclassified our integrated health services business, our
Diversified Business Group, or DBG, from our Government Business segment to the Other segment to reflect changes in how our
segments are being managed. Amounts for prior years have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation for
comparability. Based on the Financial Accounting Standards Board, or FASB, guidance, as of December 31, 2019, IngenioRx and
DBG did not collectively meet the quantitative thresholds for a reportable segment. Current reportable segments may change in the
future.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments both offer a diversified mix of managed care
products, including PPOs, HMOs, traditional indemnity benefits and POS plans, as well as a variety of hybrid benefit plans
including CDHPs, hospital only and limited benefit products.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business segment includes our Local Group, National Accounts, Individual and Specialty
businesses. Business units in the Commercial & Specialty Business segment offer fully-insured health products; provide a broad
array of managed care services to self-funded customers including claims processing, underwriting, stop loss insurance, actuarial
services, provider network access, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs and other administrative
services; and provide an array of specialty and other insurance products and services such as dental, vision, life and disability
insurance benefits.
Our Government Business segment includes our Medicare and Medicaid businesses, National Government Services, or NGS,
and services provided to the federal government in connection with our FHPS business. Medicaid makes federal matching funds
available to all states for the delivery of healthcare benefits to eligible individuals, principally those with incomes below specified
levels who meet other state-specified requirements. Medicaid is structured to allow each state to establish its own eligibility
standards, benefits package, payment rates and program administration under broad federal guidelines. Our Medicare customers are
Medicare-eligible individual members age 65 and over who have enrolled in Medicare Advantage, a managed care alternative for
the Medicare program, or who have purchased Medicare Supplement benefit coverage, some disabled members under age 65, or
members of all ages with end stage renal disease. Medicare
-8-
Supplement policies are sold to Medicare recipients as supplements to the benefits they receive from the Medicare program.
Medicare Supplement policy rates are filed with, and in some cases approved by, state insurance departments. Most of the premium
for Medicare Advantage is based on bids submitted to CMS and paid directly by the federal government on behalf of the participant
who may also be charged a small premium. Additionally, through our alliance partnership engagements with larger provider groups
and BCBS plans, we offer a variety of Medicaid services that include joint ventures, administrative service offerings, and full-risk
arrangements. NGS acts as a Medicare contractor for the federal government in several regions across the nation.
Our Other segment includes our PBM business (IngenioRx), our integrated health services business (DBG) and corporate
expenses not allocated to either of our other reportable segments.
Through our participation in various federal government programs, we generated approximately 20.7%, 19.8% and 17.8% of
our total consolidated revenues from agencies of the U.S. government for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively. These revenues are contained in the Government Business segment. An immaterial amount of our total consolidated
revenues is derived from activities outside of the U.S.
 Products and Services
A general description of our products and services is provided below:
Preferred Provider Organization:    PPO products offer the member an option to select any healthcare provider, with benefits
reimbursed by us at a higher level when care is received from a participating network provider. Increasingly, customers are
choosing our PPO products offered with an exclusive provider organization, which eliminates coverage out of network. Coverage is
subject to co-payments or deductibles and coinsurance, with member cost sharing usually limited by out-of-pocket maximums.
Consumer-Driven Health Plans:    CDHPs provide consumers with increased financial responsibility, choice and control
regarding how their healthcare dollars are spent. Generally, CDHPs combine a high-deductible PPO plan with an employer-funded
and/or employee-funded personal care account, which may result in tax benefits to the employee. Some or all of the dollars
remaining in the personal care account at year-end can be rolled over to the next year for future healthcare needs.
Traditional Indemnity:    Indemnity products offer the member an option to select any healthcare provider for covered services.
Coverage is subject to deductibles and coinsurance, with member cost sharing usually limited by out-of-pocket maximums.
Health Maintenance Organization:    HMO products include comprehensive managed care benefits, generally through a
participating network of physicians, hospitals and other providers. A member in one of our HMOs must typically select a PCP from
our network. PCPs generally are family practitioners, internists or pediatricians who provide necessary preventive and primary
medical care, and are generally responsible for coordinating other necessary healthcare services. We offer HMO plans with varying
levels of co-payments, which result in different levels of premium rates.
 Point-of-Service:    POS products blend the characteristics of HMO, PPO and indemnity plans. Members can have
comprehensive HMO-style benefits through participating network providers with minimum out-of-pocket expenses (co-payments)
and also can go directly, without a referral, to any provider they choose, subject to, among other things, certain deductibles and
coinsurance. Member cost sharing is limited by out-of-pocket maximums.
Public Exchange and Off-Exchange Products: Individual and Small Group products cover essential health benefits as defined
in the ACA along with many other requirements and cost sharing features. Individual and Small Group products offered on and off
the public exchanges meet the definition of the “metal” product requirements (bronze, silver, gold and platinum) and each metal
product must satisfy a specific actuarial value. Health insurers participating on the public exchanges must offer at least one silver
and one gold product.
Administrative Services:    In addition to fully-insured products, we provide administrative services to Large Group, Small
Group and National Account employers that maintain self-funded health plans. These administrative services include underwriting,
actuarial services, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs, claims processing and other administrative
services for self-funded employers. Self-funded health plans are also able to use our provider networks and to realize savings
through our negotiated provider arrangements, while allowing employers the ability to design certain
-9-
health benefit plans in accordance with their own requirements and objectives. We also underwrite stop loss insurance for self-
funded plans.
 BlueCard®:    BlueCard® is a national program that links participating healthcare providers and independent BCBS plans.
BlueCard® host members are generally members who reside in or travel to a state in which an Anthem subsidiary is the Blue Cross
and/or Blue Shield licensee and who are covered under an employer-sponsored health plan serviced by a non-Anthem controlled
BCBS licensee, which is the “home” plan. We perform certain administrative functions for BlueCard® host members, for which we
receive administrative fees from the BlueCard® members’ home plans. Other administrative functions, including maintenance of
enrollment information and customer service, are performed by the home plan.
 Medicare Plans:    We offer a wide variety of plans, products and options to individuals age 65 and older such as Medicare
Supplement plans; Medicare Advantage, including Special Needs Plans or SNPs, also known as Medicare Advantage SNPs;
Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans, or Medicare Part D; and dual-eligible programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans, or
MMPs. Medicare Supplement plans typically pay the difference between healthcare costs incurred by a beneficiary and amounts
paid by Medicare. Medicare Advantage plans provide Medicare beneficiaries with a managed care alternative to traditional
Medicare and often include a Medicare Part D benefit. In addition, our Medicare Advantage SNPs provide tailored benefits to
special needs individuals who are institutionalized or have severe or disabling chronic conditions and to dual-eligible customers,
who are low-income seniors and persons under age 65 with disabilities. Medicare Advantage SNPs are coordinated care plans
specifically designed to provide targeted care, covering all the health care services considered medically necessary for members
and often providing professional care coordination services, with personal guidance and programs that help members maintain their
health. Medicare Part D offers a prescription drug plan to Medicare and MMP beneficiaries. MMP is a demonstration program
focused on serving members who are dually eligible for Medicaid and Medicare, which was established as a result of the passage of
the ACA. We offer these plans to customers through our health benefit subsidiaries throughout the country, including America’s 1st
Choice, Amerigroup, CareMore, HealthSun and Simply Healthcare.
 Individual Plans:    We offer a full range of health insurance plans with a variety of options and deductibles for individuals
who are not covered by employer-sponsored coverage and are not eligible for government sponsored plans, such as Medicare
and/or Medicaid. Individual policies are generally sold through independent agents and brokers, retail partnerships, our in-house
sales force or via the exchanges. Individual business is sold on a fully-insured basis. We offer on-exchange products through public
exchanges and off-exchange products. Federal premium subsidies are available only for certain public exchange Individual
products. Unsubsidized Individual customers are generally more sensitive to product pricing and, to a lesser extent, the
configuration of the network and the efficiency of administration. Instability in the Individual market has resulted in a targeted
approach where we offer products in select geographies.
 Medicaid Plans and Other State-Sponsored Programs:    We have state contracts to serve members enrolled in publicly funded
healthcare programs, including Medicaid; ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs; Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
or TANF; programs for seniors and people with disabilities, or SPD; Children’s Health Insurance Programs, or CHIP; and specialty
programs such as those focused on long-term services and support, or LTSS, HIV/AIDS, children living in foster care, behavioral
health and/or substance abuse disorders, and intellectual disabilities and/or developmental disabilities, or ID/DD programs. The
Medicaid program makes federal matching funds available to all states for the delivery of healthcare benefits for low income and/or
high medical risk individuals. These programs are managed by the individual states based on broad federal guidelines. TANF is a
state and federally funded program designed for the population consisting primarily of low-income children and their guardians.
SPD is a federal income supplement program designed for Supplemental Security Income recipients; however, states can broaden
eligibility criteria. This population consists of low-income seniors and people with disabilities. CHIP is a state and federally funded
program that provides healthcare coverage to children not otherwise covered by Medicaid or other insurance programs. LTSS is a
state and federally funded program that offers states a broad and flexible set of program design options and refers to the delivery of
long-term services and support for our members who receive home and community- or institution-based services for long-term
care. Our HIV/AIDS program is a state and federally sponsored program that provides services to those living with HIV/AIDS. Our
foster care program is a state and federally sponsored program serving children with complex needs within the foster care system.
Our behavioral health program is a state and federally sponsored program providing services to those with mental health and/or
substance abuse disorders. ID/DD is a state and federally sponsored program serving those living with limitations in intellectual
functioning and adaptive behavior learning disabilities. Our Medicaid plans also cover certain dual-eligible customers, as
previously described above, who also receive Medicare benefits. We provide Medicaid and other state
-10-
sponsored services, such as administrative services, in Arkansas, California, Colorado, Florida, Georgia, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky,
Louisiana, Maryland, Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, Nevada, New Jersey, New York, South Carolina, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia,
Washington, West Virginia, Wisconsin and Washington D.C.
 Pharmacy Products:    In the second quarter of 2019, we began using IngenioRx to market and sell a PBM product to fully-
insured and self-funded Anthem health plan customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of the health plans
we own. This comprehensive product portfolio includes features such as drug formularies, a pharmacy network, prescription drug
database, member services, and mail order capabilities. In July 2019, we announced our first contract win with a third-party health
insurer, Blue Cross of Idaho, and we began providing PBM services under that contract beginning on January 1, 2020. Also
beginning in the second quarter of 2019, we began delegating certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims processing and
prescription fulfillment, to CVS Health pursuant to the CVS PBM Agreement. We intend to retain the responsibilities for
IngenioRx’s clinical and formulary strategy and development, member and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing,
account management and retail network strategy. From December 2009 through December 2019, we delegated certain PBM
functions and administrative services to Express Scripts pursuant to the ESI PBM Agreement, excluding certain health plans and
self-insured members who have exclusive agreements with different PBM service providers. We began transitioning existing
members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019 and completed the transition of all of our members on
January 1, 2020. Express Scripts managed the network of pharmacy providers, operated mail order pharmacies and processed
prescription drug claims on our behalf, while we sold and supported the product for our members, made formulary decisions, sold
drug benefit design strategy and provided front line member support.
 Life Insurance:    We offer an array of competitive individual and group life insurance benefit products to both Large Group
and Small Group customers in conjunction with our health plans. The life products include term life and accidental death and
dismemberment.
 Disability:    We offer short-term and long-term disability products, usually in conjunction with our health plans.
 Radiology Benefit Management:    We offer outpatient diagnostic imaging management services to health plans, which
promote the most appropriate use of clinical services to improve the quality of care delivered to members. These services include
utilization management for advanced diagnostic imaging procedures, network development and optimization, patient safety, claims
adjudication and provider payment.
 Personal Health Care Guidance:    We offer evidence-based and analytics-driven personal healthcare guidance. These services
help improve the quality, coordination and safety of healthcare, enhance communications between patients and their physicians,
and reduce medical costs.
 Dental:    Our dental plans include networks in certain states in which we operate. Many of the dental benefits are provided to
customers enrolled in our health plans and are offered on both a fully-insured and self-funded basis. Our members also have access
to additional dental providers through our participation in the National Dental GRID, a national dental network developed by and
for BCBS plans. The National Dental GRID includes dentists in all 50 states and the District of Columbia and provides multi-state
customers with a national solution that offers in-network discounts across the country. Additionally, we offer managed dental
services to other healthcare plans to assist those plans in providing dental benefits to their customers.
 Vision Services and Products:    Our vision plans include networks within the states in which we operate. Many of the vision
benefits are provided to customers enrolled in our health plans and are offered on both a fully-insured and self-funded basis.
 Medicare Administrative Operations:    Through our subsidiary, NGS, we serve as a fiscal intermediary, carrier and Medicare
administrative contractor for the federal government by providing administrative services for the Medicare program, Parts A and B,
which generally provides coverage for persons who are 65 or older and for persons who are under 65 and disabled or with end-
stage renal disease. Part A of the Medicare program provides coverage for services provided by hospitals, skilled nursing facilities
and other healthcare facilities. Part B of the Medicare program provides coverage for services provided by physicians, physical and
occupational therapists and other professional providers, as well as certain durable medical equipment and medical supplies.
-11-
 Networks and Provider Relations
Our relationships with physicians, hospitals and professionals that render healthcare services to our members are guided by
local, regional and national standards for network development, reimbursement and contract methodologies. While following
industry standards, we are simultaneously seeking to lead transformation efforts within our healthcare system, moving from a
fragmented model premised on episodic intervention to one based on proactive, coordinated care built around the needs of the
patient. A key element of this transformation involves a transition from traditional fee-for-service payment models to models where
providers are paid based on the value, both in quality and affordability, of the care they deliver.
 We establish “market-based” hospital reimbursement payments that we believe are fair, but aggressive, and among the most
competitive in the market. We also seek to ensure that physicians in our network are paid in a timely manner at appropriate rates. In
many instances, we deploy multi-year contracting strategies, including case rates or fixed rates, to limit our exposure to medical
cost inflation and to increase cost predictability. We maintain both broad and narrow provider networks to ensure member choice,
based on both price and access needs, while implementing programs designed to improve the quality of care our members receive.
Increasingly, we are supplementing our broad-based networks with smaller or more cost-effective networks that are designed to be
attractive to a more price-sensitive customer segment, such as public exchange customers.
 Our reimbursement strategies vary across markets and depend on the degree of consolidation and integration of physician
groups and hospitals. Under a fee-for-service reimbursement methodology for physicians, fee schedules are developed at the state
level based on an assessment of several factors and conditions, including the CMS resource-based relative value system, or
RBRVS, medical practice cost inflation and physician supply. We utilize CMS RBRVS fee schedules as a reference point for fee
schedule development and analysis. The RBRVS structure was developed, maintained, and updated by CMS and is used by the
Medicare program and other major payers. In addition, we have implemented and continue to expand physician incentive
contracting, or “pay-for-performance,” which ties physician payment levels to performance on clinical measures.
 While we generally do not delegate full financial responsibility to our physician providers in the form of capitation-based
reimbursement, we maintain capitation-based arrangements in certain markets where we determine that market dynamics result in it
being a useful method to lower costs and reduce underwriting risk.
 Our hospital contracts provide for a variety of reimbursement arrangements depending on local market dynamics and current
hospital utilization efficiency. Most hospitals are reimbursed a fixed amount per day or reimbursed a per-case amount, per
admission, for inpatient covered services. A small percentage of hospitals, primarily rural, sole community hospitals, are
reimbursed on a discount from approved charge basis for covered services. Our “per-case” reimbursement methods utilize many of
the same attributes contained in Medicare’s Diagnosis Related Groups methodology. Hospital outpatient services are reimbursed by
fixed case rates, fee schedules or percent of approved charges. Our hospital contracts recognize unique hospital attributes, such as
academic medical centers or community hospitals, and the volume of care performed for our members. To improve predictability of
expected costs, we frequently use a multi-year contracting approach with providers. In addition, the majority of our hospital
contracts include a pay-for-performance component where reimbursement levels are linked to improved clinical performance,
patient safety and medical error reduction. 
Our provider engagement and contracting strategies are moving away from “unit price” or volume-based payment models to
payment models that align compensation with the value delivered as measured by healthcare outcomes, quality and cost. Our
Enhanced Personal Health Care program augments traditional fee-for-service with shared savings opportunities for providers when
actual healthcare costs are below projected costs and providers meet specific quality measures. The quality measures are based on
nationally accepted, credible standards (e.g., NCQA, the American Diabetes Association and the American Academy of Pediatrics)
and span preventive, acute and chronic care. We understand, however, that payment incentives alone are insufficient to create the
large-scale, system-wide transformation required to achieve meaningful impacts on cost, quality and member experience.
Accordingly, we are investing in care delivery transformation and population health management support structures to help
providers succeed under value-based payment models. This support includes our web-based population health management
technology and teams of dedicated practice consultants who work alongside providers, sharing best practices, and helping them
leverage our data to the benefit of their patients. In some of these arrangements, participating physician practices receive a per-
member, per-month clinical coordination fee to compensate them for important care management activities that occur outside of the
patient visit (e.g., purchasing an electronic health record or hiring care
-12-
management nurses), all of which have been shown to reduce healthcare costs and improve care outcomes. Since the launch of our
Enhanced Personal Health Care program, we now have arrangements with provider organizations covering 52% of our PCPs and
have rolled this program out in each of the 14 states where we operate as a licensee of the BCBSA.
Medical Management Programs
Our medical management programs include a broad array of activities that facilitate improvements in the quality of care
provided to our members and promote cost-effective medical care. These medical management activities and programs are
administered and directed by physicians and nurses. The goals of our medical management strategies are to ensure that the care
delivered to our members is supported by appropriate medical and scientific evidence, is received on a timely basis and occurs in
the most appropriate setting. The following is a general description of our medical management programs, which are available to
our members depending on the particular plan or product in which they participate:
Precertification:    A traditional medical management program involves assessment of the appropriateness of certain
hospitalizations and other medical services prior to the services being rendered. For example, precertification is used to determine
whether a set of hospital and medical services is being appropriately applied to the member’s clinical condition, in accordance with
criteria for medical necessity as that term is defined in the member’s benefits contract. All of our health plans have implemented
precertification programs for selected medical services including surgeries, major diagnostic procedures, devices, drugs and other
services to help members maximize benefits and avoid unnecessary charges or penalties. Through our American Imaging
Management, Inc. subsidiary, doing business as AIM Specialty Health, or AIM, we promote appropriate, safe and affordable
member care in the areas of imaging, sleep disorders, cardiac testing, oncology drugs and musculoskeletal procedures. These
expanded specialty benefit management solutions leverage clinical expertise and technology to engage our provider communities
and members in more effective and efficient use of outpatient services.
Care coordination:    Another traditional medical management strategy we use is care coordination, which is based on
nationally recognized criteria developed by third-party medical specialists. With inpatient care coordination, the requirements and
intensity of services during a patient’s hospital stay are reviewed, at times by an onsite, skilled nurse professional in collaboration
with the hospital’s medical and nursing staff, in order to coordinate care and determine the most effective transition of care from the
hospital setting. In addition, continued stay cases are reviewed with physician medical directors to ensure appropriate utilization of
medical services. We also coordinate care for outpatient services to help ensure that patients with chronic conditions who receive
care from multiple physicians are able to manage the exchange of information between physicians and coordinate office visits to
their physicians.
Case management:    We have implemented a medical management strategy focused on identifying the small percentage of the
membership that will require a high level of intervention and assistance to manage their healthcare needs. Case Management
identifies members who are likely to be re-admitted to the hospital through claims analysis using predictive modeling techniques,
the use of health risk assessment data, utilization management reports and referrals from a physician or one of our other programs,
such as the 24/7 NurseLine. Registered nurses, medical directors, behavioral health experts, pharmacists and other clinicians focus
on these members and help them coordinate their care through pharmacy compliance, post-hospital care, follow-up visits to see
their physician and support in their home. Increasingly, we collaborate with our providers and key health partners within the
member’s provider care team by providing actionable patient data insights, practice-coaching capabilities, technology and programs
and products that help our providers and health partners to successfully deliver the right care, at the right time, in the right place.
Formulary management:    We have developed formularies, which are selections of drugs based on clinical quality and
effectiveness. A pharmacy and therapeutics committee of physicians uses scientific and clinical evidence to ensure that our
members have access to the appropriate drug therapies and receive these therapies through proper settings. 
Medical policy:    A medical policy committee determines our national policies and guidelines for the application of medical
technologies, procedures and services. This committee is comprised of internal and external physician leaders from various
specialties and areas of the country. We also work in cooperation with academic medical centers, practicing community physicians
and medical specialty organizations. All guidelines and policies are reviewed at least once a year or as new published clinical
evidence becomes available.
Quality programs:    We are actively engaged with our hospital and physician networks to enable them to improve medical and
surgical care and achieve better outcomes for our members. We endorse, encourage and incentivize hospitals and
-13-
physicians to support national initiatives to improve the quality of clinical care and patient outcomes and to reduce medication
errors and hospital infections.
External review procedures:    We work with outside experts through a process of external review to provide our members
scientifically and clinically, evidence-based medical care. When we receive member concerns, we have formal appeals procedures
that ultimately allow coverage disputes related to medical necessity decisions under the benefits contract to be settled by
independent expert physicians.
Provider cost comparison tools: Through Estimate Your Cost, Care & Cost Finder, and other web-based tools, our members
can compare cost estimates, quality accreditation data and patient reviews for common services at contracted providers, with cost
estimates for facility, professional and ancillary services. These cost estimates bundle related services typically performed at the
time of the procedure, not just for the procedure itself. Users can review cost data for over 400 common, shop-able medical
procedures in all states. Members can also estimate out-of-pocket costs based on a member’s own benefit coverage, deductible, and
out-of-pocket maximum. We also offer information on overall facility ratings and patient experience using trusted third-party data.
We continue to work on enhancing and evolving our tools to assist members in making informed and value-based healthcare
decisions. In addition, we collaborate with an external independent vendor to support employers wanting to purchase a consumer
engagement solution with certain additional functionality.
Anthem Health Guide: Anthem Health Guide integrates the customer service experience with clinical and wellness coaching to
provide easier navigation of healthcare services for our members. Anthem Health Guide provides members with education on
benefit options and digital opportunities that fit member references, and makes recommendations for eligible clinical programs to
ensure members are connected to the most appropriate care and clinical resources. By allowing members to connect with us using
voice, click-to-chat, secure email and mobile technology, we enhance our ability to engage with our members.
Anthem Whole Health Connection: Anthem Whole Health Connection is a differentiated approach to whole person health that
uniquely connects medical, pharmacy, dental, vision, disability and supplemental health clinical and claims data to proactively
identify health issues earlier and engage our members with their health providers in new ways to support health, lower costs and
deliver better healthcare experience. Anthem Whole Health Connection is included when Anthem health benefits are combined
with one or more of the Anthem pharmacy, dental, vision, life, disability or supplemental health coverage plans.
Care Management Programs
We continue to expand our 360º Health suite of integrated care management programs and tools. 360º Health offers the
following programs, among others, which are available to our members depending on the particular plan or product in which they
participate, and have been proven to increase quality and reduce medical costs for our members:
ConditionCare and FutureMoms are care management and maternity management programs that serve as adjuncts to physician
care. Skilled nurse professionals, with added support from our team of dietitians, social workers, pharmacists, health educators and
other health professionals, help participants understand their condition, their doctor’s orders and how to become a better self-
manager of their condition. We also offer members infertility consultation through our SpecialOffers@Anthem program, a
comprehensive and integrated assembly of discounted health and wellness products and services from a variety of the nation’s
leading retailers.
24/7 NurseLine offers access to qualified, registered nurses anytime. This allows our members to make informed decisions
about the appropriate level of care and avoid unnecessary worry. This program also includes a referral process to the nearest urgent
care facility, a robust audio library, accessible by phone, with more than 600 health and wellness topics, as well as on-line health
education topics designed to educate members about symptoms and treatment of many common health concerns.
MyHealth Advantage utilizes integrated information systems and sophisticated data analytics to help our members improve
their compliance with evidence-based care guidelines, providing personal care notes that alert members to potential gaps in care,
enable more prudent healthcare choices, and assist in the realization of member out-of-pocket cost savings. Key opportunities are
also shared with physicians through Availity® at the time of membership eligibility verification. Availity® is
-14-
an electronic data interchange system that allows for the exchange of health information among providers over a secure network.
MyHealth Coach provides our members with a professional guide who helps them navigate the healthcare system and make
better decisions about their well-being. MyHealth Coach proactively reaches out to people who are at risk for potentially serious
health issues or have complex healthcare needs. Our health coaches help participants understand and manage chronic conditions,
handle any health and wellness related services they need and make smart lifestyle choices.
HealthyLifestyles helps employees transform unhealthy habits into positive ones by focusing on behaviors that can have a
positive effect on their health and their employer’s financial well-being. HealthyLifestyles programs include smoking cessation,
weight management, stress management, physical activity, and diet and nutrition.
Behavioral Health Case Management is a comprehensive program supporting a wide range of members who are impacted by
their behavioral health condition, including specialty areas such as eating disorders, anxiety, depression and substance abuse. The
program assists members and their families with obtaining appropriate behavioral health treatment, offering community resources,
providing education and telephonic support, and promoting provider collaboration.
Autism Spectrum Disorder Program is a specialized case management program staffed by a dedicated team of clinicians who
have been trained on the unique challenges and needs of families with a member who has a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder.
These clinicians provide education, information on community resources to help with care and support, guidance on the appropriate
usage of benefits, and assistance in exploring effective treatments, such as medical services, that may help the member and their
families.
Employee Assistance Programs provide 24/7 telephonic support for personal and crisis events. Members also gain access to
many resources that allow support within work and personal life by providing quick and easy access to confidential resources to
help meet the challenges of daily life. Examples of services available include counseling, referral assistance with child care, health
and wellness, financial issues, legal issues, adoption and daily living.
Healthcare Quality Initiatives
Increasingly, the healthcare industry is able to define quality healthcare based on preventive health measurements, outcomes of
care and optimal care management for chronic disease. A key to our success has been our ability to work with our network
physicians and hospitals to improve the quality and outcomes of the healthcare services provided to our members. Our ability to
promote quality medical care has been recognized by NCQA, the largest and most respected national accreditation program for
managed care health plans.
Several quality healthcare measures, including the Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set, or HEDIS®, have been
incorporated into NCQA’s accreditation processes. HEDIS® measures range from preventive services, such as screening
mammography and pediatric immunization, to elements of care, including decreasing the complications of diabetes and improving
treatment for patients with heart disease. For health plans, NCQA’s highest accreditation status of Excellent is granted only to those
plans that demonstrate levels of service and clinical quality that meet or exceed NCQA’s rigorous requirements for consumer
protection and quality improvement. Plans earning this accreditation level must also achieve HEDIS® results that are in the highest
range of national or regional performance. Details for each of our plans’ accreditation levels can be found at www.ncqa.org.
Our wholly-owned health outcomes research subsidiary, HealthCore, Inc., or HealthCore, generates consistent and actionable
evidence to support decision making while helping to guide fresh initiatives for a range of stakeholders in the healthcare industry.
By leveraging a rich array of medical and pharmacy utilization data queried from administrative claims, patient surveys, medical
charts and laboratory diagnostics, among other health records, HealthCore’s multi-disciplinary research teams uncover a broad
spectrum of safety, effectiveness, pharmacoepidemiology, and health economics evidence. HealthCore’s real world evidence and
comparative effectiveness research, among other data, has played roles in the product planning and development campaigns of
biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies and today it lists most of the leading biologics and drug manufacturers as clients or
alliance partners. Its health plan research has led to better insights into evidence-based treatment approaches, the development of
value-based initiatives to drive access and adherence to treatment, and the crafting of incentives to modify patient and provider
behavior. One of HealthCore’s predominant initiatives is its governmental and academic collaborations that include cooperation
with some of the country’s top institutions and federal
-15-
agencies, including the Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, Patient-Centered Outcomes Research Institute and the National
Institutes of Health. HealthCore is also an active contributor to the FDA’s medical product safety surveillance Sentinel program.
HealthCore serves as the coordinating center for the National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute’s Pediatric Heart Network, a
collaboration among 40 of the nation’s top pediatric hospitals. Additionally, HealthCore has taken a thought-leadership position in
the development of pragmatic clinical trials. As a notable contributor to the health outcomes evidence base, HealthCore’s research
findings are broadly disseminated during presentations at national and international medical meetings and are published in a variety
of respected peer-reviewed medical and health services journals.
Our AIM subsidiary supports quality by implementing clinical appropriateness and patient safety solutions for advanced
imaging procedures, cardiology, sleep medicine, medical oncology, radiation therapy, rehabilitative, certain outpatient surgical and
musculoskeletal services. These programs, based on widely accepted and evidence-based clinical guidelines, promote the most
appropriate use of clinical services to improve the quality of overall healthcare delivered to our members and members of other
health plans that are covered under AIM’s programs. To provide additional impact to its clinical appropriateness program, AIM has
also implemented a provider assessment program, OptiNet®, which promotes more informed selection of diagnostic imaging and
testing facilities by providing cost and facility information to physician offices at the point that a procedure is ordered. We have
also leveraged AIM’s provider network assessment information to proactively engage and educate our members about imaging
providers and sleep testing choices based on site capabilities and cost differences. This program is another example of how we
facilitate improvements in the quality of care provided to our members and promote cost-effective medical care.
Pricing and Underwriting of Our Products
We price our products based on our assessment of current healthcare claim costs and emerging healthcare cost trends,
combined with charges for administrative expenses, risk and profit, including charges for the ACA taxes and fees, where applicable.
We continually review our product designs and pricing guidelines on a national and regional basis so that our products remain
competitive and consistent with our profitability goals and strategies.
Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on annual bids submitted to CMS. We base the commercial and Medicaid premiums
we charge and our Medicare bids on our estimates of future medical costs over the fixed contract period. In applying our pricing to
each employer group and customer, we aim to maintain consistent, competitive, disciplined underwriting standards. We employ our
proprietary accumulated actuarial and financial data to determine underwriting and pricing parameters for both our fully-insured
and self-funded businesses.
In most circumstances, our pricing and underwriting decisions follow a prospective rating process in which a fixed premium is
determined at the beginning of the contract period. For our fully-insured business, any deviation, favorable or unfavorable, from the
medical costs assumed in determining the premium is our responsibility. Some of our larger groups employ retrospective rating
reviews, where positive experience is partially refunded to the group, and negative experience is charged against a rate stabilization
fund established from the group’s favorable experience or charged against future favorable experience.
BCBSA Licenses
We are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA that entitle us to the exclusive, and in certain areas, non-exclusive use of
the Blue Cross and Blue Shield names and marks in assigned geographic territories. BCBSA is a national trade association of Blue
Cross and Blue Shield licensees, the primary function of which is to promote and preserve the integrity of the BCBS names and
marks, as well as provide certain coordination among the member companies. Each BCBSA licensee is an independent legal
organization and is not responsible for obligations of other BCBSA member organizations. We have no right to market products and
services using the BCBS names and marks outside of the states in which we are licensed to sell BCBS products. We are required to
pay an annual license fee to the BCBSA based on enrollment and also to comply with various operational, governance and financial
standards set forth in the licenses.
We believe that we and our licensed affiliates are currently in compliance with these standards. The standards under the license
agreements may be modified in certain instances by the BCBSA. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form
10-K for additional details of our licensing requirements and the impact if we were not to comply with these license agreements.
-16-
Regulation 
General
Our operations are subject to comprehensive and detailed state, federal and international regulation throughout the jurisdictions
in which we do business. These laws and regulations, which can vary significantly from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, restrict how we
conduct our businesses and result in additional burdens and costs to us. Further, federal and state laws and regulations are subject to
amendments and changing interpretations in each jurisdiction. The application of these complex legal and regulatory requirements
to the detailed operation of our businesses creates areas of uncertainty. In addition, there are numerous proposed healthcare laws
and regulations at the federal and state levels, including single payer, Medicare for All and public option proposals, some of which
could materially adversely affect our businesses if they were to be enacted.
Supervisory agencies, including federal and state regulators and departments of health, insurance and corporation, have broad
authority to:
•grant, suspend and revoke licenses to transact business;
•regulate our products and services in great detail;
•regulate, limit, or suspend our ability to market products, including the exclusion of our plans from participating on public
exchanges;
•retroactively adjust premium rates;
•monitor our solvency and reserve adequacy;
•scrutinize our investment activities on the basis of quality, diversification and other quantitative criteria; and
•impose monetary and criminal sanctions for non-compliance with regulatory requirements.
To carry out these tasks, these government entities periodically examine our operations and accounts.
The health benefits business also may be adversely impacted by court and regulatory decisions that expand or invalidate the
interpretations of existing statutes and regulations. It is uncertain whether we can recoup, through higher premiums or other
measures, the increased costs of mandated benefits or other increased costs caused by potential legislation, regulation or court
rulings. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
State Regulation of Insurance Companies and HMOs
Our insurance and HMO subsidiaries must obtain a certificate of authority and maintain that license in the jurisdictions in
which they conduct business. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or NAIC, has adopted model regulations that,
where adopted by states, require expanded governance practices, risk and solvency assessment reporting and the filing of periodic
financial and operating reports. Most states have adopted these or similar measures to expand the scope of regulations relating to
corporate governance and internal control activities of HMOs and insurance companies. Health insurers and HMOs are subject to
state examination and periodic license renewal.
In addition, we are regulated as an insurance holding company and are subject to the insurance holding company acts of the
states in which our insurance company and HMO subsidiaries are domiciled. These acts contain certain reporting requirements, as
well as restrictions on transactions between an insurer or HMO and its affiliates, and may restrict the ability of our regulated
subsidiaries to pay dividends to our holding companies. These holding company laws and regulations generally require registration
with applicable state departments of insurance and the filing of reports describing capital structure, ownership, financial condition,
certain intercompany transactions, enterprise risks, corporate governance and general business operations. In addition, state
insurance holding company laws and regulations require notice or prior regulatory approval of transactions including acquisitions,
material intercompany transfers of assets, guarantees and other transactions between the regulated companies and their affiliates,
including parent holding companies. Applicable state insurance holding company acts also restrict the ability of any person to
obtain control of an insurance company or HMO without prior regulatory approval. “Control” is generally defined as the direct or
indirect power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person and is presumed to exist if a person
directly or indirectly owns or
-17-
controls 10% or more of the voting securities of another person. Dispositions of control generally are also regulated under the state
insurance holding company acts.
The states of domicile of our regulated subsidiaries have statutory risk-based capital, or RBC, requirements for health and
other insurance companies and HMOs based on the Risk-Based Capital (RBC) For Health Organizations Model Act. These RBC
requirements are intended to assess the capital adequacy of life and health insurers and HMOs, taking into account the risk
characteristics of a company’s investments and products. In general, under these laws, an insurance company or HMO must submit
a report of its RBC level to the insurance department or insurance commissioner of its state of domicile for each calendar year. The
law requires increasing degrees of regulatory oversight and intervention as a company’s RBC declines. As of December 31, 2019,
the RBC levels of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries exceeded all applicable mandatory RBC requirements. For more
information on RBC capital and additional liquidity and capital requirements for a licensee of the BCBSA, see “Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations–Liquidity and Capital Resources–Risk-Based Capital,”
included in Part II, Item 7 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Ongoing Requirements and Changes Stemming from the ACA
The ACA significantly changed the United States healthcare system. While we anticipate continued efforts to invalidate,
modify, repeal or replace the ACA, either through Congress or court challenges, we expect the major portions of the ACA to remain
in place and continue to significantly impact our business operations and results of operations, including pricing, minimum medical
loss ratios, or MLRs, and the geographies in which our products are available.
The ACA prohibits lifetime limits, certain annual limits, member cost-sharing on specified preventive benefits and pre-existing
condition exclusions. Further, the ACA implemented certain requirements for insurers, including changes to Medicare Advantage
payments and the minimum MLR provision that requires insurers to pay rebates to customers when insurers do not meet or exceed
the specified MLR thresholds. In addition, the ACA also required a number of other changes with significant effects on both federal
and state health insurance markets, including strict rules on how health insurance is rated, what benefits must be offered, the
assessment of new taxes and fees (including annual fees on health insurance companies), the creation of public exchanges for
Individuals and Small Groups, the availability of premium subsidies for qualified individuals, and expansions in eligibility for
Medicaid. Changes to our business environment are likely to continue as elected officials at the national and state levels continue to
enact, and both elected officials and candidates for election continue to propose, significant modifications to existing laws and
regulations, including changes to taxes and fees. Also, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including the 2018 ACA Decision,
which judgment has been stayed pending appeal, could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
In general, the Individual market risk pool that includes public exchange markets has become less healthy since its inception in
2014 and continues to exhibit risk volatility. Based on our experience in public exchange markets to date, we have made
adjustments to our premium rates and participation footprint, and we will continue to evaluate the performance of our public
exchange plans going forward. In addition, insurers have faced uncertainties related to federal government funding for various ACA
programs. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations if premiums are not adequate or do not
appropriately reflect the acuity of these individuals. Any variation from our expectations regarding acuity, enrollment levels,
adverse selection, or other assumptions utilized in setting premium rates could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial position, and cash flows.
Further, implementation of the ACA brings with it significant oversight responsibilities by health insurers that may result in
increased governmental audits, increased assertions of False Claims Act violations, and an increased risk of other litigation.
-18-
Federal regulatory agencies continue to modify regulations and guidance related to the ACA and markets more broadly. Some
of the more significant ACA rules are described below:
•The minimum MLR thresholds by line of business for the Commercial market, as defined by HHS, are as follows:
Line of Business  %
Large Group  85
Small Group  80
Individual  80
New York state regulations require us to meet a more restrictive MLR threshold of 82% for both Small Group and
Individual lines of business. The minimum MLR thresholds disclosed above are based on definitions of an MLR
calculation provided by HHS, or specific states, as applicable, and differ from our calculation of “benefit expense ratio”
based on premium revenue and benefit expense as reported in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles, or GAAP. Furthermore, the definitions of the lines of business differ under the various federal and state
regulations and may not correspond to our lines of business. Definitions under the MLR regulation also impact insurers
differently depending upon their organizational structure or tax status, which could result in a competitive advantage to
some insurance providers that may not be available to us, resulting in an uneven playing field in the industry.
The ACA also imposed a separate minimum MLR threshold of 85% for Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D
prescription drug plans, or Medicare Part D plans. Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D plans that do not meet this
threshold will have to pay a minimum MLR rebate. If a plan’s MLR is below 85% for three consecutive years beginning
with 2014, enrollment will be restricted. A Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D plan contract will be terminated if the
plan’s MLR is below 85% for five consecutive years.
In addition, state Medicaid programs are required to set managed care capitation rates such that a minimum 85% MLR is
projected to be achieved; however, states are not required to collect remittances if the minimum MLR is not achieved.
Approximately 58.9% and 20.8% of our premium revenue and medical membership, respectively, were subject to the
minimum MLR regulations as of and for the year ended December 31, 2019. Approximately 58.7% and 22.0% of our
premium revenue and medical membership, respectively, were subject to the minimum MLR regulations as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2018.
•The ACA created an incentive payment program for Medicare Advantage plans. CMS developed the Medicare Advantage
Star ratings system, which awards between 1.0 and 5.0 stars to Medicare Advantage plans based on performance in several
categories, including quality of care and customer service. The Star ratings are used by CMS to award quality-based bonus
payments to plans that receive a rating of 4.0 or higher. The methodology and measures included in the Star ratings system
can be modified by CMS annually. As of December 31, 2019, all of our Medicare Advantage plans have received a rating
of 3.0 or higher.
•Regulations require premium rate increases to be reviewed for Small Group and Individual products above specified
thresholds, 15% for 2019 and 2020, and may be adjusted from time to time. The regulations provide for state insurance
regulators to conduct the reviews, except for cases where a state does not have an “effective” rate review program or in
federal enforcement states, in which cases HHS will conduct the reviews for any rate increase.
•Prior to the implementation of the ACA, health insurers were permitted to use differential pricing, commonly referred to as
“rating bands,” based on factors such as health status, gender and age. The ACA precludes health insurers from using
health status and gender in the determination of the insurance premium. In addition, rating bands for age cannot vary by
more than 3 to 1, and rating bands for tobacco use cannot vary by more than 1.5 to 1. The ongoing use of the 3 to 1 rating
bands may have a significant impact on the majority of Individual and Small Group customers and could lead to adverse
selection in the market as well as increased variability in projecting future premiums for those customer markets.
-19-
•The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee, or HIP Fee, on health insurers that write certain types of
health insurance on U.S. risks, which has been permanently repealed effective January 1, 2021. The annual HIP Fee is
allocated to health insurers based on the ratio of the amount of an insurer’s net premium revenues written during the
preceding calendar year to the amount of health insurance premium for all U.S. health risk for those certain lines of
business written during the preceding calendar year. We record our estimated liability for the HIP Fee in full at the
beginning of the year with a corresponding deferred asset that is amortized on a straight-line basis to selling, general and
administrative expense. The final calculation and payment of the annual HIP Fee is due by September 30th of each fee
year. The HIP Fee is non-deductible for federal income tax purposes. Our affected products are priced to cover the
increased selling, general and administrative and income tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee. The total amount due
from allocations to health insurers was $14.3 billion for 2018 and was suspended for 2019. The HIP Fee has resumed and
increased to $15.5 billion for 2020 and has been permanently eliminated beginning in 2021.
•Medicare Advantage reimbursement rates will not increase as much as they would otherwise due to the payment formula
promulgated by the ACA that continues to impact reimbursements. We also expect further and ongoing regulatory
guidance on a number of issues related to Medicare, including evolving methodology for ratings and quality bonus
payments. CMS is also proposing changes to its program that audits data submitted under the risk adjustment programs in
a way that would increase financial recoveries from plans.
Drug Benefit and Pharmacy Benefit Manager Regulation
Pharmacy benefit managers are regulated at both the federal and state levels and must comply with federal and state statutes
and regulations governing labeling, packaging, advertising and adulteration of prescription drugs, dispensing of controlled
substances, and licensing. In recent years the federal government has banned certain business practices, including “gag clauses,”
which prohibited pharmacists from informing patients when a lower cost drug was available as a substitute, and “clawbacks,”
which occurred when pharmacy benefit managers sought to recoup the difference between the reimbursed cost of the drug and the
patient’s copay and the drug itself was less expensive than the copay paid by the patient. Regulation in the states varies
dramatically and ranges from licensure of PBMs as third-party administrators, licensure specifically as a pharmacy benefit
manager, and licensure accompanied by additional disclosures and limitations of business practices to varying degrees. The NAIC
is working on a PBM model law that, if adopted widely, could result in a more standardized approach to PBM regulation in the
states in the future.
A number of proposals are being considered at the federal and state levels that would increase regulation of drug benefits and
pharmacy benefit managers. Such proposals under consideration include (1) regulation of rebates from drug manufacturers that
would require rebate dollars to be applied at the point-of-sale, (2) federal policy changes to set the prices for a subset of drugs
covered under the Medicare program, (3) reforms to the Medicare drug benefit, such as beneficiary cost-sharing changes that aim
to lower consumer costs, and (4) attempts at both the federal and state levels to ban the use of spread pricing contracts in both the
Commercial and Medicaid markets. These reforms have the potential to have broad impacts on our PBM business and could
materially adversely affect our business if they are enacted.
Privacy, Confidentiality and Data Standards Regulation
The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, or HIPAA, and the administrative simplification
provisions of HIPAA impose a number of requirements on covered entities (including insurers, HMOs, group health plans,
providers and clearinghouses) and their business associates relating to the use, disclosure and safeguarding of protected health
information. These requirements include uniform standards of common electronic healthcare transactions; privacy and security
regulations; and unique identifier rules for employers, health plans and providers.
Also, the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health, or HITECH, Act provisions of the American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and corresponding implementing regulations have imposed additional requirements on the
use and disclosure of protected health information such as additional breach notification and reporting requirements, contracting
requirements for HIPAA business associate agreements, strengthened enforcement mechanisms and increased penalties for HIPAA
violations. Federal consumer protection laws may also apply in some instances to privacy and security practices related to
personally identifiable information.
-20-
The federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act generally places restrictions on the disclosure of non-public information to non-affiliated
third parties, and requires financial institutions, including insurers, to provide customers with notice regarding how their non-public
personal information is used, including an opportunity to “opt out” of certain disclosures. State departments of insurance and
certain federal agencies adopted implementing regulations as required by federal law.
The Cybersecurity Information Sharing Act of 2015 encourages organizations to share cyber threat indicators with the federal
government and, among other things, directed HHS to develop a set of voluntary cybersecurity best practices for organizations in
the health care industry.
In addition, public exchanges are required to adhere to privacy and security standards with respect to personally identifiable
information and to impose privacy and security standards that are at least as protective as those the public exchange has
implemented for itself on insurers offering plans through the public exchanges and their designated downstream entities, including
pharmacy benefit mangers and other business associates. These standards may differ from, and be more stringent than, HIPAA.
Furthermore, states have begun enacting more comprehensive privacy laws and regulations addressing consumer rights to data
protection or transparency that may affect our privacy and security practices, such as state laws like the California Consumer
Privacy Act that govern the use, disclosure and protection of member data and impose additional breach notification requirements.
State consumer protection laws may also apply to privacy and security practices related to personally identifiable information,
including information related to consumers and care providers. Complying with conflicting cybersecurity regulations and varying
enforcement philosophies, which may differ from state to state, requires significant resources and may materially and adversely
affect our ability to standardize our products and services across state lines.
Federal regulation has also been proposed in the following areas that could materially impact our operations if finalized:
•Federal regulations on data interoperability that would require claims data to be made available to third parties unaffiliated
with Anthem; and
•Federal regulations requiring hospitals and health insurers to publish negotiated prices for services.
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
The provision of services to certain employee welfare benefit plans is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974, as amended, or ERISA, a complex set of laws and regulations subject to interpretation and enforcement by the Internal
Revenue Service and the Department of Labor. ERISA regulates certain aspects of the relationships between us, the employers that
maintain employee welfare benefit plans subject to ERISA and participants in such plans. Some of our administrative services and
other activities may also be subject to regulation under ERISA. In addition, certain states require licensure or registration of
companies providing third-party claims administration services for benefit plans. We provide a variety of products and services to
employee welfare benefit plans that are covered by ERISA. Plans subject to ERISA can also be subject to state laws, and the
question of whether and to what extent ERISA preempts a state law has been, and will continue to be, interpreted by many courts.
Guaranty Fund Assessments
Under insolvency or guaranty association laws in most states, insurance companies and HMOs can be assessed for amounts
paid by guaranty funds for policyholder losses incurred when an insurance company or HMO becomes insolvent. Most state
insolvency or guaranty association laws currently provide for assessments based upon the amount of premiums received on
insurance underwritten within such state (with a minimum amount payable even if no premium is received). Under many of these
guaranty association laws, assessments are made retrospectively. Some states permit insurers or HMOs to recover assessments paid
through full or partial premium tax offsets or through future policyholder surcharges. The amount and timing of any future
assessments cannot be predicted with certainty; however, future assessments are likely to occur.
Employees
At December 31, 2019, we had approximately 70,600 employees. Our employees are an important asset, and we seek to
develop them to their full potential. We believe that our relationship with our employees is good.
-21-
Available Information
We are a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or the Exchange
Act) and are required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S-K, to provide certain information regarding our website and the
availability of certain documents filed with or furnished to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, or SEC. Our website is
www.antheminc.com. We have included our website address throughout this Annual Report on Form 10-K as a textual reference
only. The information contained on, or accessible through, our website is not incorporated into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We make available, free of charge, by mail or through our website, our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form
10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the
Exchange Act as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with or furnish it to the SEC. We also
include on our website our Corporate Governance Guidelines, our Code of Conduct and the charter of each standing committee of
our Board of Directors. In addition, we intend to disclose on our website any amendments to, or waivers from, our Code of
Conduct that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the SEC and the New York Stock Exchange, or NYSE.
Anthem, Inc. is an Indiana corporation incorporated on July 17, 2001.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS.
The following is a description of significant factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those contained
in forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and presented elsewhere by management from time to
time. Such factors may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations, and you should
carefully consider them and not place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements. It is not possible to predict or identify all
such factors. Consequently, you should not consider any such list to be a complete statement of all our potential risks or
uncertainties. Because of these and other factors, past performance should not be considered an indication of future performance.
If we fail to appropriately predict, price for and manage healthcare costs, the profitability of our products could decline,
which could materially adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Our profitability depends in large part on accurately predicting and pricing healthcare costs and on our ability to manage future
healthcare costs through medical management, product design, negotiation of favorable provider contracts and underwriting
criteria. Total healthcare costs are affected by the number of individual services rendered, the cost of each service and the type of
service rendered. Numerous factors affecting the cost of healthcare may adversely affect our ability to predict and manage
healthcare costs, as well as our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. These factors include, among
others, changes in healthcare practices, demographic characteristics including the aging population, medical cost inflation, the
introduction of new technologies, drugs and treatments, increased cost of individual services, increases in the cost and number of
prescription drugs, clusters of high cost cases, increased use of services, including due to natural catastrophes or other large-scale
medical emergencies or epidemics, and new treatment guidelines, new mandated benefits (such as the expansion of essential
benefits coverage) or changes to other regulations impacting our business. Relatively small differences between predicted and
actual medical costs or utilization rates as a percentage of revenues can result in significant changes in our financial results.
Generally, our premiums on Commercial policies and Medicaid contracts are fixed for a 12-month period and are determined
several months prior to the commencement of the premium period. Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on bids submitted to
CMS six months prior to the start of the contract year. Accordingly, the costs we incur in excess of our benefit cost projections
generally are not recovered in the contract year through higher premiums. Existing Medicaid contract rates are often established by
the applicable state, and our actual costs may exceed those rates. Although we base our Commercial premiums and our Medicare
and Medicaid bids, and our acceptance of state-established Medicaid rates on our estimates of future medical costs over the fixed
contract period, many factors, including those discussed above, may cause actual costs to exceed those estimated and reflected in
premiums and bids.
Relatively small differences between predicted and actual healthcare costs as a percentage of premium revenues can result in
significant changes in our results of operations. Although federal and state premium and risk adjustment mechanisms could help
offset healthcare benefit costs in excess of our projections if our assumptions (including assumptions for
-22-
government premium and risk adjustment payments) utilized in setting our premium rates are significantly different than actual
results, our income statement and financial condition could still be adversely affected.
In addition to the challenge of managing healthcare costs, we face pressure to contain premium rates. Our customers may
renegotiate their contracts to seek to contain their costs or may move to a competitor to obtain more favorable premiums. Further,
federal and state regulatory agencies may restrict or prevent entirely our ability to implement changes in premium rates. For
example, we must submit data on all proposed rate increases to HHS for monitoring purposes on many of our products. In addition,
the ACA includes an annual rate review requirement to prohibit unreasonable rate increases, and our plans may be excluded from
participating in the public exchanges if they are deemed to have a history of “unreasonable” rate increases. A limitation on our
ability to increase or maintain our premium or reimbursement levels or a significant loss of membership resulting from our need to
increase or maintain premium or reimbursement levels could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations.
In addition, the reserves that we establish for health insurance policy benefits and other contractual rights and benefits are
based upon assumptions concerning a number of factors, including trends in healthcare costs, expenses, general economic
conditions and other factors. To the extent the actual claims experience is unfavorable as compared to our underlying assumptions,
our incurred losses would increase and future earnings could be adversely affected.
We are subject to significant government regulation, and changes or proposed changes in the regulation of our business by
federal and state regulators may adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition, results of operations and the
market price of our securities.
We are subject to significant state and federal regulation associated with many aspects of our business, including, but not
limited to, licensing, premiums, marketing activities, provider contracting, access and payment standards, and corporate governance
and financial reporting matters. In addition, IngenioRx is also subject to an increasing number of licensure, registration and other
laws and accreditation standards that impact the business practices of a pharmacy benefit manager. We must identify, assess and
respond to new laws and regulations, as well as comply with the various existing laws and regulations applicable to our business.
Further, the integration into our business of entities that we acquire, or the expansion of our business into new areas, may affect the
way in which existing laws and rules apply to us, including by subjecting us to laws and rules that did not previously apply to us.
Changes in existing laws, rules and regulatory interpretation or future laws, rules, regulatory interpretations or judgments could
force us to change how we conduct our business, affect the products we offer (and where we offer them), restrict revenue and
enrollment growth, increase our costs, including operating, healthcare technology and administrative costs, restrict our ability to
obtain new product approvals and implement changes in premium rates and require enhancements to our compliance infrastructure
and internal controls environment, which could adversely impact our business and results of operations. In addition, legislative
and/or regulatory policies or proposals that seek to manage the healthcare industry or otherwise impact our business may cause the
market price of our securities to decrease, even if such policies or proposals never become effective.
Our insurance, managed healthcare and HMO subsidiaries are subject to extensive regulation and supervision by regulatory
authorities and agencies in each state in which they are licensed or authorized to do business, in addition to regulation by federal
agencies. We are required to obtain and maintain insurance and other regulatory approvals to market certain of our products, to
increase prices for certain regulated products and to consummate some of our acquisitions and dispositions. Delays in obtaining or
failure to obtain or maintain these approvals, as well as future regulatory action by state or federal authorities could have a material
adverse effect on the profitability or marketability of our health benefits or managed care products or on our business, financial
condition and results of operations.
In addition, because of our participation in government-sponsored programs such as Medicare and Medicaid, many of our
subsidiaries are also subject to regulation by CMS and state Medicaid agencies, and to changes in government regulations or policy
with respect to, among other things, reimbursement levels, eligibility requirements, benefit coverage requirements and additional
governmental participation, which could also adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
In addition, under insolvency or guaranty association laws in most states, insurance companies can be assessed for certain
obligations to policyholders and claimants of impaired or insolvent insurance companies. Some states have similar
-23-
laws relating to HMOs and other payers such as consumer operated and oriented plans (co-ops) established under the ACA. The
NAIC has amended the Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Model Act, or NAIC Model Act, to expand the assessment
base for long-term care products and to add HMOs as members. We have experienced assessments in the past, and may experience
assessments in the future as a result of other companies that fail to establish premiums sufficient to cover their costs. If the
amended NAIC Model Act is adopted by the states, these changes could impact our assessments. Any such assessment could
expose us to the risk of paying a portion of an impaired or insolvent insurance company’s claims through state guaranty
associations. We are not currently able to estimate our potential financial obligations, losses, or the availability of potential offsets
associated with potential guaranty association assessments; however, any significant increase in guaranty association assessments
could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We expect state legislatures will continue to focus on healthcare delivery and financing issues. State ballot initiatives can also
be put to voters that would substantially impair our operating environment. Most states are very focused on how to manage and
reduce their budgets and are exploring ways to mitigate cost increases. As such, some states have acted to reduce or limit increases
to premium payments. Others have enacted, or are contemplating, significant reform of their health insurance markets to include
provisions affecting both public programs and privately-financed health insurance arrangements. If enacted into law, these state
proposals could have a material adverse impact on our business, cash flows, operations or financial condition.
A number of states in which we offer Medicaid products have not opted for Medicaid expansion under the ACA, at least for the
present time, and states frequently review public program eligibility. Where states make changes to reduce eligibility, we could
experience reduced Medicaid enrollment and reduced growth opportunities. If future modifications to laws and regulations at the
federal or state level result in reduced public enrollment, this could negatively impact our Medicaid business.
Additionally, from time to time, Congress has considered, and may consider in the future, various forms of managed care
reform legislation which, if adopted, could fundamentally alter the treatment of coverage decisions under ERISA. There have been
legislative attempts to limit ERISA’s preemptive effect on state laws and litigants’ ability to seek damages beyond the benefits
offered under their plans. If adopted, such limitations could increase our liability exposure, could permit greater state regulation of
our operations, and could expand the scope of damages, including punitive damages, litigants could be awarded. While we cannot
predict if any of these initiatives will ultimately become effective or, if enacted, what their terms will be, their enactment could
increase our costs, expose us to expanded liability or require us to revise the ways in which we conduct business.
The ongoing changes to the ACA and related laws and regulations could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
The ongoing changes in federal and state laws and regulations stemming from the ACA, including the steps that have been
taken to amend, repeal and limit the scope and application of the ACA, continue to represent significant challenges to the U.S.
healthcare system. We are unable to predict how these events will ultimately be resolved and what the potential impact may be on
our business, including, but not limited to, our products, services, processes and technology, and on our relationships with current
and future customers and healthcare providers. The legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal district court decision
invalidating the ACA in its entirety, which judgment has been stayed pending appeal, continue to contribute to this uncertainty,
which could significantly impact the market for our products, the regulations applicable to us and the fees and taxes payable by us.
In addition, the ACA imposes significant fees, assessments and taxes on us and other health insurers, health plans and other
industry participants, including the annual non-tax deductible HIP Fee; however, the HIP Fee has been permanently repealed
beginning January 1, 2021. Further regulations and modifications to the ACA at the federal or state level, including any judicial
invalidation of the ACA, could have significant effects on our business and future operations, some of which may adversely affect
our results of operations and financial condition.
In general, the risk pool for the Individual market, which includes public exchange markets, has become less healthy since its
inception in 2014. In addition, insurers have faced uncertainties related to federal government funding for various ACA programs.
Based on our experience in public exchange markets to date, we have made adjustments to our premium rates and geographic
participation, and will continue to evaluate the performance of our public exchange plans, the future viability of the public
exchanges and availability of federal subsidies, and may make further adjustments to our rates and
-24-
participation going forward. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations if premiums are not
adequate or do not appropriately reflect the acuity of these individuals. Any variation from our expectations regarding acuity,
enrollment levels, adverse selection, or other assumptions utilized in setting premium rates could have a material adverse effect on
our results of operations, financial position, and cash flows.
For additional information related to the ACA, see Part I, Item 1 “Business” and Part II, Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
If we fail to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with hospitals, physicians, pharmacy benefit service providers
and other healthcare providers, our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations may be adversely
affected.
Our profitability is also dependent in part upon our ability to contract on favorable terms with hospitals, physicians, PBM
service providers and other healthcare providers. Physicians, hospitals and other healthcare providers may elect not to contract with
us, and the failure to secure or maintain cost-effective healthcare provider contracts on competitive terms may result in a loss of
membership or higher medical costs, which could adversely affect our business. In addition, consolidation among healthcare
providers, ACO practice management companies, which aggregate physician practices for administrative efficiency and marketing
leverage, and other organizational structures that physicians, hospitals and other care providers choose, as well as the ability of
larger employers to contract directly with providers, may change the way that these providers interact with us and may change the
competitive landscape. Such organizations or groups of physicians may compete directly with us, which may impact our
relationship with these providers or affect the way that we price our products and estimate our costs and may require us to incur
costs to change our operations, which could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Our inability to contract with providers, or if providers attempt to use their market position to negotiate more favorable
contracts or place us at a competitive disadvantage, or the inability of providers to provide adequate care, could adversely affect our
business. In addition, we do not have contracts with all providers that render services to our members and, as a result, may not have
a pre-established agreement about the amount of compensation those out-of-network providers will accept for the services they
render, which can result in significant litigation or arbitration proceedings, or provider attempts to obtain payment from our
members for the difference between the amount we have paid and the amount they have charged.
We face competition in many of our markets, and if we fail to adequately adapt to changes in our industry and develop and
implement strategic growth opportunities, our ability to compete and grow may be adversely affected.
As a health benefits company, we operate in a highly competitive environment and in an industry that is subject to significant
changes from legislative reform, business consolidations, new strategic alliances, new market entrants, aggressive marketing
practices by other health benefits organizations and technological advancements. These factors have produced and will likely
continue to produce, significant pressures on our profitability. Furthermore, decisions to buy our products and services are
increasingly made or influenced by consumers, through means such as direct purchasing (for example, Medicare Advantage plans)
and insurance exchanges that allow individual choice, or by large employers that may increasingly have the ability to contract
directly with providers. This creates unique market pressures, and in order to compete effectively in the consumer-driven
marketplace, we will be required to develop and deliver innovative and potentially disruptive products and services to satisfy
evolving market demands.
In addition, the PBM industry is highly competitive, and IngenioRx is subject to competition from national, regional and local
PBMs, insurers, health plans, large retail pharmacy chains, large retail stores, supermarkets, other mail order pharmacies, web
pharmacies and specialty pharmacies. Strong competition within the pharmacy benefit business has generated greater demand for
lower product and service pricing, increased revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings. Our inability to maintain
positive trends, contract on favorable terms with pharmaceutical manufacturers for, among other things, rebates, discounts and
administrative fees or a failure to identify and implement new ways to mitigate pricing pressures, could negatively impact our
ability to attract or retain customers, negatively impact our margins and have a material adverse effect on our business and results
of operations.
Furthermore, as a result of changes to traditional health insurance over the past several years, the health insurance industry has
experienced a significant shift in membership to products with lower margins. In order to profitably grow our
-25-
business in the future, we need to not only grow our profitable medical membership, but also continue to diversify our sources of
revenue and earnings, including through the increased sale of our specialty products, such as dental, vision and other supplemental
products, expansion of our non-insurance assets and establishment of new cost of care solutions, including innovations in PBM
services. If we are unable to acquire or develop and successfully manage new opportunities that further our strategic objectives and
differentiate our products from our competitors, our ability to profitably grow our business could be adversely affected.
We also will have to respond to pricing and other actions taken by existing competitors and potentially disruptive new entrants.
Also, due to the price transparency provided by public exchanges and new market entrants, we face competitive pressures from
new and existing competitors in the market for Individual health insurance. These risks may be enhanced if employers shift to
defined contribution healthcare benefits plans and make greater utilization of private insurance exchanges or encourage their
employees to purchase health insurance on the public exchanges. We can provide no assurance that we will be able to compete
successfully on these exchanges or that we will be able to benefit from any opportunities presented by such exchanges. If we are
not competitive on these exchanges or are unsuccessful in reducing our cost structure, our future growth and profitability may be
adversely impacted.
We are currently dependent on the non-exclusive services of independent agents and brokers in the marketing of our healthcare
products, particularly with respect to individuals, seniors and small employer group customers. We face intense competition for the
services and allegiance of these independent agents and brokers, who may also market the products of our competitors. Our
relationship with our brokers and independent agents could be adversely impacted by changes in our business practices to address
legislative changes, including potential reductions in commissions and consulting fees paid to agents and brokers. We cannot ensure
that we will be able to compete successfully against current and future competitors for these services or that competitive pressures
faced by us will not materially and adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
A significant reduction in the enrollment in our health benefits or PBM products or services, particularly in states where we
have large regional concentrations, could have an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results
of operations.
A significant reduction in the number of enrollees in our health benefits or PBM products or services could adversely affect our
business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. Factors that could contribute to a reduction in enrollment
include: reductions in workforce by existing customers; a general economic upturn that results in fewer individuals being eligible
for Medicaid programs; a general economic downturn that results in business failures and high unemployment rates; employers no
longer offering certain healthcare coverage as an employee benefit or electing to offer coverage on a voluntary, employee-funded
basis; participation on public exchanges; federal and state regulatory changes, including the elimination of the individual mandate
penalty in the ACA; failure to obtain new customers or retain existing customers; premium increases and benefit changes; our exit
from a specific market; negative publicity and news coverage; and failure to attain or maintain nationally recognized accreditations.
The states in which we operate that have the largest concentrations of revenues include California, Florida, Georgia, Indiana,
New York, Ohio, Texas and Virginia. Due to this concentration of business in these states, we are exposed to potential losses
resulting from the risk of state-specific or regional economic downturns impacting these states. If any such negative economic
conditions do not improve, we may experience a reduction in existing and new business, which could have a material adverse effect
on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
A cyber attack or other privacy or data security incident could result in an unauthorized disclosure of sensitive or
confidential information, cause a loss of data, disrupt a large amount of our operations, give rise to remediation or other
expenses, expose us to liability under federal and state laws, and subject us to litigation and investigations, which could have
an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
As part of our normal operations, we collect, process and retain certain sensitive and confidential information. We are subject
to various federal, state and international laws and rules regarding the use and disclosure of certain sensitive or confidential
information, including HIPAA, the HITECH Act, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and numerous state laws governing personal
information, including the California Consumer Privacy Act. Our facilities and systems, and those of our
-26-
third-party service providers, are regularly the target of, and may be vulnerable to, cyber attacks, security breaches, acts of
vandalism, computer viruses, misplaced or lost data, programming and/or human errors or other threats.
We were the target of an external cyber attack in 2015 and have been, and will likely continue to be, the target of other
attempted cyber attacks and security threats. In the event of such a cyber attack in the future, we may be subject to litigation and
governmental investigations which could divert the attention of management from the operation of our business, result in
reputational damage and have a material adverse impact on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
While we have contingency plans and insurance coverage for potential liabilities of this nature, they may not be sufficient to cover
all claims and liabilities.
We cannot ensure that we will be able to identify, prevent or contain the effects of cyber attacks or other cybersecurity risks
that bypass our security measures or disrupt our information technology systems or business. We have security technologies,
processes and procedures in place to protect against cybersecurity risks and security breaches. However, hardware, software or
applications we develop or procure from third parties may contain defects in design, manufacturer defects or other problems that
could unexpectedly compromise information security. In addition, because the techniques used to obtain unauthorized access,
disable or degrade service or sabotage systems change frequently, are becoming increasingly sophisticated, and may not
immediately produce signs of intrusion, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques, timely discover or counter them or
implement adequate preventative measures. Viruses, worms or other malicious software programs may be used to attack our
systems or otherwise exploit any security vulnerabilities, and such security attacks may cause system disruptions or shutdowns, or
may cause personal information or proprietary or confidential information to be misappropriated or compromised. As a result,
cybersecurity and the continued development and enhancement of our controls, processes and practices designed to protect our
systems, computers, software, data and networks from attack, damage and unauthorized access remain a priority for us.
In addition, we use third-party technology, systems and services for a variety of reasons, including, without limitation,
encryption and authentication technology, employee email, content delivery to customers, back-office support, and other functions
that in some cases involve processing, storing and transmitting large amounts of data for our business. Although we have developed
systems and processes that are designed to reduce the impact of a security breach at a third-party vendor, such measures cannot
provide absolute security, and these third-party providers may also experience security breaches or interruptions to their
information technology hardware and software infrastructure and communications systems that could adversely impact us.
Noncompliance with any privacy or security laws and regulations, or any security breach, cyber attack or cybersecurity breach,
and any incident involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized disclosure or use of, or access to, sensitive or
confidential member information, whether by us or by one of our third-party service providers, could require us to expend
significant resources to continue to modify or enhance our protective measures and to remediate any damage. In addition, this could
negatively affect our operations, cause system disruptions, damage our reputation, cause membership losses and contract breaches,
and could also result in regulatory enforcement actions, material fines and penalties, litigation or other actions that could have a
material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
There are various risks associated with participating in Medicaid and Medicare programs, including dependence upon
government funding and the timing of payments, compliance with government contracts and increased regulatory
oversight.
We contract with various federal and state agencies, including CMS, to provide managed healthcare services, such as Medicare
Advantage, Medicare Part D, Medicare Supplement, Medicaid, TANF, SPD, LTSS, CHIP, ACA-related Medicaid expansion
programs and various specialty programs. We also provide various administrative services for several other entities offering
medical and/or prescription drug plans to their Medicaid or Medicare eligible members through our affiliated companies, and we
offer employer group waiver plans which provide medical and/or prescription drug coverage to retirees. We are also participating in
programs in several states for the care of dual-eligible members. These programs have been the subject of ongoing regulatory
reform initiatives, and it is difficult to predict the impact of these and potential future regulatory reforms on our Government
Business segment. Regulatory reform initiatives or additional changes in existing laws or regulations, or their interpretations, could
have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
-27-
Revenues from the Medicare and Medicaid programs are dependent, in whole or in part, upon annual funding from the federal
government and/or applicable state governments. The base premium rate paid by each state or federal agency differs depending
upon a combination of various factors such as defined upper payment limits, a member’s health status, age, gender, county or
region, benefit mix, member eligibility category and risk scores. Future Medicare and Medicaid rates may be affected by continued
government efforts to contain costs as well as federal and state budgetary constraints. Additionally, ongoing CMS system changes
related to the data it uses to calculate risk scores in the Medicare Advantage program may impact our federal funding. If the federal
government or any state in which we operate were to decrease rates paid to us, pay us less than the amount necessary to keep pace
with our cost trends or seek an adjustment to previously negotiated rates, it could have a material adverse effect on our business,
cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. Further, certain state contracts are subject to cancellation in the event of
the unavailability of state funds. In addition, various states’ MMPs are still subject to uncertainty surrounding payment rates and
other requirements, which could affect where we seek to participate in these programs. An unexpected reduction in payments,
inadequate government funding or significantly delayed payments for these programs may adversely affect our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Other potential risks associated with Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D plans include increased medical or
pharmaceutical costs, data corrections identified as a result of ongoing auditing and monitoring activities, potential uncollectability
of receivables resulting from processing and/or verifying enrollment, inadequacy of underwriting assumptions, inability to receive
and process correct information (including inability due to systems issues by the federal government, the applicable state
government or us), uncollectability of premiums from members, and limited enrollment periods. While we believe we have
adequately reviewed our assumptions and estimates regarding these complex and wide-ranging programs under Medicare
Advantage and Medicare Part D, including those related to collectability of receivables and establishment of liabilities, actual
results may be materially different than our assumptions and estimates and could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition and results of operations. Finally, there is the possibility that the Medicare Advantage program could be
significantly impacted by any future modification, repeal or replacement of the ACA.
Our contracts with CMS and state governmental agencies contain certain provisions regarding data submission, risk
adjustment, provider network maintenance, quality measures, claims payment, encounter data, continuity of care, call center
performance and other requirements specific to federal and state program regulations. We have been subject in the past, and may
again be in the future, to administrative actions, fines, penalties, liquidated damages or retrospective adjustments in payments made
to our health plans as a result of a failure to comply with those requirements, which has impacted and in the future could impact our
profitability. In addition, we could be required to file a corrective plan of action with additional penalties for noncompliance,
including a negative impact on future membership enrollment levels. Further, the majority of our CMS and state Medicaid contracts
are subject to a competitive procurement process. Our existing contracts have not always been renewed, we have not always been
awarded new contracts as a result of the competitive procurement process, and in some cases, we have lost members under existing
contracts as a result of a post-award challenge, each of which could take place again in the future and have a material adverse effect
on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Further, the Medicare Advantage Star rating system utilized by CMS to evaluate Medicare Advantage Plans may have a
significant effect on our revenue, as higher-rated plans tend to experience increased enrollment and plans with a Star rating of 4.0
or higher are eligible for quality-based bonus payments and can market to and enroll members year-round. Our Star ratings may be
negatively impacted if we fail to meet the quality, performance and regulatory compliance criteria established by CMS.
Furthermore, the Star rating system is subject to change annually by CMS, which may make it more difficult to achieve four stars
or greater. If we do not maintain or continue to improve our Star ratings, fail to meet or exceed our competitors’ ratings, or if
quality-based bonus payments are reduced or eliminated, we may experience a negative impact on our revenues and the benefits
that our plans can offer, which could materially and adversely affect the marketability of our plans, our membership levels, results
of operations, financial condition and cash flows. Similarly, a number of state Medicaid programs in which we participate have
implemented performance standards, and if we fail to meet or exceed those standards, we may not receive performance-based
bonus payments or may incur performance-based penalties.
In addition to the contractual requirements affecting our participation in Medicaid and Medicare programs, we are also subject
to various federal and state healthcare laws and regulations, including those directed at preventing fraud, abuse and discrimination
in government-funded programs. Failure to comply with these laws and regulations could result in investigations, litigation, fines,
restrictions on, or exclusions from, program participation, or the imposition of corporate
-28-
integrity agreements or other agreements with a federal or state governmental agency, any of which could adversely impact our
business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We are periodically subject to government audits, including CMS Risk Adjustment Data Validation, or RADV audits, of our
Medicare Advantage Plans to validate diagnostic data, patient claims and financial reporting, as well as audits by the Medicare Part
D Recovery Audit Contractor, or RAC. CMS has recently proposed changing its audits in a way that could increase financial
recoveries from health plans. These audits could result in significant adjustments in payments made to our health plans. In addition
to these federal programs, the states in which we operate Medicaid plans conduct audits, and a number of states have implemented
Medicaid RAC programs which were authorized by the ACA. State RAC programs could increase the number of audits and any
subsequent recoupment by the federal and state governments, which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of
operations. If we fail to report and correct errors discovered through our own auditing procedures or during a CMS, state or RAC
audit, or otherwise fail to comply with applicable laws and regulations, we could be subject to fines, civil penalties or other
sanctions which could have a material adverse effect on our ability to participate in these programs, and on our financial condition,
cash flows and results of operations.
On November 1, 2018, CMS released a proposed rule that would revise its RADV methodology by, among other things,
excluding an adjustment for underlying fee-for-service data errors and extrapolating RADV results at the contract level. If adopted
in its current form, the rule could have a detrimental impact on all Medicare Advantage insurers. While it is uncertain whether CMS
will issue the rule as proposed, if adopted, it could have a material adverse impact on our Medicare business and future results of
operations. In addition to the proposed rule, there has been increased government scrutiny and civil litigation under the False
Claims Act related to risk adjustment practices under the Medicare Advantage program. Government investigations, any
enforcement actions and civil litigation could result in monetary damages, penalties and business practice changes that could have a
material adverse effect on our financial condition, cash flows and results of operations.
Our Medicare and Medicaid contracts are also subject to various MLR rules, including minimum MLR thresholds, rebate
requirements and audits, which could adversely affect our membership and revenues if any of our state Medicare or Medicaid plans
do not meet an applicable minimum MLR thresholds. If a Medicare Advantage, MMP or Medicare Part D contract pays minimum
MLR rebates for three consecutive years, it will become ineligible to participate in open enrollment. If a Medicare Advantage or
Medicare Part D contract pays such rebates for five consecutive years, it will be terminated by CMS.
A change in our healthcare product mix may impact our profitability.
Our healthcare products that involve greater potential risk generally tend to be more profitable than administrative services
products and those healthcare products where the employer groups assume the underwriting risks. Individuals and small employer
groups are more likely to purchase our higher-risk healthcare products because such purchasers are generally unable or unwilling to
bear greater liability for healthcare expenditures. Typically, government-sponsored programs also involve our higher-risk healthcare
products. A shift of enrollees from more profitable products to less profitable products could have a material adverse effect on our
cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We face risks related to litigation.
We are, or may in the future be, a party to a variety of legal actions that may affect our business, such as employment and
employment discrimination-related suits, administrative charges before government agencies, employee benefit claims, breach of
contract actions, tort claims and intellectual property-related litigation. In addition, because of the nature of our business, we are
subject to a variety of legal actions relating to our business operations, including the design, administration and offering of our
products and services. These could include claims relating to the denial or limitation of healthcare benefits; federal and state false
claims act laws; dispensing of drugs associated with our PBM business; professional liability claims arising out of the delivery of
healthcare and related services to the public; development or application of medical policies and coverage and clinical guidelines;
medical malpractice actions; product liability claims; allegations of anti-competitive and unfair business activities; provider
disputes over reimbursement and contracts; provider tiering programs; narrow networks; termination of provider contracts; the
recovery of overpayments from providers; self-funded business; disputes over co-payment calculations; reimbursement of out-of-
network claims; the failure to disclose certain business practices; the failure to comply with various state or federal laws, including
but not limited to, ERISA and the Mental Health
-29-
Parity Act; and customer audits and contract performance, including government contracts. These actions or proceedings could
have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We are also involved in, or may in the future be party to, pending or threatened litigation of the character incidental to the
business we transact or arising out of our operations, including, but not limited to, breaches of security and violations of privacy
requirements, shareholder actions, compliance with federal and state laws and regulations (including qui tam or “whistleblower”
actions), or sales and acquisitions of businesses or assets (including as a result of the terminated Cigna Merger Agreement, or as
more fully described under Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Cigna
Corporation Merger Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K). From time to time, we are involved as a party in various governmental investigations, audits, reviews and
administrative proceedings, including challenges relating to the award of government contracts. These investigations, audits and
reviews include routine and special investigations by various state insurance departments, various federal regulators including CMS
and the Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General (HHS-OIG), state attorneys general, the
Department of Justice (DOJ), and various offices of the U.S. Attorney General. Following an investigation, we may be subject to
civil or criminal fines, penalties and other sanctions if we are determined to be in violation of applicable laws or regulations.
Liabilities that may result from these actions could have a material adverse effect on our cash flows, results of operations and
financial condition.
Recent court decisions and legislative activity may increase our exposure for any of these types of claims. In some cases,
substantial non-economic (including injunctive relief), treble or punitive damages may be sought. Although we maintain insurance
coverage for some of these potential liabilities, some liabilities and damages may not be covered by insurance, insurers may dispute
coverage or the amount of insurance may not be enough to cover the damages awarded. In addition, insurance coverage for all or
certain forms of liability may become unavailable or prohibitively expensive in the future. Any adverse judgment against us
resulting in such damage awards could result in negative publicity and have an adverse effect on our cash flows, results of
operations and financial condition.
Further, litigation brought against the federal and some state governments over the ACA, including the 2018 ACA Decision,
could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations as changes to, or the
invalidation of, the ACA resulting from such litigation may be unfavorable to our business or may create uncertainty over the
applicability and enforceability of portions of the law and related regulations, which impacts our strategy and could negatively
impact our future growth opportunities.
Cigna’s pursuit of litigation in connection with the Cigna Merger Agreement, together with our own litigation against
Cigna, could cause us to incur substantial costs, may present material distractions and, if decided adverse to Anthem, could
negatively impact our financial condition.
As described in Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Cigna Corporation
Merger Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form
10-K, in February 2017, Cigna commenced litigation against us in the Delaware Court of Chancery, or the Delaware Court, for a
declaratory judgment that its purported termination of the Cigna Merger Agreement was lawful and seeking damages against us.
We promptly filed our own litigation against Cigna seeking to compel Cigna’s specific performance of the Cigna Merger
Agreement and damages against Cigna. In May 2017, after the Delaware Court denied our motion to enjoin Cigna from terminating
the Cigna Merger Agreement, we delivered to Cigna a notice terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement. In the Delaware Court
litigation, trial commenced in late February 2019 and concluded in March 2019, and closing arguments were held in November
2019. We have incurred, and likely will continue to incur, substantial litigation costs related to these lawsuits, and may incur
substantial additional cost, including potential settlement and judgment costs. Our defense against Cigna’s claims, the pursuit of our
claims or the settlement, or failure to reach a settlement, for any claims may result in negative media attention, and may adversely
affect our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
Our PBM business and related operations are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties that are in addition to those we
face in our core healthcare business.
We provide PBM services through our IngenioRx business, and we are responsible to regulators and our customers for the
delivery of those PBM services that we contract to provide. Our PBM business is subject to the risks inherent in the
-30-
dispensing, packaging, fulfillment and distribution of pharmaceuticals and other healthcare products, including claims related to
dispensing and other operational errors. Any failure by us or one of our PBM services suppliers to adhere to the laws and
regulations applicable to the dispensing of pharmaceuticals could subject our PBM business to civil and criminal penalties.
Our PBM business is subject to federal and state laws and regulations that govern its relationships with pharmaceutical
manufacturers, physicians, pharmacies and customers, including without limitation, federal and state anti-kickback laws,
beneficiary inducement laws, consumer protection laws, ERISA, HIPAA and laws related to the operation of internet and mail-
service pharmacies, as well as an increasing number of licensure, registration and other laws and accreditation standards that impact
the business practices of a PBM business. In addition, the practice of pharmacy is subject to federal and state laws and regulation,
including those of state boards of pharmacy, individual state-controlled substance authorities, the U.S. Drug Enforcement Agency
and the FDA. Also, we and our third-party vendors are subject to registration requirements and state and federal laws concerning
labeling, packaging, advertising, handling and adulteration of prescription drugs and dispensing of controlled substances. Federal
and state legislatures also regularly consider new regulations for the industry that could materially affect current industry practices,
including potential new legislation and regulations regarding the receipt or disclosure of rebates, discounts and other fees from
pharmaceutical companies, the development and use of formularies and other utilization management tools, the use of average
wholesale prices or other pricing benchmarks, pricing for specialty pharmaceuticals, limited access to networks and pharmacy
network reimbursement methodologies. Noncompliance with applicable laws and regulations by us or our third-party vendors could
have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and reputation and could expose
us to civil and criminal penalties.
Our PBM business would be adversely affected if we are unable to contract on favorable terms with pharmaceutical
manufacturers for, among other things, rebates, discounts and administrative fees.
We are dependent on the success of our relationships with third parties for various services and functions, including PBM
services.
We contract with various third parties to perform certain functions and services and provide us with certain information
technology systems. Certain of these third parties provide us with significant portions of our business infrastructure and operating
requirements, and we could become overly dependent on key vendors, which could cause us to lose core competencies. A
termination of our agreements with, or disruption in the performance of, one or more of these service providers could result in
service disruptions or unavailability, reduced service quality and effectiveness, increased or duplicative costs or an inability to meet
our obligations to our customers. In addition, we may also have to seek alternative service providers, which may be unavailable or
only available on less favorable contract terms. Any of these outcomes could adversely affect our business, reputation, cash flows,
financial condition and operating results.
In particular, beginning in the second quarter of 2019, we began delegating certain PBM administrative functions, such as
claims processing and prescription fulfillment, to CVS Health pursuant to the CVS PBM Agreement. In addition, although we
completed the transition of our members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx on January 1, 2020, Express Scripts continues to
provide certain audit and various run-out transition services related to our PBM business pursuant to the ESI PBM Agreement.
CVS Health began providing certain PBM administrative functions to IngenioRx pursuant to the CVS PBM Agreement beginning
in the second quarter of 2019. In connection with the transition of PBM administrative functions to CVS Health, if CVS Health
fails to provide PBM services as contractually required, we may not be able to meet the full demands of our customers, which could
have a material adverse effect on our business, reputation and results of operations. For additional information on the agreement
with CVS Health, see “Business - General,” in Part I, Item 1 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. In addition, the litigation
between us and Express Scripts regarding the ESI PBM Agreement continues, as more fully described under Note 13,
“Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management
Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
There are various risks associated with providing healthcare services.
The direct provision of healthcare services by certain of our subsidiaries involves risks of additional litigation arising from
medical malpractice actions based on our treatment decisions or brought against us or our associates for alleged malpractice or
professional liability claims arising out of the delivery of healthcare and related services. In addition, liability may arise from
maintaining healthcare premises that serve the public. The defense of any actions may result in significant
-31-
expenses, and if we fail to maintain adequate insurance coverage for these liabilities, or if such insurance is not available, the
resulting costs could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Additionally, many states in which certain of our subsidiaries operate limit the practice of medicine to licensed individuals or
professional organizations comprised of licensed individuals. Business corporations generally may not exercise control over the
medical decisions of physicians, and we are not licensed to practice medicine. Rules and regulations relating to the practice of
medicine, fee-splitting between physicians and referral sources, and similar issues vary from state to state. Further, certain federal
and state laws, including those covering our Medicare and Medicaid plans, prohibit the offer, payment, solicitation, or receipt of
any form of remuneration to induce, or in return for, the referral of patient care opportunities, including, but not limited to,
Medicare patients, and also generally prohibit physicians from making referrals to any entity providing certain designated health
services if the referring physician or related person has an ownership or financial interest in the entity. Any enforcement actions by
governmental officials alleging non-compliance with these rules and regulations could adversely affect our business, cash flows,
financial condition and results of operations.
Mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic partnerships and other business combinations involve risks that could have a
material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operation.
The following are some of the risks associated with mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures and strategic alliances, referred to
collectively as business combinations, that could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations:
•some of the business combinations may not achieve anticipated revenues, earnings or cash flow, business opportunities,
synergies, growth prospects and other anticipated benefits;
•the goodwill or other intangible assets established as a result of our business combinations may be incorrectly valued or
become non-recoverable;
•we may assume liabilities that were not disclosed to us or which were underestimated;
•we may experience difficulties in integrating business combinations, be unable to integrate business combinations
successfully or as quickly as expected, and be unable to realize anticipated economic, operational and other benefits in a
timely manner, which could result in substantial costs and delays or other operational, technical or financial problems;
•business combinations, and proposed business combinations that are not completed, could disrupt our ongoing business,
lead to the incurrence of significant fees, distract management, result in the loss of key employees, divert resources, result
in tax costs or inefficiencies and make it difficult to maintain our current business standards, controls, information
technology systems, policies and procedures;
•we may finance future business combinations by issuing common stock for some or all of the purchase price, which could
dilute the ownership interests of our shareholders;
•we may also incur additional debt related to future business combinations;
•we would be competing with other firms, some of which may have greater financial and other resources, to acquire
attractive companies;
•we may experience disputes with our partners in our strategic alliances and joint ventures, which could result in litigation
or a loss of business; and
•future business combinations may make it difficult to comply with the requirements of the BCBSA and lead to an
increased risk that our BCBSA license agreements may be terminated.
The value of our intangible assets may become impaired.
Due largely to our past mergers and acquisitions, goodwill and other intangible assets represent a substantial portion of our
assets. If we make additional acquisitions, it is likely that we will record additional intangible assets on our consolidated balance
sheets. The value we place on intangible assets may be adversely impacted if business combinations fail to perform in a manner
consistent with our assumptions.
-32-
In accordance with applicable accounting standards, we periodically evaluate our goodwill and other intangible assets to
determine whether all or a portion of their carrying values may no longer be recoverable, in which case a charge to income may be
necessary. This impairment testing requires us to make assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our
reporting units, including goodwill and other intangible assets. In addition, certain other intangible assets with indefinite lives, such
as trademarks, are also tested separately. Estimated fair values developed based on our assumptions and judgments might be
significantly different if other reasonable assumptions and estimates were to be used. If estimated fair values are less than the
carrying values of goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives in future impairment tests, or if significant impairment
indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may be required to record impairment losses
against future income.
Any future evaluations requiring an impairment of our goodwill and other intangible assets could materially affect our results
of operations and shareholders’ equity in the period in which the impairment occurs. A material decrease in shareholders’ equity
could, in turn, negatively impact our debt ratings or potentially impact our compliance with existing debt covenants.
In addition, the estimated fair value of our reporting units may be impacted as a result of business decisions we make
associated with any future changes to laws and regulations. Such decisions, which could unfavorably affect our ability to support
the carrying value of certain goodwill and other intangible assets, could result in impairment charges in future periods.
As a holding company, we are dependent on dividends from our subsidiaries. These dividends are necessary to pay our
outstanding indebtedness. Our regulated subsidiaries are subject to state regulations, including restrictions on the payment
of dividends, maintenance of minimum levels of capital and restrictions on investment portfolios.
We are a holding company whose assets include the outstanding shares of common stock (or other ownership interest) of our
subsidiaries including our intermediate holding companies and regulated insurance and HMO subsidiaries. Our subsidiaries are
separate legal entities. As a holding company, we depend on dividends and administrative expense reimbursements from our
subsidiaries. Furthermore, our subsidiaries are not obligated to make funds available to us, and creditors of our subsidiaries will
have a superior claim to certain of our subsidiaries’ assets. Among other restrictions, state insurance and HMO laws may restrict the
ability of our regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends. In some states, we have made special undertakings that may limit the ability
of our regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends. In addition, our subsidiaries’ ability to make any payments to us will also depend on
their earnings, the terms of their indebtedness, business and tax considerations and other legal restrictions. Our ability to repurchase
shares or pay dividends in the future to our shareholders and meet our obligations, including paying operating expenses and debt
service on our outstanding and future indebtedness, will depend upon the receipt of dividends from our subsidiaries. An inability of
our subsidiaries to pay dividends in the future in an amount sufficient for us to meet our financial obligations may materially
adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Most of our regulated subsidiaries are subject to RBC standards or other forms of minimum capital requirements imposed by
their states of domicile, which require our regulated subsidiaries to report their results of risk-based capital calculations to the
departments of insurance and the NAIC. Failure to maintain the minimum RBC standards could subject our regulated subsidiaries
to corrective action, including state supervision or liquidation. Changes to the existing RBC standards or the adoption of an RBC
requirement at the holding company level, which is currently being considered and developed by the NAIC and various states,
could further restrict our or our regulated subsidiaries’ ability to pay dividends and adversely affect our business. In addition, as
discussed in more detail below, we are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA which contain certain requirements and
restrictions regarding our operations, including minimum capital and liquidity requirements, which could restrict the ability of our
regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends.
Our regulated subsidiaries are subject to state laws and regulations that require diversification of their investment portfolios
and limit the amount of investments in certain riskier investment categories, such as below-investment-grade fixed maturity
securities, mortgage loans, real estate and equity investments, which could generate higher returns on their investments. Failure to
comply with these laws and regulations might cause investments exceeding regulatory limitations to be treated as non-admitted
assets for purposes of measuring statutory surplus and risk-based capital, and, in some instances, require the sale of those
investments.
-33-
We have substantial indebtedness outstanding and may incur additional indebtedness in the future in connection with
acquisitions or otherwise. Such indebtedness could adversely affect our ability to pursue desirable business opportunities
and to react to changes in the economy or our industry, and exposes us to interest rate risk to the extent of our variable rate
indebtedness.
Our debt service obligations require us to use a portion of our cash flow to pay interest and principal on debt instead of for
other corporate purposes, including funding future expansion. If our cash flow and capital resources are insufficient to service our
debt obligations, we may be forced to seek extraordinary dividends from our subsidiaries, sell assets, seek additional equity or debt
capital or restructure our debt. However, these measures might be unsuccessful or inadequate to meet scheduled debt service
obligations, or may not be available on commercially reasonable terms.
We may also incur future debt obligations, in connection with acquisitions or otherwise, that might subject us to restrictive
covenants that could affect our financial and operational flexibility. Our breach or failure to comply with any of these covenants
could result in a default under our credit facilities or other indebtedness. If we default under our credit agreement, the lenders could
cease to make further extensions of credit or cause all of our outstanding debt obligations under our credit agreement to become
immediately due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid interest. If the indebtedness under our notes or our credit
agreement or our other indebtedness is accelerated, we may be unable to repay or finance the amounts due, on commercially
reasonable terms, or at all.
Changes in the method of determining the London Interbank Offered Rate, or LIBOR, or the replacement of LIBOR with
an alternative reference rate, may adversely affect the market for or value of our outstanding debt and the interest rate,
return, value and liquidity of certain of our investments.
A portion of our indebtedness bears interest at fluctuating interest rates, primarily based on LIBOR, and our investment
portfolio also includes some LIBOR-based, floating rate debt investments. In July 2017, the Financial Conduct Authority, a
regulator of financial services firms in the United Kingdom, announced that it intends to stop persuading or compelling banks to
submit LIBOR rates after 2021. In response to concerns regarding the future of LIBOR, the Board of Governors of the Federal
Reserve System and the Federal Reserve Bank of New York convened the Alternative Reference Rates Committee (“ARRC”) to
identify alternatives to LIBOR. The ARRC has recommended a benchmark replacement waterfall to assist issuers in continued
capital market entry while safeguarding against LIBOR’s discontinuation. The initial steps in the ARRC’s recommended provision
reference variations of the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”). At this time, it is not possible to predict whether SOFR
will attain market traction as a LIBOR replacement.
We are unable to predict whether LIBOR will cease to exist after calendar year 2021, the effect of any changes, any
establishment of alternative reference rates or any other reforms to LIBOR or any replacement of LIBOR that may be enacted in
the United Kingdom or elsewhere. Such changes, reforms or replacements relating to LIBOR could have an adverse impact on the
market for or value of any LIBOR-linked securities, loans, derivatives or other financial obligations or extensions of credit entered
into by us, as well as the interest rate, return, value, and liquidity of any LIBOR-based securities held in our investment portfolios,
and could adversely impact our cost of capital, overall financial condition or results of operations.
A downgrade in our credit ratings could have an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results
of operations.
Claims-paying ability as well as financial strength ratings and debt ratings by nationally recognized statistical rating
organizations are an important factor in establishing the competitive position of insurance companies and health benefits
companies. We believe our strong credit ratings are an important factor in marketing our products to customers, since credit ratings
information is broadly disseminated and generally used by customers and creditors. In addition, if our credit ratings are
downgraded or placed under review, our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely
impacted by limitations on future borrowings and a potential increase in our borrowing costs. Our ratings reflect each rating
agency’s opinion of our financial strength, operating performance and ability to meet our obligations to policyholders and creditors,
and are not evaluations directed toward the protection of investors in our common stock. Each of the ratings organizations reviews
our ratings periodically, and there can be no assurance that our current ratings will be maintained in the future.
-34-
The health benefits industry is subject to negative publicity, which could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
The health benefits industry is subject to negative publicity, which can arise from, among other things, increases in premium
rates, industry consolidation, cost of care initiatives and the ongoing debate over laws and regulations impacting the U.S. healthcare
system. Negative publicity may result in increased regulation and legislative review of industry practices, which may further
increase our costs of doing business and adversely affect our profitability by limiting our ability to market or provide our products
and services, requiring us to change our products and services, or increasing the regulatory oversight under which we operate. In
addition, as long as we use the BCBS names and marks in marketing our health benefits products and services, any negative
publicity concerning the BCBSA or other BCBSA licensees may adversely affect us and the sale of our health benefits products and
services. Negative public perception or publicity of the health benefits industry in general, the BCBSA, other BCBSA licensees, or
us or our key vendors in particular, could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
The failure to effectively maintain and upgrade our information systems could adversely affect our business.
Our business depends significantly on effective information systems, and we have many different information systems for our
various businesses. As a result of our merger and acquisition activities, we have acquired and expect to acquire additional systems.
Our information systems require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain and enhance existing systems and
develop new systems in order to keep pace with continuing changes in information processing technology, emerging cybersecurity
risks and threats, evolving industry and regulatory standards including public exchanges and other aspects of the ACA, compliance
with legal requirements, private insurance exchanges and changing customer preferences. In addition, we may from time to time
obtain significant portions of our systems-related or other services or facilities from independent third parties, which may make our
operations vulnerable if such third parties fail to perform adequately.
Failure to adequately implement and maintain effective and efficient information systems with sufficiently advanced
technological capabilities, or our failure to efficiently and effectively consolidate our information systems to eliminate redundant or
obsolete applications, could result in competitive and cost disadvantages to us compared to our competitors, a diversion of
management’s time and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If the
information we rely upon to run our business were found to be inaccurate or unreliable or if we fail to adequately maintain our
information systems and data integrity effectively, we could experience problems in determining medical cost estimates and
establishing appropriate pricing and reserves, have disputes with customers and providers, face regulatory problems, including
sanctions and penalties, incur increases in operating expenses or suffer other adverse consequences, including a decrease in
membership.
We are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA that entitle us to the exclusive and, in certain areas, non-exclusive use
of the BCBS names and marks in our geographic territories. The termination of these license agreements or changes in the
terms and conditions of these license agreements could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations.
We use the BCBS names and marks as identifiers for our products and services under licenses from the BCBSA. Our license
agreements with the BCBSA contain certain requirements and restrictions regarding our operations and our use of the BCBS names
and marks, including: minimum capital and liquidity requirements; enrollment and customer service performance requirements;
participation in programs that provide portability of membership between plans; disclosures to the BCBSA relating to enrollment
and financial conditions; disclosures as to the structure of the BCBS system in contracts with third parties and in public statements;
plan governance requirements; cybersecurity requirements; a requirement that at least 80% (or, in the case of Blue Cross of
California, substantially all) of a licensee’s annual combined local net revenue, as defined by the BCBSA, attributable to healthcare
plans and related services within its service areas must be sold, marketed, administered or underwritten under the BCBS names and
marks; a requirement that at least two-thirds of a licensee’s annual combined national net revenue, as defined by the BCBSA,
attributable to healthcare plans and related services must be sold, marketed, administered or underwritten under the BCBS names
and marks; a requirement that neither a plan nor any of its licensed affiliates may permit an entity other than a plan or a licensed
affiliate to obtain control of the plan or the licensed affiliate or to acquire a substantial portion of its assets related to licensable
services; a requirement that we divide our Board of Directors into three classes serving staggered three-year terms; a requirement
that we guarantee certain contractual and
-35-
financial obligations of our licensed affiliates; and a requirement that we indemnify the BCBSA against any claims asserted against
it resulting from the contractual and financial obligations of any subsidiary that serves as a fiscal intermediary providing
administrative services for Medicare Parts A and B. Failure to comply with the foregoing requirements could result in a termination
of the license agreements.
The license agreements may be modified by the BCBSA. To the extent that such amendments to the license agreements are
adopted in the future, they could have a material adverse effect on our future expansion plans or results of operations. Further,
BCBS licensees have certain requirements to perform administrative services for members of other BCBS licensees. As of
December 31, 2019, we provided services to approximately 30 million Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield enrollees. If we or another
BCBS licensee are not in compliance with all legal requirements or are unable to perform administrative services as required, this
could have an adverse effect on our members and our ability to maintain our licenses, which could have a material adverse effect on
our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Upon the occurrence of an event causing termination of the license agreements, we would no longer have the right to use the
BCBS names and marks or to sell BCBS health insurance products and services in one or more of our service areas. Furthermore,
the BCBSA would be free to issue a license to use the BCBS names and marks in these service areas to another entity. Our existing
BCBS members would be provided with instructions for obtaining alternative products and services licensed by the BCBSA.
Events that could cause the termination of a license agreement with the BCBSA include, without limitation, failure to comply with
minimum capital requirements imposed by the BCBSA, failure to comply with governance requirements such as maintaining a
classified board structure, a change of control or violation of the BCBSA ownership limitations on our capital stock, impending
financial insolvency and the appointment of a trustee or receiver or the commencement of any action against a licensee seeking its
dissolution. We believe that the BCBS names and marks are valuable identifiers of our products and services in the marketplace.
Upon termination of a license agreement, the BCBSA would have the right to impose a “Re-establishment Fee” upon us, which
would be used in part to fund the establishment of a replacement Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensee in the vacated service area.
The fee is set at $98.33 per licensed enrollee. If the Re-establishment Fee was applied to our total Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
enrollees of approximately 30 million as of December 31, 2019, we would be assessed approximately $3 billion by the BCBSA. As
a result, termination of the license agreements would have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition
and results of operations.
Our business may be impacted by natural disasters, war, terrorism, political events, global climate change and other
occurrences that could create large-scale medical emergencies or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business,
cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Natural disasters, war, terrorism, political events, global climate change and other similar occurrences could create large-scale
medical emergencies or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations. Large-scale medical emergencies can take many forms and can cause widespread illness and death. For example,
federal and state law enforcement officials have issued warnings about potential terrorist activity involving biological and other
weapons. In addition, natural disasters such as hurricanes and the potential for a widespread pandemic of influenza or other illness
and the lack of availability of appropriate preventative medicines can have a significant impact on the health of the population of
widespread areas. If the United States were to experience widespread bioterrorism or other attacks, large-scale natural disasters in
our concentrated coverage areas or a large-scale pandemic or epidemic, our covered medical expenses could rise, our operations
could be interrupted and we could experience a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results
of operations or, in the event of extreme circumstances, our viability could be threatened. Furthermore, global climate change could
result in certain types of natural disasters occurring more frequently or with more intense effects, and may have a long-term effect
on general economic conditions and the healthcare or pharmacy industry in particular, which could adversely affect our business
and financial results.
Adverse securities and credit market conditions may significantly affect our ability to meet liquidity needs.
During periods of increased volatility, adverse securities and credit markets may exert downward pressure on the availability of
liquidity and credit capacity for certain issuers. We need liquidity to pay our operating expenses, make payments on our
indebtedness and pay capital expenditures. The principal sources of our cash receipts are premiums, administrative fees, investment
income, revenue received from IngenioRx and DBG, proceeds from the sale or maturity of
-36-
our investment securities, proceeds from borrowings and proceeds from the issuance of common stock under our employee stock
plans.
Our access to additional financing will depend on a variety of factors such as market conditions, the general availability of
credit, the volume of trading activities, the availability of credit to our industry, our credit ratings and credit capacity, as well as the
possibility that customers or lenders could develop a negative perception of our long- or short-term financial prospects. Similarly,
our access to funds may be impaired if regulatory authorities or rating agencies take negative actions against us. If one or a
combination of these factors were to occur, our internal sources of liquidity may prove to be insufficient, and in such case, we may
not be able to successfully obtain additional financing on favorable terms, or at all.
The value of our investments is influenced by varying economic and market conditions, and a decrease in value may result
in a loss charged to income.
The market values of our investments vary from time to time depending on economic and market conditions. For various
reasons, we may sell certain of our investments at prices that are less than the carrying value of the investments. During periods in
which interest rates are relatively low, as in recent years, our investment income could be adversely impacted. In addition, in
periods of declining interest rates, bond calls and mortgage loan prepayments generally increase, resulting in the reinvestment of
these funds at the then lower market rates. In periods of rising interest rates, the market values of our fixed maturity securities will
generally decrease, which could result in material losses on investments in future periods. In addition, defaults by issuers, primarily
from investments in corporate and municipal bonds, who fail to pay or perform their obligations, could reduce net investment
income, which would adversely affect our profitability. We cannot assure you that our investment portfolios will produce positive
returns or maintain their present values.
In accordance with FASB guidance for investments, we classify fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio as
“available-for-sale” or “trading” and report those securities at fair value. Current and long-term available-for-sale investment
securities represented a significant percentage of our total consolidated assets at December 31, 2019.
Changes in the economic environment, including periods of increased volatility in the securities markets, can increase the
difficulty of assessing investment impairment, and the same influences tend to increase the risk of potential impairment of these
assets. Over time, the economic and market environment may provide additional insight into the value of our investment securities,
which could change our judgment regarding the fair value of certain securities and/or impairment. Given the sometimes rapidly
changing market conditions and the significant judgments involved, there is continuing risk that future declines in fair value may
occur and material other-than-temporary impairments may be charged to income in future periods, resulting in realized losses.
We face intense competition to attract and retain employees. Further, managing key executive transition, succession and
retention is critical to our success.
Our success depends on our ability to attract and retain qualified employees to meet current and future needs, and to integrate
and engage employees who have joined us through acquisitions. We face intense competition for qualified employees, and there
can be no assurance that we will be able to attract and retain such employees or that such competition among potential employers
will not result in increasing salaries. An inability to retain existing employees or attract additional employees could have a material
adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
-37-
We would be adversely affected if we fail to adequately plan for the succession of our President and Chief Executive Officer
and other senior management and retention of key executives. While we have succession plans in place for members of our senior
management, and employment arrangements with certain key executives, these plans and arrangements do not guarantee that the
services of our senior executives will continue to be available to us or that we will be able to attract, transition and retain suitable
successors.
We are subject to various risks associated with our international operations.
Certain of our subsidiaries that provide services to some of our health plans operate internationally and are subject to
regulation in the jurisdictions in which they are organized or conduct business, which requires us to devote resources to implement
controls and systems in new foreign jurisdictions to comply with, and to ensure that our vendors and partners comply with, U.S.
and foreign laws and regulations. These regulatory regimes encompass, among other matters, local and cross-border taxation,
licensing, tariffs, intellectual property, investment, capital (including minimum solvency margin and reserve requirements),
management control, labor, anti-fraud, anti-corruption and privacy and data protection regulations (including requirements for
cross-border data transfers), which vary by jurisdiction. Violations of these laws and regulations could result in fines, criminal
sanctions against us, our officers or employees, restrictions or outright prohibitions on the conduct of our business and significant
reputational harm.
Changes in U.S. tax laws and regulations could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flow, financial condition
and results of operations. In addition, we may not be able to realize the value of our deferred tax assets.
Changes in tax laws and regulations, including with respect to corporate tax rates and the deductibility of expenses, or changes
in the interpretation of tax laws and regulations by federal and/or state authorities, could have a material impact on the future value
of our deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities, could result in significant one-time charges in the current or future taxable
years and could increase our future U.S. tax expense. These changes could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash
flow, financial condition and results of operations.
In accordance with applicable accounting standards, we separately recognize deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities.
Such deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities represent the tax effect of temporary differences between financial reporting and
tax reporting measured at tax rates enacted at the time the deferred tax asset or liability is recorded. At each financial reporting date,
we evaluate our deferred tax assets to determine the likely realization of the benefit of the temporary differences. Our evaluation
includes a review of the types of temporary differences that created the deferred tax asset; the amount of taxes paid on both capital
gains and ordinary income in prior periods and available for a carry-back claim; the forecasted future taxable income, and
therefore, the likely future deduction of the deferred tax item; and any other significant issues that might impact the realization of
the deferred tax asset. If it is more likely than not that all or a portion of the deferred tax asset may not be realized, we establish a
valuation allowance. Significant judgment is required in determining an appropriate valuation allowance.
Any future increase in our valuation allowance would result in additional income tax expense and a decrease in shareholders’
equity, which could materially affect our financial position and results of operations in the period in which the increase occurs. A
material decrease in shareholders’ equity could, in turn, negatively impact our debt ratings or potentially impact our compliance
with existing debt covenants.
Indiana law, other applicable laws, our articles of incorporation and bylaws, and provisions of our BCBSA license
agreements may prevent or discourage takeovers and business combinations that our shareholders might consider to be in
their best interest.
Indiana law and our articles of incorporation and bylaws may delay, defer, prevent or render more difficult a takeover attempt
that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interests. For instance, they may prevent our shareholders from receiving the
benefit from any premium to the market price of our common stock offered by a bidder in a takeover context. Even in the absence
of a takeover attempt, the existence of these provisions may adversely affect the prevailing market price of our common stock if
they are viewed as discouraging takeover attempts in the future.
We are regulated as an insurance holding company and subject to the insurance holding company acts of the states in which
our insurance company subsidiaries are domiciled, as well as similar provisions included in the health statutes and regulations of
certain states where these subsidiaries are regulated as managed care companies or HMOs. The insurance
-38-
holding company acts and regulations and these similar provisions restrict the ability of any person to obtain control of an insurance
company or HMO without prior regulatory approval. Under those statutes and regulations, without such approval or an exemption,
no person may acquire any voting security of a domestic insurance company or HMO, or an insurance holding company which
controls an insurance company or HMO, or merge with such a holding company, if as a result of such transaction such person
would “control” the insurance holding company, insurance company or HMO. “Control” is generally defined as the direct or
indirect power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person and is presumed to exist if a person
directly or indirectly owns or controls 10% or more of the voting securities of another person. Further, the Indiana Business
Corporation Law contains business combination provisions that, in general, prohibit for five years any business combination with a
beneficial owner of 10% or more of our common stock unless the holder’s acquisition of the stock was approved in advance by our
Board of Directors.
Our articles of incorporation restrict the beneficial ownership of our capital stock in excess of specific ownership limits. The
ownership limits restrict beneficial ownership of our voting capital stock to less than 10% for institutional investors and less than
5% for non-institutional investors, both as defined in our articles of incorporation. Additionally, no person may beneficially own
shares of our common stock representing a 20% or more ownership interest in us. These restrictions are intended to ensure our
compliance with the terms of our licenses with the BCBSA. Our articles of incorporation prohibit ownership of our capital stock
beyond these ownership limits without prior approval of a majority of our continuing directors (as defined in our articles of
incorporation). In addition, as discussed above in the risk factor describing our license agreements with the BCBSA, such license
agreements are subject to termination upon a change of control and a re-establishment fee would be imposed upon termination of
the license agreements.
Certain other provisions included in our articles of incorporation and bylaws may also have anti-takeover effects and may
delay, defer or prevent a takeover attempt that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interests. In particular, our articles
of incorporation and bylaws: divide our Board of Directors into three classes serving staggered three-year terms (which is required
by our license agreement with the BCBSA); permit our Board of Directors to determine the terms of and issue one or more series of
preferred stock without further action by shareholders; restrict the maximum number of directors; limit the ability of shareholders
to remove directors; impose restrictions on shareholders’ ability to fill vacancies on our Board of Directors; impose advance notice
requirements for shareholder proposals and nominations of directors to be considered at meetings of shareholders; and prohibit
shareholders from amending certain provisions of our bylaws.
We also face other risks that could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations, which include:
•any requirement to restate financial results in the event of inappropriate application of accounting principles;
•a significant failure of our internal control over financial reporting;
•failure of our prevention and control systems related to employee compliance with internal policies, including data
security;
•healthcare benefits fraud by providers, members and/or brokers that is not prevented or detected and impacts our medical
costs or those of self-insured customers;
•failure to protect our proprietary information; and
•failure of our corporate governance policies or procedures.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS.
None.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES.
We lease our principal executive offices located at 220 Virginia Avenue, Indianapolis, Indiana. In addition to this location, we
have operating facilities located in each state where we operate as licensees of the BCBSA, in each state where Amerigroup
conducts business and in certain other states and countries where our other subsidiaries operate. A majority of these locations are
also leased properties. Our facilities support our various business segments. We believe that our properties are adequate and
suitable for our business as presently conducted as well as for the foreseeable future.
-39-
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.
For information regarding our legal proceedings, see Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory
Proceedings,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES.
Not applicable.
-40-
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES.
Market Information 
Our common stock, par value $0.01 per share, is listed on the NYSE under the symbol “ANTM.”
Holders
As of February 6, 2020, there were 57,967 shareholders of record of our common stock.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
The information required by this Item concerning securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans is set
forth in Part III, Item 12 “Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters” in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table presents information related to our repurchases of common stock for the periods indicated:
Period Total Number
of Shares
Purchased1  Average
Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number
of Shares
Purchased as
Part of
Publicly
Announced
Programs2 Approximate
Dollar Value
of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased
Under the
Programs
(In millions, except share and per share data)     
October 1, 2019 to October 31, 2019 672,357 $244.58 670,000$ 3,934
November 1, 2019 to November 30, 2019 282,903 276.20 279,500 3,857
December 1, 2019 to December 31, 2019 222,613 290.75 222,294 3,792
  1,177,873  1,171,794 
      
1Total number of shares purchased includes 6,079 shares delivered to or withheld by us in connection with employee payroll tax
withholding upon exercise or vesting of stock awards. Stock grants to employees and directors and stock issued for stock
option plans and stock purchase plans in the consolidated statements of shareholders’ equity are shown net of these shares
purchased.
2Represents the number of shares repurchased through the common stock repurchase program authorized by our Board of
Directors, which the Board evaluates periodically. During the year ended December 31, 2019, we repurchased 6,332,989
shares at a cost of $1,701 under the program, including the cost of options to purchase shares. The Board of Directors has
authorized our common stock repurchase program since 2003. The Board’s most recent authorized increase to the program was
$5,000 on December 7, 2017. No duration has been placed on our common stock repurchase program, and we reserve the right
to discontinue the program at any time.
-41-
Performance Graph
The following Performance Graph and related information compares the cumulative total return to shareholders of our
common stock for the period from December 31, 2014 through December 31, 2019, with the cumulative total return over such
period of (i) the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index (the “S&P 500 Index”) and (ii) the Standard & Poor’s Managed Health Care
Index (the “S&P Managed Health Care Index”). The graph assumes an investment of $100 on December 31, 2014 in each of our
common stock, the S&P 500 Index and the S&P Managed Health Care Index (and the reinvestment of all dividends).
The comparisons shown in the graph below are based on historical data, and we caution that the stock price performance
shown in the graph below is not indicative of, and is not intended to forecast, the potential future performance of our common
stock. Information used in the graph was obtained from S&P Global Market Intelligence, a source believed to be reliable, but we
are not responsible for any errors or omissions in such information. The following graph and related information shall not be
deemed “soliciting materials” or to be “filed” with the SEC, nor shall such information be incorporated by reference into any future
filing under the Exchange Act, except to the extent that we specifically incorporate it by reference into such filing.
 December 31,
 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019
Anthem, Inc. $100$113$119 $188 $222 $259
S&P 500 Index 100 101 114 138 132 174
S&P Managed Health Care Index 100 122 146 210 232 279
        
Based upon an initial investment of $100 on December 31, 2014 with dividends reinvested.
-42-
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA.
The table below provides selected consolidated financial data of Anthem. The information has been derived from our
consolidated financial statements for each of the years in the five-year period ended December 31, 2019. You should read this
selected consolidated financial data in conjunction with the audited consolidated financial statements and notes as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2019 included in Part II, Item 8 “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data,” and Part II, Item 7
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” included in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
  As of and for the Years Ended December 31
  2019  2018 1  2017 1 2016  2015 1
(in millions, except where indicated and except per share
data)         
Income Statement Data      
Total operating revenue2 $ 103,141 $ 91,341 $ 89,061 $ 84,194 $ 78,405
Total revenues 104,213 92,105 90,040 84,863 79,157
Net income 4,807 3,750 3,843 2,470 2,560
Per Share Data     
Basic net income per share $ 18.81 $ 14.53 $ 14.70 $ 9.39 $ 9.73
Diluted net income per share 18.47 14.19 14.35 9.21 9.38
Dividends per share 3.20 3.00 2.70 2.60 2.50
Other Data (unaudited)     
Benefit expense ratio3 86.8% 84.2% 86.4% 84.8% 83.3%
Selling, general and administrative expense ratio4 13.0% 15.3% 14.2% 14.9% 16.0%
Income before income tax expense as a percentage of total
revenues 5.7% 5.5% 4.4% 5.4% 5.9%
Net income as a percentage of total revenues 4.6% 4.1% 4.3% 2.9% 3.2%
Medical membership (in thousands) 41,000 39,938 40,299 39,940 38,599
Balance Sheet Data     
Cash and investments5 $ 26,157 $ 22,639 $ 25,179 $ 23,263 $ 21,065
Total assets 77,453 71,571 70,540 65,083 61,718
Long-term debt, less current portion 17,787 17,217 17,382 14,359 15,325
Total liabilities 45,725 43,030 44,037 39,982 38,673
Total shareholders’ equity 31,728 28,541 26,503 25,101 23,045
1 The net assets of and results of operations for America’s 1st Choice, HealthSun and Simply Healthcare are included from their respective acquisition dates of
February 15, 2018, December 21, 2017 and February 17, 2015, respectively.
2 Operating revenue is obtained by adding premiums and administrative fees and other revenue.
3 The benefit expense ratio represents benefit expenses as a percentage of premium revenue.
4 The selling, general and administrative expense ratio represents selling, general and administrative expenses as a percentage of total operating revenue.
5 Cash and investments is obtained by adding cash and cash equivalents, current and long-term fixed maturity securities and current and long-term equity
securities.
-43-
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS.
 (In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
 This Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, or MD&A, should be read in
conjunction with our audited consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
References to the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “Anthem” or the “Company” used throughout this MD&A refer to Anthem, Inc., an
Indiana corporation, and, unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries. References to the “states”
include the District of Columbia, unless the context otherwise requires.
This section of this Annual Report on Form 10-K generally discusses 2019 and 2018 items and year-over-year comparisons
between 2019 and 2018. A detailed discussion of 2017 items and year-over-year comparisons between 2018 and 2017 that are not
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K can be found in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Overview
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving
approximately 41 medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2019. We are an independent licensee of
the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association, or BCBSA, an association of independent health benefit plans. We serve our members
as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield, or BCBS, licensee for Colorado, Connecticut,
Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City area), Nevada, New Hampshire, New York
(in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia (excluding the Northern Virginia suburbs of
Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business as Anthem Blue Cross, Anthem Blue Cross
and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also conduct business through arrangements with
other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we also serve customers in numerous states
across the country as Aim Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, CareMore, Freedom Health, HealthLink, HealthSun,
Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. Also, in the second quarter of 2019, we began providing pharmacy
benefits management, or PBM, services through our IngenioRx subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance operations in all
50 states and the District of Columbia through our subsidiaries.
We manage our operations through three reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business and
Other. Prior to the second quarter of 2019, our Other segment included certain eliminations and corporate expenses not allocated to
either of our other reportable segments. Beginning with the second quarter of 2019, our Other segment also includes IngenioRx, our
pharmacy benefits manager, which began operations during the second quarter of 2019. In addition, during the second quarter of
2019, we reclassified our Diversified Business Group, or DBG, our integrated health services business, from our Government
Business segment to the Other segment to reflect changes in how our segments are being managed. Amounts for prior years have
been reclassified through this MD&A to conform to the current year presentation for comparability. Based on the Financial
Accounting Standards Board, or FASB, guidance, as of December 31, 2019, IngenioRx and DBG did not collectively meet the
quantitative thresholds for a reportable segment.
Our operating revenue consists of premiums and administrative fees and other revenue. Premium revenue comes from fully-
insured contracts where we indemnify our policyholders against costs for covered health and life benefits. Administrative fees and
other revenue come from contracts where our customers are self-insured, or where the fee is based on either the processing of
transactions or a percent of network discount savings realized, revenues from our Medicare processing business and from other
health-related businesses, including disease management programs and miscellaneous other income. Administrative fees and other
revenue also include product revenue for PBM services performed by IngenioRx to unaffiliated PBM customers, including our self-
funded groups that have contracted with IngenioRx for PBM services, and beginning in 2020, to third-party health plans.
Our benefit expense primarily includes costs of care for health services consumed by our fully-insured members, such as
outpatient care, inpatient hospital care, professional services (primarily physician care) and pharmacy benefit costs. All four
components are affected both by unit costs and utilization rates. Unit costs include the cost of outpatient medical procedures
-44-
per visit, inpatient hospital care per admission, physician fees per office visit and prescription drug prices. Utilization rates
represent the volume of consumption of health services and typically vary with the age and health status of our members and their
social and lifestyle choices, along with clinical protocols and medical practice patterns in each of our markets. A portion of benefit
expense recognized in each reporting period consists of actuarial estimates of claims incurred but not yet paid by us. Any changes
in these estimates are recorded in the period the need for such an adjustment arises. While we offer a diversified mix of managed
care products and services through our managed care plans, our aggregate cost of care can fluctuate based on a change in the
overall mix of these products and services. Our managed care plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations; Health Maintenance
Organizations, or HMOs; Point-of-Service plans; traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including Consumer-Driven
Health Plans; and hospital only and limited benefit products.
We classify certain claims-related costs as benefit expense to reflect costs incurred for our members’ traditional medical care,
as well as those expenses which improve our members’ health and medical outcomes. These claims-related costs may be comprised
of expenses incurred for: (i) medical management, including case and prospective utilization management; (ii) health and wellness,
including disease management services for such conditions as diabetes, high-risk pregnancies, congestive heart failure and asthma
management and wellness initiatives like weight-loss programs and smoking cessation treatments; and (iii) clinical health policy,
such as identification and use of best clinical practices to avoid harm, identifying clinical errors and safety concerns, and
identifying potential adverse drug interactions. These types of claims-related costs are designed to ultimately lower our members’
cost of care. 
Our cost of products sold represents the cost of prescription drugs dispensed by IngenioRx to unaffiliated PBM customers (net
of rebates or discounts), including any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, per-claim administrative fees for
prescription fulfillment and certain direct costs related to sales and administration of customer contracts.
Our selling, general and administrative expenses consist of fixed and variable costs. Examples of fixed costs are depreciation,
amortization and certain facilities expenses. Certain variable costs, such as premium taxes, vary directly with premium volume.
Commission expense generally varies with premium or membership volume. Other variable costs, such as salaries and benefits, do
not vary directly with changes in premium but are more aligned with changes in membership. The acquisition or loss of a
significant block of business would likely impact staffing levels and thus, associated compensation expense. Other variable costs
include professional and consulting expenses and advertising. Other factors can impact our administrative cost structure, including
systems efficiencies, inflation and changes in productivity.
Our results of operations depend in large part on our ability to accurately predict and effectively manage healthcare costs
through effective contracting with providers of care to our members and our medical management and health and wellness
programs. Several economic factors related to healthcare costs, such as regulatory mandates of coverage as well as direct-to-
consumer advertising by providers and pharmaceutical companies, have a direct impact on the volume of care consumed by our
members. The potential effect of escalating healthcare costs, any changes in our ability to negotiate competitive rates with our
providers and any regulatory or market-driven restrictions on our ability to obtain adequate premium rates to offset overall inflation
in healthcare costs, including increases in unit costs and utilization resulting from the aging of the population and other
demographics, as well as advances in medical technology, may impose further risks to our ability to profitably underwrite our
business, and may have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
For additional information about our business and reportable segments, see Part I, Item 1, “Business” and Note 19, “Segment
Information” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Business Trends
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended, or
collectively, the ACA, has changed and may continue to make broad-based changes to the U.S. healthcare system. We expect the
ACA will continue to impact our business model and strategy. Also, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including a federal
district court decision invalidating the ACA, or the “2018 ACA Decision”, which judgment has been stayed pending appeal, could
significantly disrupt our business. During 2019, we modestly expanded our participation in the Individual ACA-compliant market.
Our strategy has been, and will continue to be, to only participate in rating regions where we have an appropriate level of
confidence that these markets are on a path toward sustainability, including, but not limited to, factors such as expected financial
performance, regulatory environment, and underlying market characteristics. We
-45-
currently offer Individual ACA-compliant products in 91 of the 143 rating regions in which we operate. In addition, the continuing
growth in our government-sponsored business exposes us to increased regulatory oversight.
In the second quarter of 2019, we began using our new pharmacy benefits manager called IngenioRx to market and sell a PBM
product to fully-insured and self-funded Anthem health plan customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of
the health plans we own. This comprehensive product portfolio includes features such as drug formularies, a pharmacy network,
prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities. In July 2019, we announced our first contract win with a
third-party health insurer, Blue Cross of Idaho, and we began providing PBM services under that contract beginning on January 1,
2020. Also beginning in the second quarter of 2019, we began delegating certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims
processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., or CVS Health, which is a subsidiary of CVS Health
Corporation, pursuant to a five-year agreement with CVS Health, or the CVS PBM Agreement. We intend to retain the
responsibilities for IngenioRx’s clinical and formulary strategy and development, member and employer experiences, operations,
sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy. From December 2009 through December 2019, we delegated
certain PBM functions and administrative services to Express Scripts, Inc., or Express Scripts, pursuant to our PBM agreement
with Express Scripts, or the ESI PBM Agreement. In January 2019, we exercised our contractual right to terminate the ESI PBM
Agreement earlier than the original expiration date of December 31, 2019 due to the acquisition of Express Scripts by Cigna
Corporation, or Cigna. We began transitioning existing members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019,
and completed the transition of all of our members on January 1, 2020. Prior to the termination of the ESI PBM Agreement,
Express Scripts managed the network of pharmacy providers, operated mail order pharmacies and processed prescription drug
claims on our behalf, while we sold and supported the product for our members, made formulary decisions, sold drug benefit
design strategy and provided front line members support. We expect IngenioRx to provide our members with more cost-effective
solutions and improve our ability to integrate pharmacy benefits within our medical and specialty platform.
Pricing Trends: We strive to price our healthcare benefit products consistent with anticipated underlying medical trends. We
frequently make adjustments to respond to legislative and regulatory changes as well as pricing and other actions taken by existing
competitors and new market entrants. Product pricing in our Commercial & Specialty Business segment, including our Individual
and Small Group lines of business, remains competitive. Revenues from the Medicare and Medicaid programs are dependent, in
whole or in part, upon annual funding from the federal government and/or applicable state governments. The ACA imposed an
annual Health Insurance Provider Fee, or HIP Fee, on health insurers that write certain types of health insurance on U.S. risks. We
price our affected products to cover the impact of the HIP Fee when applicable. The HIP Fee was suspended for 2019, has resumed
for 2020 and has been permanently repealed beginning in 2021.
Medical Cost Trends: Our medical cost trends are primarily driven by increases in the utilization of services across all provider
types and the unit cost increases of these services. We work to mitigate these trends through various medical management programs
such as utilization management, condition management, program integrity and specialty pharmacy management, as well as benefit
design changes. There are many drivers of medical cost trends that can cause variance from our estimates, such as changes in the
level and mix of services utilized, regulatory changes, aging of the population, health status and other demographic characteristics
of our members, epidemics, advances in medical technology, new high cost prescription drugs, and healthcare provider or member
fraud. Our underlying Local Group medical cost trends reflect the “allowed amount,” or contractual rate, paid to providers. We
estimate that our aggregate cost of care trend for the full year of 2019 was approximately 6.0%, at the midpoint of our 5.5% to
6.5% estimated range for the year. We anticipate the Local Group medical cost trend in 2020 will be in the range of 3.5% to 4.5%,
including the benefit of lower pharmacy cost from the launch of IngenioRx and other medical cost management initiatives.
For additional discussion regarding business trends, see Part I, Item 1 “Business” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Regulatory Trends and Uncertainties
The ACA presented us with new growth opportunities, but also introduced new risks, regulatory challenges and uncertainties,
and required changes in the way products are designed, underwritten, priced, distributed and administered. Changes to our business
environment are likely to continue as elected officials at the national and state levels continue to enact, and both elected officials
and candidates for election continue to propose, significant modifications to existing laws and regulations, including changes to
taxes and fees. In addition, the legal challenges regarding the ACA, including the 2018
-46-
ACA Decision, which judgment has been stayed pending appeal, continue to contribute to this uncertainty. We will continue to
evaluate the impact of the ACA as any further developments or judicial rulings occur.
The annual HIP Fee is allocated to health insurers based on the ratio of the amount of an insurer’s net premium revenues
written during the preceding calendar year to the amount of health insurance premium for all U.S. health risk for those certain lines
of business written during the preceding calendar year. We record our estimated liability for the HIP Fee in full at the beginning of
the year with a corresponding deferred asset that is amortized on a straight-line basis to selling, general and administrative expense.
The final calculation and payment of the annual HIP Fee is due by September 30th of each fee year. The HIP Fee is non-deductible
for federal income tax purposes. Our affected products are priced to cover the increased selling, general and administrative and
income tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee. The total amount due from allocations to health insurers was $14,300 for 2018,
and we recognized $1,544 as selling, general and administrative expense related to the HIP Fee. There was no corresponding
expense for 2019 due to the suspension of the HIP Fee for 2019. The HIP Fee has resumed and increased to $15,523 for 2020 and
has been permanently eliminated beginning in 2021.
As a result of the ACA, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, or HHS, issued Medical Loss Ratio, or MLR,
regulations that require us to meet minimum MLR thresholds of 85% for Large Group and 80% for Small Group and Individual
lines of business. Plans that do not meet the minimum thresholds have to pay a MLR rebate. For purposes of determining MLR
rebates, HHS has defined the types of costs that should be included in the MLR rebate calculation. However, certain components of
the MLR calculation as defined by HHS cannot be classified consistently under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, or
GAAP. While considered benefit expense or a reduction of premium revenue by HHS, certain of these costs are classified as other
types of expense, such as selling, general and administrative expense or income tax expense, in our GAAP basis financial
statements. Accordingly, the benefit expense ratio determined using our consolidated GAAP operating results is not comparable to
the MLR calculated under HHS regulations.
The ACA also imposed a separate minimum MLR threshold of 85% for Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D prescription
drug plans, or Medicare Part D. Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D plans that do not meet this threshold have to pay an MLR
rebate. If a plan’s MLR is below 85% for three consecutive years beginning with 2014, enrollment is restricted. A Medicare
Advantage or Medicare Part D plan contract will be terminated if the plan’s MLR is below 85% for five consecutive years.
For additional discussion regarding regulatory trends and uncertainties, and risk factors that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those contained in forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, see Part I, Item 1
“Business - Regulation” and Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors.”
Other Significant Items or Transactions
In January 2019, we exercised our contractual right to terminate the ESI PBM Agreement, and we completed the transition of
our members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx on January 1, 2020. Notwithstanding our termination of the ESI PBM Agreement,
the litigation between us and Express Scripts regarding the ESI PBM Agreement continues. In March 2016, we filed a lawsuit
against Express Scripts seeking to recover damages for pharmacy pricing that is higher than competitive benchmark pricing and
damages related to operational breaches. Express Scripts filed an answer to the lawsuit disputing our contractual claims and
alleging various defenses and counterclaims. For additional information regarding this lawsuit, see Note 13, “Commitments and
Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management Litigation,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In February 2018, we completed our acquisition of Freedom Health, Inc., Optimum HealthCare, Inc., America’s 1st Choice of
South Carolina, Inc. and related entities, or collectively, America’s 1st Choice, a Medicare Advantage organization that offers HMO
products, including Chronic Special Needs Plans and Dual-Eligible Special Needs Plans under its Freedom Health and Optimum
HealthCare brands in Florida and its America’s 1st Choice of South Carolina brand in South Carolina. At the time of acquisition,
through its Medicare Advantage Plans, America’s 1st Choice served approximately one hundred and thirty-five thousand members
in 25 Florida and 3 South Carolina counties. This acquisition aligned with our plans for continued growth in the Medicare
Advantage and Special Needs populations.
In December 2017, we acquired HealthSun Health Plans, Inc., or HealthSun, which at the time of acquisition served
approximately forty thousand members in the state of Florida through its Medicare Advantage plans, and which received a
-47-
five-star rating from the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services. This acquisition aligned with our plans for continued growth in
the Medicare Advantage and dual-eligible populations.
For additional information related to the acquisitions of America’s 1st Choice and HealthSun, see Note 3, “Business
Acquisitions,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In May 2017, we announced that we were terminating the Agreement and Plan of Merger, or Cigna Merger Agreement,
between us and Cigna. Both we and Cigna have commenced litigation against the other seeking various actions and damages,
including Cigna’s damage claim for a $1,850 termination fee pursuant to the terms of the Cigna Merger Agreement. For additional
information about the ongoing litigation related to the Cigna Merger Agreement, see Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies -
Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings - Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Other significant transactions in recent years that have impacted or will impact our capital structure or that have influenced or
will influence how we conduct our business operations include our Board of Directors’ declarations of dividends on our common
stock, repurchases of our common stock, and debt repurchases and new debt issuances (2019 and prior). For additional information
regarding these transactions, see Note 12, “Debt” and Note 14, “Capital Stock,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Selected Operating Performance
During the year ended December 31, 2019, total medical membership increased by 1.1, or 2.7%, and this increase was driven
primarily by growth in our fully-insured businesses.
Operating revenue for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $103,141, an increase of $11,800, or 12.9%, from the year
ended December 31, 2018. The increase in operating revenue was primarily from higher premiums, and, to a lesser extent,
increased administrative fees and other revenue.
Net income for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $4,807, an increase of $1,057, or 28.2%, from the year ended
December 31, 2018. The increase in net income was due to higher operating results in both our Commercial & Specialty Business
and Government Business segments, in part due to the benefits realized from the launch of IngenioRx in 2019, net realized gains on
financial instruments and lower income tax expense.
Our fully-diluted earnings per share, or EPS, for the year ended December 31, 2019 were $18.47, an increase of $4.28, or
30.2%, from the year ended December 31, 2018. Our diluted shares for the year ended December 31, 2019 were 260.3, a decrease
of 3.9, or 1.5%, compared to the year ended December 31, 2018. The increase in EPS resulted primarily from the increase in net
income in 2019.
Operating cash flow for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $6,061, or approximately 1.3 times net income. Operating cash
flow for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $3,827, or approximately 1.0 times net income. The increase in operating cash
flow was primarily due to the impact of membership growth in our Government Business segment as well as higher net income in
2019. These increases were partially offset by the impact of the timing of working capital changes.
Our results of operations discussed throughout this MD&A are determined in accordance with GAAP. We also calculate
operating gain to further aid investors in understanding and analyzing our core operating results. We define operating revenue as
premium income and administrative fees and other revenue. Operating gain is calculated as total operating revenue less benefit
expense, cost of products sold and selling, general and administrative expense. We use these measures as a basis for evaluating
segment performance, allocating resources, forecasting future operating periods and setting incentive compensation targets. This
information is not intended to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for income before income tax expense, net income or
EPS prepared in accordance with GAAP, and may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies. For
additional details on operating gain, see our “Reportable Segments Results of Operations” discussion included in this MD&A. For
a reconciliation of reportable segment operating revenue to the amounts of total revenue included in the consolidated statements of
income and a reconciliation of reportable segment operating gain to income before income tax expense, see Note 19, “Segment
Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-48-
We intend to expand through a combination of organic growth, strategic acquisitions and efficient use of capital in both
existing and new markets. Our growth strategy is designed to enable us to take advantage of additional economies of scale, as well
as providing us access to new and evolving technologies and products. In addition, we believe geographic and product diversity
reduces our exposure to local or regional regulatory, economic and competitive pressures and provides us with increased
opportunities for growth. In 2019, we continued growing our government-sponsored business and modestly increased our
participation in the Individual ACA-compliant market. In all other markets, we intend to maintain our position by delivering
excellent service, offering competitively priced products, providing access to high-quality provider networks and effectively
capitalizing on the brand strength of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield names and marks.
Membership
Our medical membership includes seven different customer types: Local Group, Individual, National Accounts, BlueCard®,
Medicare, Medicaid and our Federal Employees Health Benefits, or FEHB, Program. BCBS-branded business generally refers to
members in our service areas licensed by the BCBSA. Non-BCBS-branded business refers to members in our non-BCBS-branded
Amerigroup, Freedom Health, HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare and Simply Healthcare plans, as well as HealthLink and UniCare
members. In addition to the above medical membership, we also serve customers who purchase one or more of our other products
or services that are often ancillary to our health business.
•Local Group consists of those employer customers with less than 5% of eligible employees located outside of the
headquarter state, as well as customers with more than 5% of eligible employees located outside of the headquarter state
with up to 5,000 eligible employees. In addition, Local Group includes UniCare members. Local Group accounts are
generally sold through brokers or consultants who work with industry specialists from our in-house sales force and are
offered both on and off the public exchanges. Local Group insurance premiums may be based on claims incurred by the
group or sold on a self-insured basis. The customer’s buying decision is typically based upon the size and breadth of our
networks, customer service, the quality of our medical management services, the administrative cost included in our
quoted price, our financial stability, our reputation and our ability to effectively service large complex accounts. Local
Group accounted for 38.2%, 39.4% and 39.4% of our medical members at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
•Individual consists of individual customers under age 65 and their covered dependents. Individual policies are generally
sold through independent agents and brokers, retail partnerships, our in-house sales force or via the exchanges. Individual
business is sold on a fully-insured basis. We offer on-exchange products through public exchanges and off-exchange
products. Federal premium subsidies are available only for certain public exchange Individual products. Unsubsidized
Individual customers are generally more sensitive to product pricing and, to a lesser extent, the configuration of the
network and the efficiency of administration. Customer turnover is generally higher with Individual as compared to Local
Group. Individual business accounted for 1.7%, 1.6% and 3.9% of our medical members at December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017, respectively.
•National Accounts generally consist of multi-state employer groups primarily headquartered in an Anthem service area
with at least 5% of the eligible employees located outside of the headquarter state and with more than 5,000 eligible
employees. Some exceptions are allowed based on broker and consultant relationships. Service area is defined as the
geographic area in which we are licensed to sell BCBS products. National Accounts are generally sold through
independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer working with our in-house sales force. We believe we have an
advantage when competing for very large National Accounts due to the size and breadth of our networks and our ability to
access the national provider networks of BCBS companies at their competitive local market rates. National Accounts
represented 18.5%, 19.0% and 18.5% of our medical members at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
•BlueCard® host customers represent enrollees of Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield plans not owned by Anthem who receive
healthcare services in our BCBSA licensed markets. BlueCard® membership consists of estimated host members using the
national BlueCard® program. Host members are generally members who reside in or travel to a state in which an Anthem
subsidiary is the Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensee and who are covered under an employer-sponsored health plan
issued by a non-Anthem controlled BCBSA licensee (i.e., the “home plan”). We perform certain administrative functions
for BlueCard® members, for which we receive administrative fees from the BlueCard® members’ home plans. Other
administrative functions, including maintenance of enrollment information and customer service, are performed by the
home plan. Host members are computed using, among other things, the
-49-
average number of BlueCard® claims received per month. BlueCard® host membership accounted for 14.8%, 14.6% and
14.2% of our medical members at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
•Medicare customers are Medicare-eligible individual members age 65 and over who have enrolled in Medicare
Supplement plans; Medicare Advantage, including Special Needs Plans or SNPs, also known as Medicare Advantage
SNPs; Medicare Part D; and dual-eligible programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans, or MMPs. Medicare Supplement
plans typically pay the difference between healthcare costs incurred by a beneficiary and amounts paid by Medicare.
Medicare Advantage plans provide Medicare beneficiaries with a managed care alternative to traditional Medicare and
often include a Medicare Part D benefit. In addition, our Medicare Advantage SNPs provide tailored benefits to special
needs individuals who are institutionalized or have severe or disabling chronic conditions and to dual-eligible customers,
who are low-income seniors and persons under age 65 with disabilities. Medicare Advantage SNPs are coordinated care
plans specifically designed to provide targeted care, covering all the health care services considered medically necessary
for members and often providing professional care coordination services, with personal guidance and programs that help
members maintain their health. Medicare Advantage membership also includes Employer Group Medicare Advantage
members who are related to National Accounts or retired members of Local Group accounts who have selected a Medicare
Advantage product. Medicare Part D offers a prescription drug plan to Medicare and MMP beneficiaries. MMP, which was
established as a result of the passage of the ACA, is a demonstration program focused on serving members who are dually
eligible for Medicaid and Medicare. Medicare Supplement and Medicare Advantage products are marketed in the same
manner, primarily through independent agents and brokers. Medicare business accounted for 5.2%, 4.6% and 3.9% of our
medical members at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
•Medicaid membership represents eligible members who receive healthcare benefits through publicly funded healthcare
programs, including Medicaid, ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
programs for seniors and people with disabilities, Children’s Health Insurance Programs, and specialty programs such as
those focused on long-term services and support, HIV/AIDS, foster care, behavioral health and/or substance abuse
disorders, and intellectual disabilities or developmental disabilities, among others. Total Medicaid program business
accounted for 17.7%, 16.8% and 16.1% of our medical members at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
•FEHB members consist of United States government employees and their dependents within our geographic markets
through our participation in the national contract between the BCBSA and the U.S. Office of Personnel Management.
FEHB business accounted for 3.9% of our medical members at each of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017.
In addition to reporting our medical membership by customer type, we report by funding arrangement according to the level of
risk that we assume in the product contract. Our two principal funding arrangement categories are fully-insured and self-funded.
Fully-insured products are products in which we indemnify our policyholders against costs for health benefits. Self-funded products
are offered to customers, generally larger employers, who elect to retain most or all of the financial risk associated with their
employees’ healthcare costs. Some self-funded customers choose to purchase stop loss coverage to limit their retained risk.
-50-
The following table presents our medical membership by customer type, funding arrangement and reportable segment as of
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017. Also included below is other membership by product. The medical membership and other
membership presented are unaudited and in certain instances include estimates of the number of members represented by each
contract at the end of the period.
  December  31  2019 vs. 2018 2018 vs. 2017
(In thousands) 2019 2018 2017  Change % Change Change % Change
Medical Membership       
Customer  Type       
Local Group 15,682 15,733 15,888  (51) (0.3)% (155) (1.0)%
Individual 684 655 1,588  29 4.4 % (933) (58.8 )%
National:       
National Accounts 7,596 7,588 7,463  8 0.1 % 125 1.7 %
BlueCard®6,060 5,838 5,733  222 3.8 % 105 1.8 %
Total National 13,656 13,426 13,196  230 1.7 % 230 1.7 %
Medicare:       
Medicare Advantage 1,214 1,006 746  208 20.7 % 260 34.9 %
Medicare Supplement 905 846 823  59 7.0 % 23 2.8 %
Total Medicare 2,119 1,852 1,569  267 14.4 % 283 18.0 %
Medicaid 7,265 6,716 6,496  549 8.2 % 220 3.4 %
FEHB 1,594 1,556 1,562  38 2.4 % (6) (0.4)%
Total Medical Membership by Customer Type 41,000 39,938 40,299  1,062 2.7 % (361) (0.9)%
Funding Arrangement       
Self-Funded 25,418 25,287 24,862  131 0.5 % 425 1.7 %
Fully-Insured 15,582 14,651 15,437  931 6.4 % (786) (5.1)%
Total Medical Membership by Funding Arrangement 41,000 39,938 40,299  1,062 2.7 % (361) (0.9)%
Reportable Segment       
Commercial & Specialty Business 30,022 29,814 30,672  208 0.7 % (858) (2.8)%
Government Business 10,978 10,124 9,627  854 8.4 % 497 5.2 %
Total Medical Membership by Reportable Segment 41,000 39,938 40,299  1,062 2.7 % (361) (0.9)%
Other  Membership       
Life and Disability Members 5,259 4,795 4,700  464 9.7 % 95 2.0 %
Dental Members 5,962 5,807 5,864  155 2.7 % (57) (1.0)%
Dental Administration Members 5,516 5,327 5,342  189 3.5 % (15) (0.3)%
Vision Members 7,261 6,946 6,867  315 4.5 % 79 1.2 %
Medicare Part D Standalone Members 283 309 318  (26) (8.4)% (9) (2.8)%
December 31, 2019 Compared to December 31, 2018
Medical Membership
Total medical membership increased across our reportable business segments, and the increase was driven primarily by growth
in our fully-insured businesses. Fully-insured membership increased primarily due to growth in our Medicaid and Medicare
businesses. Self-funded medical membership increased primarily due to higher activity from BlueCard® membership, partially
offset by the decrease in our Large Group self-funded membership, which declined as a result of competitive pressures. Medicaid
membership increased primarily due to expansions in new and existing markets, partially offset by the membership decrease
resulting from the loss of a contract. Medicare membership increased primarily due to
-51-
higher sales during open enrollment exceeding lapses. BlueCard® membership increased due to higher activity by members of other
BCBSA plans who reside in or travel to our licensed areas.
Other Membership
Growth in our other membership can be impacted by changes in our medical membership, as our medical members often
purchase our other products that are ancillary to our health business. We have experienced growth in our life and disability and
dental memberships primarily due to higher sales in our Large Group business. Vision membership increased primarily due to
higher sales in our Medicare Advantage plans and Large Group business. Dental administration membership increased primarily
due to growth in our FEHB program.
-52-
Consolidated Results of Operations
Our consolidated summarized results of operations and other information for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017 are as follows:
     Change
 Years Ended December 31  2019 vs. 2018 2018 vs. 2017
 2019  2018  2017  $  % $  %
Total operating revenue $103,141  $ 91,341  $ 89,061  $11,800  12.9 % $2,280  2.6 %
Net investment income 1,005  970  867  35 3.6 % 103  11.9 %
Net realized gains (losses) on financial
instruments 114  (180) 145  294  163.3  % (325) (224.1 )%
Other -than-temporary impairment
losses recognized in income (47) (26) (33) (21) (80.8 )% 7 21.2 %
Total r evenues 104,213  92,105  90,040  12,108  13.1 % 2,065  2.3 %
Benefit expense 81,786  71,895  72,236  9,891  13.8 % (341) (0.5)%
Cost of products sold 1,992  —  —  1,992  NM — —
Selling, general and administrative
expense 13,364  14,020  12,650  (656) (4.7)% 1,370  10.8 %
Other expense1 1,086  1,122  1,190  (36) (3.2)% (68) (5.7)%
Total expenses 98,228  87,037  86,076  11,191  12.9 % 961  1.1 %
Income befor e income tax expense 5,985  5,068  3,964  917  18.1 % 1,104  27.9 %
Income tax expense 1,178  1,318  121  (140) (10.6 )% 1,197  989.3  %
Net income $ 4,807  $ 3,750  $ 3,843  $1,057  28.2 % $ (93) (2.4)%
        
Average diluted shares outstanding 260.3  264.2  267.8  (3.9) (1.5)% (3.6) (1.3)%
Diluted net income per share $ 18.47  $ 14.19  $ 14.35  $ 4.28  30.2 % $(0.16 ) (1.1)%
Effective tax rate 19.7% 26.0% 3.1%  (630)bp3  2,290bp3
Benefit expense ratio286.8% 84.2% 86.4%  260bp3  (220)bp3
Selling, general and administrative
expense ratio4 13.0% 15.3% 14.2%  (230)bp3  110bp3
Income before income tax expense as a
percentage of total revenues 5.7% 5.5% 4.4%  20bp3  110bp3
Net income as a percentage of total
revenues 4.6% 4.1% 4.3%  50bp3  (20)bp3
Certain of the following definitions are also applicable to all other results of operations tables in this discussion:
NM Not meaningful.
1 Includes interest expense, amortization of other intangible assets and loss on extinguishment of debt.
2 Benefit expense ratio represents benefit expense as a percentage of premium revenue. Premiums for the years ended December 31, 2019 ,
2018  and 2017  were $94,173 , $85,421  and $83,648 , respectively . Premiums are included in total operating revenue presented above.
3 bp = basis point; one hundred basis points = 1%.
4 Selling, general and administrative expense ratio represents selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of total operating
revenue.
Year Ended December 31, 2019 Compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2018
The increase in total operating revenue was primarily from higher premiums, and, to a lesser extent, increased administrative
fees and other revenue. The higher premiums were largely due to Medicaid expansions in new and existing markets and
membership growth in our Medicare business. The increase in premiums was further attributable to rate increases across our
businesses designed to cover overall cost trends. These increases in premiums were partially offset by the impact of the HIP Fee
suspension for 2019. The increase in administrative fees and other revenue was primarily driven by IngenioRx, our PBM, which
began its operations during the second quarter of 2019.
-53-
We recognized net realized gains on financial instruments in 2019 compared to net realized losses on financial instruments in
2018. This change was primarily due to a decrease in the net losses recognized for changes in the fair values of our equity
securities.
Benefit expense increased primarily due to membership growth across our reportable business segments and higher medical
cost experience in our Medicaid business.
Our benefit expense ratio increased largely due to the loss of revenue associated with the HIP Fee suspension for 2019, and, to
a lesser extent, less favorable prior year reserve development in our Commercial & Specialty business segment during 2019 and
margin normalization in our Individual business.
Cost of products sold reflects the cost of pharmaceuticals dispensed by IngenioRx for our self-funded customers. IngenioRx
began operations during the second quarter of 2019, so there was no cost of products sold recognized in 2018.
Selling, general and administrative expense decreased primarily due to the suspension of the HIP Fee for 2019. This decrease
was partially offset by a net increase in spend to support growth in our businesses.
Our selling, general and administrative expense ratio decreased due to the growth in total operating revenue and the suspension
of the HIP Fee for 2019.
Our effective tax rate decreased primarily due to the suspension of the non-tax deductible HIP Fee for 2019.
Our net income as a percentage of total revenue increased as a result of all factors discussed above.
Reportable Segments Results of Operations
We use operating gain to evaluate the performance of our reportable segments, which are Commercial & Specialty Business,
Government Business, and Other. Operating gain is calculated as total operating revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold
and selling, general and administrative expense. It does not include net investment income, net realized gains (losses) on financial
instruments, other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income, interest expense, amortization of other intangible
assets, loss (gain) on extinguishment of debt or income taxes, as these items are managed in a corporate shared service environment
and are not the responsibility of operating segment management.
The discussion of segment results presented below are based on operating gain, as described above, and operating margin,
which is calculated as operating gain divided by operating revenue. Our definitions of operating gain and operating margin may not
be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies. For additional information, see Note 19, “Segment
Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-54-
The following table presents a summary of our reportable segment financial information for the years ended December 31,
2019, 2018 and 2017:
      Change
  Years Ended December  31 2019 vs. 2018 2018 vs. 2017
  2019  2018 2017 $  % $ %
Operating Revenue     
Commercial & Specialty
Business $ 37,421  $ 35,782 $ 40,363 1,639  4.6 % (4,581 ) (11.3)%
Government Business 62,632  55,348 48,587 7,284  13.2 % 6,761 13.9 %
Other 7,695  1,519 127 6,176  406.6  % 1,392 NM
Eliminations (4,607 ) (1,308 ) (16) (3,299 ) NM (1,292 ) NM
Total operating revenue $103,141  $ 91,341 $ 89,061 $11,800  12.9 % $ 2,280 2.6 %
     
Operating Gain (Loss)     
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 4,046  $ 3,600 $ 2,847 446  12.4 % 753 26.4 %
Government Business 2,054  1,928 1,442 126  6.5 % 486 33.7 %
Other (101) (102) (114) 1 (1.0)% 12 (10.5 )%
     
Operating Margin     
Commercial & Specialty Business 10.8% 10.1% 7.1%  70bp1 300bp1
Government Business 3.3% 3.5% 3.0%  (20)bp1 50bp1
NM    Not meaningful.
1 bp = basis point; one hundred basis points = 1%.
Year Ended December 31, 2019 Compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2018
Commercial & Specialty Business
Operating revenue increased primarily due to higher premium revenue and, to a lesser extent, increased administrative fees and
other revenue. Premium revenue was higher as a result of rate increases in our Local Group business designed to cover overall cost
trends and membership increases in our fully-insured businesses. These increases in premium revenue were partially offset by the
impact of the HIP Fee suspension for 2019. The increase in administrative fees and other revenue was due to higher penetration of
value-added services for self-funded members in our Large Group and National Accounts businesses.
The increase in operating gain was primarily driven by the benefits realized in pharmacy cost as a result of the launch of
IngenioRx in 2019 and greater penetration of value-added services and integrated health offerings. These increases were partially
offset by less favorable prior year reserve development during 2019 and margin normalization in our Individual business.
Government Business
Operating revenue increased primarily due to higher premium revenue as a result of Medicaid expansions in new and existing
markets, including specialized service populations, and membership growth in our Medicare business. The increase in premium
revenue was further attributable to rate increases designed to cover overall cost trends in our Medicare and Medicaid businesses as
well as increased reimbursed benefit utilization in our Federal Health Products & Services business. These increases were partially
offset by the impact of the HIP Fee suspension for 2019.
The increase in operating gain was primarily driven by the impact of premium increases due to rate adjustments and
membership growth in our Medicaid business. This increase was partially offset by the impact of the HIP Fee suspension for 2019
and an increase in selling, general and administrative spend to support growth in our businesses.
-55-
Other
Operating revenue increased due to higher administrative fees and other revenue from IngenioRx and DBG. The increase was
primarily driven by growth in our pharmacy services provided by IngenioRx, which commenced operations and began transitioning
existing clients from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019.
Operating loss remained steady, as there were no substantial changes in unallocated corporate expenses. For our segment
reporting, operating gains (losses) generated from IngenioRx and DBG affiliated activity have been included in our Commercial &
Specialty Business and Government Business based upon their utilization of services from IngenioRx and DBG.
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
We prepare our consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP. Application of GAAP requires management to
make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes
and within this MD&A. We consider our most important accounting policies that require significant estimates and management
judgment to be those policies with respect to liabilities for medical claims payable, income taxes, goodwill and other intangible
assets, investments and retirement benefits, which are discussed below. Our other significant accounting policies are summarized in
Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in
Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We continually evaluate the accounting policies and estimates used to prepare the consolidated financial statements. In general,
our estimates are based on historical experience, evaluation of current trends, information from third-party professionals and
various other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the known facts and circumstances. Estimates can require a
significant amount of judgment and a different set of assumptions could result in material changes to our reported results.
Medical Claims Payable
The most subjective accounting estimate in our consolidated financial statements is our liability for medical claims payable. At
December 31, 2019, this liability was $8,842 and represented 19% of our total consolidated liabilities. We record this liability and
the corresponding benefit expense for incurred but not paid claims, including the estimated costs of processing such claims.
Incurred but not paid claims include (1) an estimate for claims that are incurred but not reported, as well as claims reported to us
but not yet processed through our systems, which approximated 98%, or $8,633, of our total medical claims liability as of
December 31, 2019; and (2) claims reported to us and processed through our systems but not yet paid, which approximated 2%, or
$209, of the total medical claims payable as of December 31, 2019. The level of claims payable processed through our systems but
not yet paid may fluctuate from one period-end to the next, from approximately 1% to 5% of our total medical claims liability, due
to timing of when claim payments are made.
Liabilities for both claims incurred but not reported and reported but not yet processed through our systems are determined in
the aggregate, employing actuarial methods that are commonly used by health insurance actuaries and meet Actuarial Standards of
Practice. Actuarial Standards of Practice require that the claim liabilities be appropriate under moderately adverse circumstances.
We determine the amount of the liability for incurred but not paid claims by following a detailed actuarial process that uses both
historical claim payment patterns as well as emerging medical cost trends to project our best estimate of claim liabilities. Under this
process, historical paid claims data is formatted into “claim triangles,” which compare claim incurred dates to the dates of claim
payments. This information is analyzed to create “completion factors” that represent the average percentage of total incurred claims
that have been paid through a given date after being incurred. Completion factors are applied to claims paid through the period-end
date to estimate the ultimate claim expense incurred for the period. Actuarial estimates of incurred but not paid claim liabilities are
then determined by subtracting the actual paid claims from the estimate of the ultimate incurred claims. 
For the most recent incurred months (typically the most recent two months), the percentage of claims paid for claims incurred
in those months is generally low. This makes the completion factor methodology less reliable for such months. Therefore, incurred
claims for recent months are not projected from historical completion and payment patterns; rather, they are projected by estimating
the claims expense for those months based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare trend levels, or “trend factors.”
-56-
Because the reserve methodology is based upon historical information, it must be adjusted for known or suspected operational
and environmental changes. These adjustments are made by our actuaries based on their knowledge and their estimate of emerging
impacts to benefit costs and payment speed. Circumstances to be considered in developing our best estimate of reserves include
changes in utilization levels, unit costs, mix of business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement levels, processing system
conversions and changes, claim inventory levels, claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and operational changes
resulting from business combinations. A comparison of prior period liabilities to re-estimated claim liabilities based on subsequent
claims development is also considered in making the liability determination. In our comparison to prior periods, the methods and
assumptions are not changed as reserves are recalculated; rather, the availability of additional paid claims information drives
changes in the re-estimate of the unpaid claim liability. To the extent appropriate, changes in such development are recorded as a
change to current period benefit expense.
We regularly review and set assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization when initially establishing claim liabilities. We
continually monitor and adjust the claims liability and benefit expense based on subsequent paid claims activity. If it is determined
that our assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization are materially different than actual results, our income statement and
financial position could be impacted in future periods. Adjustments of prior year estimates may result in additional benefit expense
or a reduction of benefit expense in the period an adjustment is made. Further, due to the considerable variability of healthcare
costs, adjustments to claim liabilities occur each period and are sometimes significant as compared to the net income recorded in
that period. Prior period development is recognized immediately upon the actuary’s judgment that a portion of the prior period
liability is no longer needed or that an additional liability should have been accrued. That determination is made when sufficient
information is available to ascertain that the re-estimate of the liability is reasonable.
While there are many factors that are used as a part of the estimation of our medical claims payable liability, the two key
assumptions having the most significant impact on our incurred but not paid claims liability as of December 31, 2019 were the
completion and trend factors. As discussed above, these two key assumptions can be influenced by utilization levels, unit costs, mix
of business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement levels, processing system conversions and changes, claim inventory
levels, claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and operational changes resulting from business combinations.
There is variation in the reasonable choice of completion factors by duration for durations of three months through twelve
months where the completion factors have the most significant impact. As previously discussed, completion factors tend to be less
reliable for the most recent months and therefore are not specifically utilized for months one and two. In our analysis for the claim
liabilities at December 31, 2019, the variability in months three to five was estimated to be between 40 and 90 basis points, while
months six through twelve have much lower estimated variability ranging from 0 to 30 basis points.
The difference in completion factor assumptions, assuming moderately adverse experience, results in variability of 3%, or
approximately $241, in the December 31, 2019 incurred but not paid claims liability, depending on the completion factors chosen.
It is important to note that the completion factor methodology inherently assumes that historical completion rates will be reflective
of the current period. However, it is possible that the actual completion rates for the current period will develop differently from
historical patterns and therefore could fall outside the possible variations described herein.
The other major assumption used in the establishment of the December 31, 2019 incurred but not paid claim liability was the
trend factors. In our analysis for the period ended December 31, 2019, there was a 320 basis point differential in the high and low
trend factors assuming moderately adverse experience. This range of trend factors would imply variability of 5%, or approximately
$468, in the incurred but not paid claims liability, depending upon the trend factors used. Because historical trend factors are often
not representative of current claim trends, the trend experience for the most recent six to nine months, plus knowledge of recent
events likely affecting current trends, have been taken into consideration in establishing the incurred but not paid claims liability at
December 31, 2019. 
See Note 11, “Medical Claims Payable,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a reconciliation of the beginning and ending balance for medical claims payable for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017. Components of the total incurred claims for each year include amounts accrued for
current year estimated claims expense as well as adjustments to prior year estimated accruals. In Note 11, “Medical Claims
Payable,” the line labeled “Net incurred medical claims: Prior years redundancies” accounts for those
-57-
adjustments made to prior year estimates. The impact of any reduction of “Net incurred medical claims: Prior years redundancies”
may be offset as we establish the estimate of “Net incurred medical claims: Current year.” Our reserving practice is to consistently
recognize the actuarial best estimate of our ultimate liability for our claims. When we recognize a release of the redundancy, we
disclose the amount that is not in the ordinary course of business, if material.  
The ratio of current year medical claims paid as a percent of current year net medical claims incurred was 89.3% for 2019,
90.2% for 2018 and 89.4% for 2017. This ratio serves as an indicator of claims processing speed whereby claims were processed
slightly slower during 2019 than in 2018 and close to the same speed as in 2017.
We calculate the percentage of prior year redundancies in the current year as a percent of prior year net incurred claims payable
less prior year redundancies in the current year in order to demonstrate the development of the prior year reserves. For the year
ended December 31, 2019, this metric was 7.4%, largely driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2018 as well as
favorable completion factor development from 2018. For the year ended December 31, 2018, this metric was 13.7%, largely driven
by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2017 as well as favorable completion factor development from 2017. For the
year ended December 31, 2017, this metric was 18.9%, largely driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2016.
We calculate the percentage of prior year redundancies in the current year as a percent of prior year net incurred medical
claims to indicate the percentage of redundancy included in the preceding year calculation of current year net incurred medical
claims. We believe this calculation supports the reasonableness of our prior year estimate of incurred medical claims and the
consistency in our methodology. For the year ended December 31, 2019, this metric was 0.7%, which was calculated using the
redundancy of $500. This metric was 1.3% for 2018 and 1.8% for 2017. These metrics demonstrate a generally consistent level of
reserve conservatism.
The following table shows the variance between total net incurred medical claims as reported in Note 11, “Medical Claims
Payable,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, for
each of 2018 and 2017 and the incurred claims for such years had it been determined retrospectively (computed as the difference
between “net incurred medical claims – current year” for the year shown and “net incurred medical claims – prior years
redundancies” for the immediately following year):
 Years Ended December 31
 2018 2017
Total net incurred medical claims, as reported $ 68,651 $ 69,244
Retrospective basis, as described above 69,081 69,447
Variance $ (430) $ (203)
Variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported (0.6)% (0.3)%
Given that our business is primarily short tailed (which means that medical claims are generally paid within twelve months of
the member receiving service from the provider), the variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported above, is used to
assess the reasonableness of our estimate of ultimate incurred medical claims for a given calendar year with the benefit of one year
of experience. We expect that substantially all of the development of the 2019 estimate of medical claims payable will be known
during 2020.
The 2018 variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported of (0.6)% was higher than the 2017 percentage of
(0.3)%. This was driven by the fact that the change in the prior year redundancy reported for 2019 as compared to 2018 was greater
than the change in the prior year redundancy reported for 2018 as compared to 2017.
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes in accordance with FASB guidance, which requires, among other things, the separate recognition
of deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities. Such deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities represent the tax effect of
temporary differences between financial reporting and tax reporting measured at tax rates enacted at the time the deferred tax asset
or liability is recorded. A valuation allowance must be established for deferred tax assets if it is “more
-58-
likely than not” that all or a portion may be unrealized. Our judgment is required in determining an appropriate valuation
allowance.
At each financial reporting date, we assess the adequacy of the valuation allowance by evaluating each of our deferred tax
assets based on the following:
•the types of temporary differences that created the deferred tax asset;
•the amount of taxes paid in prior periods and available for a carry-back claim;
•the tax rate at which the deferred tax assets will likely be utilized in the future;
•the forecasted future taxable income, and therefore, likely future deduction of the deferred tax item; and
•any significant other issues impacting the likely realization of the benefit of the temporary differences.
We, like other companies, frequently face challenges from tax authorities regarding the amount of taxes due. These challenges
include questions regarding the timing and amount of deductions that we have taken on our tax returns. In evaluating any additional
tax liability associated with various positions taken in our tax return filings, we record additional liabilities for potential adverse tax
outcomes. Based on our evaluation of our tax positions, we believe we have appropriately accrued for uncertain tax benefits, as
required by the applicable guidance. To the extent we prevail in matters we have accrued for, our future effective tax rate would be
reduced and net income would increase. If we are required to pay more than accrued, our future effective tax rate would increase
and net income would decrease. Our effective tax rate and net income in any given future period could be materially impacted.
In the ordinary course of business, we are regularly audited by federal and other tax authorities, and from time to time, these
audits result in proposed assessments. We believe our tax positions comply with applicable tax law, and we intend to defend our
positions vigorously through the federal, state and local appeals processes. We believe we have adequately provided for any
reasonably foreseeable outcome related to these matters. Accordingly, although their ultimate resolution may require additional tax
payments, we do not anticipate any material impact on our results of operations or financial condition from these matters.
For additional information, see Note 7, “Income Taxes,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
Our consolidated goodwill at December 31, 2019 was $20,500 and other intangible assets were $8,674. The sum of goodwill
and other intangible assets represented 37.7% of our total consolidated assets and 92.0% of our consolidated shareholders’ equity at
December 31, 2019.
We follow FASB guidance for business combinations and goodwill and other intangible assets, which specifies the types of
acquired intangible assets that are required to be recognized and reported separately from goodwill. Under the guidance, goodwill
and other intangible assets (with indefinite lives) are not amortized but are tested for impairment at least annually. Furthermore,
goodwill and other intangible assets are allocated to reporting units for purposes of the annual impairment test. Our impairment
tests require us to make assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units, which include
goodwill and other intangible assets. In addition, certain other intangible assets with indefinite lives, such as trademarks, are also
tested separately.
We complete our annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives during the fourth
quarter of each year. These tests involve the use of estimates related to the fair value of goodwill at the reporting unit level and
other intangible assets with indefinite lives, and require a significant degree of management judgment and the use of subjective
assumptions. Certain interim impairment tests are also performed when potential impairment indicators exist or changes in our
business or other triggering events occur. We have the option of first performing a qualitative assessment for each reporting unit to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount, which is an
indication that our goodwill may be impaired. These qualitative impairment tests include assessing events and factors that could
affect the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible assets. Our procedures include assessing our financial performance,
macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific
-59-
factors and entity specific events. If we determine that a reporting unit’s goodwill may be impaired after utilizing these qualitative
impairment analysis procedures, we are required to perform a quantitative impairment test.
Our quantitative impairment test utilizes the projected income and market valuation approaches for goodwill and the projected
income approach for our indefinite lived intangible assets. Use of the projected income and market valuation approaches for our
goodwill impairment test reflects our view that both valuation methodologies provide a reasonable estimate of fair value. The
projected income approach is developed using assumptions about future revenue, expenses and net income derived from our
internal planning process. These estimated future cash flows are then discounted. Our assumed discount rate is based on our
industry’s weighted-average cost of capital. Market valuations are based on observed multiples of certain measures including
revenue; earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization; and book value of invested capital (debt and equity) and
include market comparisons to publicly traded companies in our industry.
We did not incur any impairment losses as a result of our 2019 annual impairment tests, as it was determined that it is more
likely than not that the estimated fair values of our reporting units were substantially in excess of the carrying values as of
December 31, 2019. Additionally, we do not believe that the estimated fair values of our reporting units are at risk of becoming
impaired in the next twelve months.
If estimated fair values are less than the carrying values of goodwill and other intangibles with indefinite lives in future annual
impairment tests, or if significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may
be required to record impairment losses against future income.
For additional information, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions” and Note 9, “Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
Investments
Current and long-term marketable investment securities were $21,220 at December 31, 2019 and represented 27.4% of our
total consolidated assets at December 31, 2019. We classify fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio as “available-for-
sale” or “trading” and report those securities at fair value. Certain fixed maturity securities are available to support current
operations and, accordingly, we classify such investments as current assets without regard to their contractual maturity. Investments
used to satisfy contractual, regulatory or other requirements are classified as long-term, without regard to contractual maturity.
We review fixed maturity investment securities to determine if declines in fair value below cost are other-than-temporary. This
review is subjective and requires a high degree of judgment. We conduct this review on a quarterly basis, using both qualitative and
quantitative factors, to determine whether a decline in value is other-than-temporary. Such factors considered include the extent to
which a security’s market value has been less than its cost, the reasons for the decline in value (i.e., credit event compared to
liquidity, general credit spread widening, currency exchange rate or interest rate factors), financial condition and near term
prospects of the issuer, including the credit ratings and changes in the credit ratings of the issuer, recommendations of investment
advisors, and forecasts of economic, market or industry trends.
FASB other-than-temporary impairment, or OTTI, guidance applies to fixed maturity securities and provides guidance on the
recognition, presentation of, and disclosures for OTTIs. If a fixed maturity security is in an unrealized loss position and we have the
intent to sell the fixed maturity security, or it is more likely than not that we will have to sell the fixed maturity security before
recovery of its amortized cost basis, the decline in value is deemed to be other-than-temporary and is presented within the other-
than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements of income. For impaired fixed maturity securities that
we do not intend to sell or it is more likely than not that we will not have to sell such securities, but we expect that we will not fully
recover the amortized cost basis, the credit component of the OTTI is presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses
recognized in our consolidated statements of income and the non-credit component of the OTTI is recognized in accumulated other
comprehensive loss in our consolidated balance sheets. Furthermore, unrealized losses entirely caused by non-credit related factors
related to fixed maturity securities for which we expect to fully recover the amortized cost basis continue to be recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive loss. 
The credit component of an OTTI is determined primarily by comparing the net present value of projected future cash flows
with the amortized cost basis of the fixed maturity security. The net present value is calculated by discounting our best estimate of
projected future cash flows at the effective interest rate implicit in the fixed maturity security at the date of
-60-
acquisition. For mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities, cash flow estimates are based on assumptions regarding the
underlying collateral, including prepayment speeds, vintage, type of underlying asset, geographic concentrations, default rates,
recoveries and changes in value. For all other securities, cash flow estimates are driven by assumptions regarding probability of
default, including changes in credit ratings and estimates regarding timing and amount of recoveries associated with a default.
We have a committee of accounting and investment associates and management that is responsible for managing the
impairment review process. We believe we have adequately reviewed our investment securities for impairment and that our
investment securities are carried at fair value. However, over time, the economic and market environment may provide additional
insight regarding the fair value of certain securities, which could change our judgment regarding impairment. This could result in
OTTI losses on investments being charged against future income. Given the uncertainty of future market conditions, as well as the
significant judgments involved, there is continuing risk that declines in fair value may occur and material OTTI losses on
investments may be recorded in future periods.
In addition to marketable investment securities, we held additional long-term investments of $4,228, or 5.5% of total
consolidated assets, at December 31, 2019. These long-term investments consisted primarily of certain other equity investments,
the cash surrender value of corporate-owned life insurance policies and real estate. Due to their less liquid nature, these investments
are classified as long-term.
Through our investing activities, we are exposed to financial market risks, including those resulting from changes in interest
rates and changes in equity market valuations. We manage market risks through our investment policy, which establishes credit
quality limits and limits on investments in individual issuers. Ineffective management of these risks could have an impact on our
future results of operations and financial condition. Our investment portfolio includes fixed maturity securities with a fair value of
$20,181 at December 31, 2019. The weighted-average credit rating of these securities was “A” as of December 31, 2019. Included
in this balance are investments in fixed maturity securities of states, municipalities and political subdivisions of $900 that are
guaranteed by third parties. With the exception of four securities with a fair value of $12, these securities are all investment-grade
and carry a weighted-average credit rating of “A” as of December 31, 2019. The securities are guaranteed by a number of different
guarantors, and we do not have any material exposure to any single guarantor, neither indirectly through the guarantees, nor
directly through investment in the guarantor. Further, due to the high underlying credit rating of the issuers, the weighted-average
credit rating of the fixed maturity securities without a guarantee, for which such information is available, was “A” as of
December 31, 2019.
Fair values of fixed maturity and equity securities are based on quoted market prices, where available. These fair values are
obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or Level II inputs for the determination of fair
value in accordance with FASB guidance for fair value measurements and disclosures. We have controls in place to review the
pricing services’ qualifications and procedures used to determine fair values. In addition, we periodically review the pricing
services’ pricing methodologies, data sources and pricing inputs to ensure the fair values obtained are reasonable.
We obtain quoted market prices for each security from the pricing services, which are derived through recently reported trades
for identical or similar securities, making adjustments through the reporting date based upon available market observable
information. For securities not actively traded, the pricing services may use quoted market prices of comparable instruments or
discounted cash flow analyses, incorporating inputs that are currently observable in the markets for similar securities. Inputs that
are often used in these valuation methodologies include, but are not limited to, broker quotes, benchmark yields, credit spreads,
default rates and prepayment speeds. As we are responsible for the determination of fair value, we perform analysis on the prices
received from the pricing services to determine whether the prices are reasonable estimates of fair value. Our analysis includes
procedures such as a review of month-to-month price fluctuations and price comparisons to secondary pricing services. There were
no adjustments to quoted market prices obtained from the pricing services during the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018.
In certain circumstances, it may not be possible to derive pricing model inputs from observable market activity, and therefore,
such inputs are estimated internally. Such securities are designated Level III in accordance with FASB guidance. Securities
designated Level III at December 31, 2019 totaled $397 and represented approximately 1.7% of our total assets measured at fair
value on a recurring basis. Our Level III securities primarily consisted of certain corporate securities and equity securities for which
observable inputs were not always available and the fair values of these securities were estimated using inputs including, but not
limited to, prepayment speeds, credit spreads, default rates and benchmark yields.
-61-
For additional information, see Part II, Item 7A “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk,” and Note 2,
“Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” Note 4, “Investments,” and Note 6, “Fair Value,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Retirement Benefits
Pension Benefits
We sponsor defined benefit pension plans for some of our employees. These plans are accounted for in accordance with FASB
guidance for retirement benefits, which requires that amounts recognized in financial statements be determined on an actuarial
basis. As permitted by the guidance, we calculate the value of plan assets as described below. Further, the difference between our
expected rate of return and the actual performance of plan assets, as well as certain changes in pension liabilities, are amortized
over future periods. 
An important factor in determining our pension expense is the assumption for expected long-term return on plan assets. As of
our December 31, 2019 measurement date, we selected a weighted-average long-term rate of return on plan assets of 7.33%. We
use a total portfolio return analysis in the development of our assumption. Factors such as past market performance, the long-term
relationship between fixed maturity and equity securities, interest rates, inflation and asset allocations are considered in the
assumption. The assumption includes an estimate of the additional return expected from active management of the investment
portfolio. Peer data and an average of historical returns are also reviewed for appropriateness of the selected assumption. We
believe our assumption of future returns is reasonable. However, if we lower our expected long-term return on plan assets, future
contributions to the pension plan and pension expense would likely increase.
This assumed long-term rate of return on assets is applied to a calculated value of plan assets, which recognizes changes in the
fair value of plan assets in a systematic manner over three years, producing the expected return on plan assets that is included in the
determination of pension expense. We apply a corridor approach to amortize unrecognized actuarial gains or losses. Under this
approach, only accumulated net actuarial gains or losses in excess of 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the
fair value of plan assets are amortized over the average remaining service or lifetime of the workforce as a component of pension
expense. The net deferral of past asset gains or losses affects the calculated value of plan assets and, ultimately, future pension
expense. 
The discount rate reflects the current rate at which the pension liabilities could be effectively settled at the end of the year
based on our most recent measurement date. We use the annual spot rate approach for setting our discount rate. Under the spot rate
approach, individual spot rates from a full yield curve of published rates are used to discount each plan’s cash flows to determine
the plan’s obligation. At the December 31, 2019 measurement date, the weighted-average discount rate under the annual spot rate
approach was 3.11%, compared to 4.15% at the December 31, 2018 measurement date. The net effect of changes in the discount
rate, as well as the net effect of other changes in actuarial assumptions and experience, have been deferred and amortized as a
component of pension expense in accordance with FASB guidance.
In managing the plan assets, our objective is to be a responsible fiduciary while minimizing financial risk. Plan assets include a
diversified mix of equity securities, investment grade fixed maturity securities and other types of investments across a range of
sectors and levels of capitalization to maximize long-term return for a prudent level of risk. In addition to producing a reasonable
return, the investment strategy seeks to minimize the volatility in our expense and cash flow.
Effective January 1, 2019, we curtailed the benefits under the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B pension plan. All grandfathered
participants no longer have pay credits added to their accounts, but continue to earn interest on existing account balances.
Participants continue to earn years of pension service for vesting purposes.
Other Postretirement Benefits
We provide most associates with certain medical, vision and dental benefits upon retirement. We use various actuarial
assumptions, including a discount rate and the expected trend in healthcare costs, to estimate the costs and benefit obligations for
our retiree benefits.
-62-
At our December 31, 2019 measurement date, the selected discount rate for all plans was 2.93%, compared to a discount rate
of 4.04% at the December 31, 2018 measurement rate. We developed this rate using the annual spot rate approach as described
above.
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of pre-Medicare (those who are not currently
eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2019 measurement date was 7.00% for 2020 with a gradual
decline to 4.50% by the year 2028. The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of post-Medicare
(those who are currently eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2019 measurement date was 6.00% for
2020 with a gradual decline to 4.50% by the year 2028. These estimated trend rates are subject to change in the future. The
healthcare cost trend rate assumption affects the amounts reported. For example, an increase in the assumed healthcare cost trend
rate of one percentage point would increase the postretirement benefit obligation as of December 31, 2019 by $23 and would
increase service and interest costs by $1. Conversely, a decrease in the assumed healthcare cost trend rate of one percentage point
would decrease the postretirement benefit obligation as of December 31, 2019 by $20 and would decrease service and interest costs
by $1. 
For additional information regarding our retirement benefits, see Note 10, “Retirement Benefits,” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
New Accounting Pronouncements
For information regarding new accounting pronouncements that were issued or became effective during the year ended
December 31, 2019 that had, or are expected to have, a material impact on our financial position, results of operations or financial
statement disclosures, see the “Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance” and “Recent Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted”
sections of Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Introduction
Our cash receipts result primarily from premiums, administrative fees and other revenue, investment income, proceeds from
the sale or maturity of our investment securities, proceeds from borrowings, and proceeds from the issuance of common stock
under our employee stock plans. Cash disbursements result mainly from claims payments, administrative expenses, taxes,
purchases of investment securities, interest expense, payments on borrowings, acquisitions, capital expenditures, repurchases of our
debt securities and common stock and the payment of cash dividends. Cash outflows fluctuate with the amount and timing of
settlement of these transactions. Any future decline in our profitability would likely have an unfavorable impact on our liquidity.
We manage our cash, investments and capital structure so we are able to meet the short-term and long-term obligations of our
business while maintaining financial flexibility and liquidity. We forecast, analyze and monitor our cash flows to enable investment
and financing within the overall constraints of our financial strategy.
A substantial portion of the assets held by our regulated subsidiaries are in the form of cash and cash equivalents and
investments. After considering expected cash flows from operating activities, we generally invest cash that exceeds our near term
obligations in longer term marketable fixed maturity securities to improve our overall investment income returns. Our investment
strategy is to make investments consistent with insurance statutes and other regulatory requirements, while preserving our asset
base. Our investments are generally available-for-sale to meet liquidity and other needs. Our subsidiaries pay out excess capital
annually in the form of dividends to their respective parent companies for general corporate use, as permitted by applicable
regulations.
The availability of financing in the form of debt or equity is influenced by many factors, including our profitability, operating
cash flows, debt levels, debt ratings, contractual restrictions, regulatory requirements and market conditions. The securities and
credit markets have in the past experienced higher than normal volatility, although current market conditions are more stable.
During recent years, the federal government and various governmental agencies have taken a number of steps to improve liquidity
in the financial markets and strengthen the regulation of the financial services market. In addition,
-63-
governments around the world have developed their own plans to provide liquidity and security in the credit markets and to ensure
adequate capital in certain financial institutions. 
We have a $3,500 commercial paper program. Should commercial paper issuance be unavailable, we have the ability to use a
combination of cash on hand and/or our two senior revolving credit facilities, which provide for combined credit in the amount of
$3,500, to redeem any outstanding commercial paper upon maturity. Additionally, we believe the lenders participating in our credit
facilities would be willing and able to provide financing in accordance with their legal obligations. In addition to the senior
revolving credit facilities, we estimate that we expect to receive approximately $3,035 of dividends from our subsidiaries during
2020, which also provides further operating and financial flexibility. 
A summary of our major sources and uses of cash and cash equivalents for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
is as follows:
 Years Ended December  31  $ Change
 2019 2018  2017  2019 vs. 2018  2018 vs. 2017
Sour ces of Cash:      
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 6,061 $ 3,827  $ 4,185  $ 2,234  $ (358)
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls and redemptions of
investments, net of purchases — 1,929  — (1,929 ) 1,929
Issuance of common stock under Equity Units stock purchase
contracts — 1,250  — (1,250 ) 1,250
Issuances of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt,
net of repayments 608 — 3,653  608  (3,653 )
Issuances of common stock under employee stock plans 187 173  225  14 (52)
Changes in bank overdrafts — — 71 — (71)
Other sources of cash, net 254 174  703  80 (529)
Total sources of cash 7,110 7,353  8,837  (243) (1,484 )
Uses of Cash:      
Purchases of investments, net of proceeds from sales, maturities,
calls and redemptions (1,919 ) — (2,913 ) (1,919 ) 2,913
Purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired — (1,760 ) (2,080 ) 1,760  320
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,701 ) (1,685 ) (1,998 ) (16) 313
Purchases of property and equipment (1,077 ) (1,208 ) (791) 131  (417)
Repayments of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt,
net of issuances — (1,086 ) — 1,086  (1,086 )
Cash dividends (818) (776) (705) (42) (71)
Changes in bank overdrafts (169) (210) — 41 (210)
Other uses of cash, net (423) (301) (820) (122) 519
Total uses of cash (6,107 ) (7,026 ) (9,307 ) 919  2,281
Effect of foreign exchange rates on cash and cash equivalents — (2) 4 2 (6)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents $ 1,003 $ 325  $ (466) $ 678  $ 791
Liquidity—Year Ended December 31, 2019 Compared to Year Ended December 31, 2018
The increase in cash provided by operating activities was primarily due to the impact of membership growth in our Medicaid
and Medicare businesses as well as higher net income in 2019. These increases in operating cash flow were partially offset by the
impact of the timing of working capital changes.
Other significant changes in sources and uses of cash year-over-year included an increase in net purchases of investments in
2019 compared to net proceeds received from sales, maturities, calls and redemptions of investments in 2018, a decrease in cash
paid for acquisitions, an increase in net proceeds from the issuance of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt
-64-
in 2019 compared to net repayments in 2018 and cash received from the issuance of common stock under our Equity Units stock
purchase contracts in 2018 that did not recur in 2019.
Financial Condition
We maintained a strong financial condition and liquidity position, with consolidated cash, cash equivalents and investments in
fixed maturity and equity securities of $26,157 at December 31, 2019. Since December 31, 2018, total cash, cash equivalents and
investments in fixed maturity and equity securities increased by $3,518, primarily due to cash generated from operations and
issuances of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt, net of repayments. These increases were partially offset by cash used
for repurchases of our common stock, purchases of property and equipment and cash dividends paid to shareholders.
Many of our subsidiaries are subject to various government regulations that restrict the timing and amount of dividends and
other distributions that may be paid to their respective parent companies. Certain accounting practices prescribed by insurance
regulatory authorities, or statutory accounting practices, differ from GAAP. Changes that occur in statutory accounting practices, if
any, could impact our subsidiaries’ future dividend capacity. In addition, we have agreed to certain undertakings to regulatory
authorities, including the requirement to maintain certain capital levels in certain of our subsidiaries.
At December 31, 2019, we held $2,673 of cash, cash equivalents and investments at the parent company, which are available
for general corporate use, including investment in our businesses, acquisitions, potential future common stock repurchases and
dividends to shareholders, repurchases of debt securities and debt and interest payments. 
Debt
Periodically, we access capital markets and issue debt, or Notes, for long-term borrowing purposes, for example, to refinance
debt, to finance acquisitions or for share repurchases. Certain of these Notes may have a call feature that allows us to redeem the
Notes at any time at our option and/or a put feature that allows a Note holder to redeem the Notes upon the occurrence of both a
change in control event and a downgrade of the Notes below an investment grade rating. For more information on our debt,
including redemptions and issuances, see Note 12, “Debt” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We calculate our consolidated debt-to-capital ratio, a non-GAAP measure, from the amounts presented on our audited
consolidated balance sheets included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our debt-to-capital ratio is calculated
as total debt divided by total debt plus total shareholders’ equity. Total debt is the sum of short-term borrowings, current portion of
long-term debt, and long-term debt, less current portion. We believe our debt-to-capital ratio assists investors and rating agencies in
measuring our overall leverage and additional borrowing capacity. In addition, our bank covenants include a maximum debt-to-
capital ratio that we cannot and did not exceed. Our debt-to-capital ratio may not be comparable to similarly titled measures
reported by other companies. Our consolidated debt-to-capital ratio was 39.5% and 40.2% as of December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
Our senior debt is rated “A” by S&P Global, “BBB” by Fitch Ratings, Inc., “Baa2” by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc. and
“bbb+” by AM Best Company, Inc. We intend to maintain our senior debt investment grade ratings. If our credit ratings are
downgraded, our business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely impacted by limitations on future
borrowings and a potential increase in our borrowing costs.
Future Sources and Uses of Liquidity
We have a shelf registration statement on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission to register an unlimited amount of
any combination of debt or equity securities in one or more offerings. Specific information regarding terms and securities being
offered will be provided at the time of an offering. Proceeds from future offerings are expected to be used for general corporate
purposes, including, but not limited to, the repayment of debt, investments in or extensions of credit to our subsidiaries and the
financing of possible acquisitions or business expansions.
We have a senior revolving credit facility, or the 5-Year Facility, with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes. In
June 2019, we amended and restated the credit agreement for the 5-Year Facility to, among other things, extend the
-65-
maturity date from August 2020 to June 2024 and decrease the amount of credit available from $3,500 to $2,500. In June 2019, we
also entered into a 364-day senior revolving credit facility, or the 364-Day Facility, with a group of lenders for general corporate
purposes, which provides for credit in the amount of $1,000 and matures in June 2020. Our ability to borrow under these credit
facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants. We do not believe the restrictions contained in these covenants materially
affect our financial or operating flexibility. As of December 31, 2019, we were in compliance with all of our debt covenants. There
were no amounts outstanding under the 5-Year Facility or the 364-Day Facility at December 31, 2019.
Through certain subsidiaries, we have entered into multiple 364-day lines of credit, or the Subsidiary Credit Facilities, with
separate lenders for general corporate purposes. The Subsidiary Credit Facilities provide combined credit up to $600. Our ability to
borrow under the Subsidiary Credit Facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants. At December 31, 2019, we had $50
outstanding under the Subsidiary Credit Facilities.
We have an authorized commercial paper program, the proceeds of which may be used for general corporate purposes. In
August 2019, we increased the amount available under the commercial paper program from $2,500 to $3,500. At December 31,
2019, we had $400 outstanding under our commercial paper program.
We are a member, through certain subsidiaries, of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Indianapolis, the Federal Home Loan Bank
of Cincinnati and the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta, or collectively, the FHLBs. As a member, we have the ability to obtain
short-term cash advances, subject to certain minimum collateral requirements. At December 31, 2019, we had $650 in outstanding
short-term borrowings from FHLBs.
As discussed in “Financial Condition” above, many of our subsidiaries are subject to various government regulations that
restrict the timing and amount of dividends and other distributions that may be paid. Based upon these requirements, we currently
estimate that approximately $3,035 of dividends will be paid to the parent company during 2020. During 2019, we received $3,790
of dividends from our subsidiaries.
We regularly review the appropriate use of capital, including acquisitions, common stock and debt security repurchases and
dividends to shareholders. The declaration and payment of any dividends or repurchases of our common stock or debt is at the
discretion of our Board of Directors and depends upon our financial condition, results of operations, future liquidity needs,
regulatory and capital requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our Board of Directors.
On January 28, 2020, our Audit Committee declared a quarterly cash dividend to shareholders of $0.95 per share on the
outstanding shares of our common stock. This quarterly dividend is payable on March 27, 2020 to the shareholders of record as of
March 16, 2020.
Under our Board of Directors’ authorization, we maintain a common stock repurchase program. As of December 31, 2019, we
had Board authorization of $3,792 to repurchase our common stock.
For additional information regarding our sources and uses of capital, see Note 4, “Investments,” Note 5 “Derivative Financial
Instruments,” Note 12 “Debt” and Note 14 “Capital Stock–Use of Capital–Dividends and Stock Repurchase Program” of the Notes
to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-66-
Contractual Obligations and Commitments
Our estimated contractual obligations and commitments as of December 31, 2019 are as follows:
   Payments Due by Period
 TotalLess than
1 Year 1-3 Years 3-5 YearsMore than
5 Years
On-Balance Sheet:   
Debt1 $ 31,249$ 3,447$ 3,653$ 3,853$ 20,296
Operating leases, including imputed interest2795 172 285 203 135
Investment commitments328 11 16 — 1
Other long-term liabilities4 752 9 295 293 155
Off-Balance Sheet:   
Purchase obligations53,531 1,236 630 1,076 589
Operating leases, including imputed interest2394 13 60 66 255
Investment commitments6971 287 378 106 200
Total contractual obligations and commitments $ 37,720$ 5,175$ 5,317$ 5,597$ 21,631
1 Includes estimated interest expense. 
2 See Note 17, “Leases,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
3 Represents low income housing tax credits.
4 Primarily consists of reserves for future policy benefits, projected other postretirement benefits, deferred compensation, supplemental
executive retirement plan liabilities and certain other miscellaneous long-term obligations. Estimated future payments for funded pension
benefits have been excluded from this table, as we had no funding requirements under ERISA  at December 31, 2019  as a result of the value
of the assets in the plans.
5 Includes estimated payments for future services under contractual arrangements from third-party service contracts.
6 Includes unfunded capital commitments for alternative investments.
The above table does not contain $172 of gross liabilities for uncertain tax positions and interest for which we cannot
reasonably estimate the timing of the resolutions with the respective taxing authorities. For further information, see Note 7,
“Income Taxes,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In addition to the contractual obligations and commitments discussed above, we have a variety of other contractual agreements
related to acquiring materials and services used in our operations. However, we do not believe these other agreements contain
material noncancelable commitments. 
We believe that funds from future operating cash flows, cash and investments and funds available under our senior revolving
credit facilities and/or from public or private financing sources will be sufficient for future operations and commitments, and for
capital acquisitions and other strategic transactions.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
We do not have any off-balance sheet derivative instruments, guarantee transactions, agreements or other contractual
arrangements or any indemnification agreements that will require funding in future periods. We have not transferred assets to an
unconsolidated entity that serves as credit, liquidity or market risk support to such entity. We do not hold any variable interest in an
unconsolidated entity where such entity provides us with financing, liquidity, market risk or credit risk support.
Risk-Based Capital
Our regulated subsidiaries’ states of domicile have statutory risk-based capital, or RBC, requirements for health and other
insurance companies and HMOs largely based on the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or NAIC,
-67-
Risk-Based Capital (RBC) For Health Organizations Model Act, or RBC Model Act. These RBC requirements are intended to
measure capital adequacy, taking into account the risk characteristics of an insurer’s investments and products. The NAIC sets forth
the formula for calculating the RBC requirements, which are designed to take into account asset risks, insurance risks, interest rate
risks and other relevant risks with respect to an individual insurance company’s business. In general, under the RBC Model Act, an
insurance company must submit a report of its RBC level to the state insurance department or insurance commissioner, as
appropriate, at the end of each calendar year. Our regulated subsidiaries’ respective RBC levels as of December 31, 2019, which
was the most recent date for which reporting was required, were in excess of all applicable mandatory RBC requirements. In
addition to exceeding these RBC requirements, we are in compliance with the liquidity and capital requirements for a licensee of
the BCBSA and with the tangible net worth requirements applicable to certain of our California subsidiaries.
For additional information, see Note 21, “Statutory Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included
in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK. 
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
As a result of our investing and borrowing activities, we are exposed to financial market risks, including those resulting from
changes in interest rates and changes in market valuations. Potential impacts discussed below are based upon sensitivity analyses
performed on our financial position as of December 31, 2019. Actual results could vary from these estimates. Our primary
objectives with our investment portfolio are to provide safety and preservation of capital, sufficient liquidity to meet cash flow
requirements, the integration of investment strategy with the business operations and an attainment of a competitive after-tax total
return.
Investments
Our investment portfolio is exposed to three primary sources of risk: credit quality risk, interest rate risk and market valuation
risk.
The primary risks associated with our fixed maturity securities, which are classified as available-for-sale, are credit quality risk
and interest rate risk. Credit quality risk is defined as the risk of a credit event, such as a ratings downgrade or default, to an
individual fixed maturity security and the potential loss attributable to that event. Credit quality risk is managed through our
investment policy, which establishes credit quality limitations on the overall portfolio as well as diversification and percentage
limits on securities of individual issuers. The result is a well-diversified portfolio of fixed maturity securities, with an average credit
rating of approximately “A.” Interest rate risk is defined as the potential for economic losses on fixed maturity securities due to a
change in market interest rates. Our fixed maturity portfolio is invested primarily in U.S. government securities, corporate bonds,
asset-backed bonds, mortgage-related securities and municipal bonds, all of which have exposure to changes in the level of market
interest rates. Interest rate risk is managed by maintaining asset duration within a band based upon our liabilities, operating
performance and liquidity needs. Additionally, we have the capability of holding any security to maturity, which would allow us to
realize full par value.
Investments in fixed maturity securities include corporate securities, which account for 45.5% of our total fixed maturity
securities at December 31, 2019 and are subject to credit/default risk. In a declining economic environment, corporate yields will
usually increase, prompted by concern over the ability of corporations to make interest payments, thus causing a decrease in the
price of corporate securities, and the decline in value of the corporate fixed maturity portfolio. We manage this risk through
fundamental credit analysis, diversification of issuers and industries and an average credit rating of our corporate fixed maturity
portfolio of approximately “BBB.”
Market risk for fixed maturity securities is addressed by actively managing the duration, allocation and diversification of our
investment portfolio. We have evaluated the impact on the fixed maturity portfolio’s fair value considering an immediate 100 basis
point change in interest rates. A 100 basis point increase in interest rates would result in an approximate $860 decrease in fair value,
whereas a 100 basis point decrease in interest rates would result in an approximate $871 increase in fair value. While we classify
our fixed maturity securities as “available-for-sale” for accounting purposes, we believe our cash flows and the duration of our
portfolio should allow us to hold securities to maturity, thereby avoiding the recognition of losses should interest rates rise
significantly.
-68-
Our equity portfolio is comprised of large capitalization and small capitalization domestic equities, foreign equities, exchange-
traded funds and index mutual funds. Our equity portfolio is subject to the volatility inherent in the stock market, driven by
concerns over economic conditions, earnings and sales growth, inflation, and consumer confidence. These systemic risks cannot be
managed through diversification alone. However, more routine risks, such as stock/industry specific risks, are managed by
investing in a diversified equity portfolio.
As of December 31, 2019, 4.9% of our investments were equity securities. An immediate 10% decrease in each equity
investment’s value, arising from market movement, would result in a fair value decrease of $104. Alternatively, an immediate 10%
increase in each equity investment’s value, attributable to the same factor, would result in a fair value increase of $104.
For additional information regarding our investments, see Note 4, “Investments,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included in Part II, Item 8 and “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates - Investments” within Part II, Item 7
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” included in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
Long-Term Debt
Our total long-term debt at December 31, 2019 consists of senior unsecured notes, convertible debentures, commercial paper
and subordinated surplus notes by one of our insurance subsidiaries. At December 31, 2019, the carrying value and estimated fair
value of our long-term debt was $19,385 and $21,774, respectively. This debt is subject to interest rate risk, as these instruments
have fixed interest rates and the fair value is affected by changes in market interest rates. Should interest rates increase or decrease
in the future, the estimated fair value of our fixed rate debt would decrease or increase accordingly.
For additional information regarding our long-term debt, see Note 6, “Fair Value” and Note 12, “Debt,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Derivatives
We have exposure to economic losses due to interest rate risk arising from changes in the level or volatility of interest rates. We
attempt to mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk through the use of derivative financial instruments. These strategies include the
use of interest rate swaps and forward contracts, which are used to lock-in interest rates or to hedge (on an economic basis) interest
rate risks associated with variable rate debt. We have used these types of instruments as designated hedges against specific
liabilities.
Changes in interest rates will affect the estimated fair value of these derivatives. As of December 31, 2019, we recorded a net
asset of $21, the estimated fair value of the swaps at that date. We have evaluated the impact on the interest rate swaps’ fair value
considering an immediate 100 basis point change in interest rates. A 100 basis point increase in interest rates would result in an
approximate $20 decrease in fair value, whereas a 100 basis point decrease in interest rates would result in an approximate $20
increase in fair value.
For additional information regarding our derivatives, see Note 5, “Derivative Financial Instruments” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-69-
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA.
 
ANTHEM, INC.
 CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 Years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
 Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 71
Audited Consolidated Financial Statements:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 74
Consolidated Statements of Income 75
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 76
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 77
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity 78
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 79
-70-
Report of Independent Register ed
Public Accounting Firm
 
To the Shareholders and the Board of Directors of Anthem, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Anthem, Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018,
the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, shareholders’ equity, and cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at
Item 15(c) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in
Internal Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework), and our report dated February 19, 2020 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Adoption of New Accounting Standards
As discussed in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, on January 1, 2018, the Company changed its method of
accounting for non-consolidated equity investments that are not accounted for under the equity method of accounting.
As discussed in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, on January 1, 2019, the Company changed its method of
accounting for leases.
Basis for Opinion
 
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a
whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters
or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
-71-
Valuation of Incurred but Not Paid Claims
 
Description of the
MatterMedical claims payable was $8,842 million at December 31, 2019, a significant portion of which related
to the Company’s estimate for claims that are incurred but not paid. As discussed in Note 2 to the
consolidated financial statements, the Company’s liability for incurred but not paid claims is determined
using actuarial methods that include a number of factors and assumptions, including completion factors,
which represent the average percentage of total incurred claims that have been paid through a given date
after being incurred based on historical paid claims data, and trend factors, which represent an estimate of
claims expense based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare cost levels. There is significant
uncertainty inherent in determining management’s best estimate of completion and trend factors, which
are used to calculate actuarial estimates of incurred but not paid claims.
 Auditing management’s estimate of incurred but not paid claims was complex and required the
involvement of our actuarial specialists due to the highly judgmental nature of the completion and trend
factor assumptions used in the valuation process. The significant judgment was primarily due to the
sensitivity of management’s best estimate of completion and trend factor assumptions, which have a
significant impact on the valuation of incurred but not paid claims.
 
How We Addressed
the Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls
over the Company’s actuarial process for estimating the liability for incurred but not paid claims. These
audit procedures included among others, testing management review controls over completion and trend
factor assumptions and the review and approval processes that management has in place for estimating
the liability for incurred but not paid claims.
 To test the Company’s liability for incurred but not paid claims, our audit procedures included, among
others, testing the completeness and accuracy of the underlying claims and membership data recorded in
the source claims processing and disbursement systems to the data used by management in developing
completion and trend factor assumptions and comparing a sample of incurred and paid claims to source
documentation. With the support of actuarial specialists, we analyzed the Company’s completion and
trend factor assumptions based on historical claim experience and emerging cost trends, and
independently calculated a range of reasonable reserve estimates for comparison to management’s best
estimate of the liability for incurred but not paid claims. Additionally, we performed a review of the prior
period liabilities for incurred but not paid claims to subsequent claims development.
 
 
 
 
 
 
-72-
Revenue Recognition for New Pharmacy Benefits Manager Business
 
Description of the
MatterBeginning in the second quarter of 2019, the Company commenced operations of its new pharmacy
benefits manager (PBM), IngenioRx. Administrative fees and other revenue of $8,968 million for the year
ended December 31, 2019 included product revenue for services performed by IngenioRx to unaffiliated
PBM customers. As discussed in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, product revenue for
PBM services to unaffiliated PBM customers is recognized using the gross method at the negotiated
contract price when IngenioRx has concluded it is the principal and it controls the PBM services before
prescription drugs are transferred to the customer. There is significant judgment in determining whether
IngenioRx is the principal of the PBM services, which requires the identification of PBM activities
relevant to evaluating control and an assessment of IngenioRx's ability to direct the identified activities.
In particular, the PBM activities that determine control include formulary management, network
management and pricing discretion.
 Auditing management’s revenue recognition for PBM services to unaffiliated PBM customers required a
high degree of auditor judgment due to the subjectivity in determining whether IngenioRx is the principal
in the performance of PBM services. These judgments have a significant impact on the presentation and
disclosure of product revenue for services performed by IngenioRx to unaffiliated PBM customers.
 
How We Addressed
the Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls
over the Company’s evaluation of revenue recognition for PBM services performed by IngenioRx to
unaffiliated PBM customers. These audit procedures included among others, testing management review
controls over the identification of PBM activities relevant to evaluating control and the evaluation
performed to assess IngenioRx’s ability to direct the identified activities.
 To test the Company’s revenue recognition for PBM services to unaffiliated PBM customers, our audit
procedures included, among others, assessing the PBM activities provided by IngenioRx to the customer
and analyzing the contractual rights and obligations contained in its PBM services agreement with
CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C. Further, we evaluated IngenioRx’s ability to direct the identified PBM
activities determined to be significant in fulfilling the promise to provide PBM services to its customers
by evaluating evidence of management’s control over such activities. In addition, we inspected the terms
and conditions of a sample of unaffiliated PBM customer contracts to evaluate IngenioRx’s assertion of
control.
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1944.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 19, 2020
-73-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
 December 31,
2019  December 31,
2018
(In millions, except share data)    
Assets    
Current assets:    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 4,937 $ 3,934
Fixed maturity securities, current (amortized cost of $19,021 and $16,894) 19,676 16,692
Equity securities, current 1,009 1,493
Other invested assets, current 13 21
Accrued investment income 173 162
Premium receivables 5,173 4,465
Self-funded receivables 2,411 2,278
Other receivables 2,634 2,558
Income taxes receivable 335 10
Securities lending collateral 353 604
Other current assets 2,319 2,104
Total current assets 39,033 34,321
Long-term investments:    
Fixed maturity securities (amortized cost of $487 and $486) 505 487
Equity securities 30 33
Other invested assets 4,228 3,726
Property and equipment, net 3,133 2,735
Goodwill 20,500 20,504
Other intangible assets 8,674 9,007
Other noncurrent assets 1,350 758
Total assets $ 77,453 $ 71,571
Liabilities and shareholders’ equity    
Liabilities    
Current liabilities:    
Policy liabilities:    
Medical claims payable $ 8,842 $ 7,454
Reserves for future policy benefits 85 75
Other policyholder liabilities 3,050 2,590
Total policy liabilities 11,977 10,119
Unearned income 1,017 902
Accounts payable and accrued expenses 4,198 4,959
Security trades pending payable 84 197
Securities lending payable 351 604
Short-term borrowings 700 1,145
Current portion of long-term debt 1,598 849
Other current liabilities 3,692 3,190
Total current liabilities 23,617 21,965
Long-term debt, less current portion 17,787 17,217
Reserves for future policy benefits, noncurrent 674 706
Deferred tax liabilities, net 2,227 1,960
Other noncurrent liabilities 1,420 1,182
Total liabilities 45,725 43,030
Commitments and contingencies—Note 13  
Shareholders’ equity    
Preferred stock, without par value, shares authorized - 100,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - none — —
Common stock, par value $0.01, shares authorized - 900,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - 252,922,161 and
257,395,577 3 3
Additional paid-in capital 9,448 9,536
Retained earnings 22,573 19,988
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (296) (986)
Total shareholders’ equity 31,728 28,541
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 77,453 $ 71,571
See accompanying notes.
-74-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Income
 Years Ended December 31
(In millions, except per share data) 2019 2018 2017
Revenues    
Premiums $ 94,173$ 85,421$ 83,648
Administrative fees and other revenue 8,968 5,920 5,413
Total operating revenue 103,141 91,341 89,061
Net investment income 1,005 970 867
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 114 (180) 145
Other-than-temporary impairment losses on investments:    
Total other-than-temporary impairment losses on investments (53) (29) (35)
Portion of other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in other
comprehensive income (loss) 6 3 2
Other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income (47) (26) (33)
Total revenues 104,213 92,105 90,040
Expenses    
Benefit expense 81,786 71,895 72,236
Cost of products sold 1,992 — —
Selling, general and administrative expense 13,364 14,020 12,650
Interest expense 746 753 739
Amortization of other intangible assets 338 358 169
Loss on extinguishment of debt 2 11 282
Total expenses 98,228 87,037 86,076
Income before income tax expense 5,985 5,068 3,964
Income tax expense 1,178 1,318 121
Net income $ 4,807$ 3,750$ 3,843
Net income per share    
Basic $ 18.81$ 14.53$ 14.70
Diluted $ 18.47$ 14.19$ 14.35
Dividends per share $ 3.20$ 3.00$ 2.70
See accompanying notes.
-75-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Compr ehensive Income
 
 Years Ended December 31
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017
Net income $ 4,807$ 3,750$ 3,843
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:    
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on investments 680 (418) 173
Change in non-credit component of other-than-temporary
impairment losses on investments — (2) 4
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on cash flow hedges (16) 37 (65)
Change in net periodic pension and postretirement costs 26 (90) 51
Foreign currency translation adjustments — (1) 3
Other comprehensive income (loss) 690 (474) 166
Total comprehensive income $ 5,497$ 3,276$ 4,009
 
See accompanying notes.
-76-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
 Years Ended December  31
(In millions) 2019 2018  2017
Operating activities   
Net income $ 4,807 $ 3,750  $ 3,843
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:   
Net realized (gains) losses on financial instruments (114) 180 (145)
Other -than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income 47 26 33
Loss on extinguishment of debt 2 11 282
Loss on disposal of assets 3 13 15
Deferred income taxes 81 91 (1,272 )
Amortization, net of accretion 986 1,008  780
Depreciation expense 147 124 111
Share-based compensation 294 226 170
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:   
Receivables, net (1,053 ) (695) (22)
Other invested assets (48) (1) (36)
Other assets (170) (26) (629)
Policy liabilities 1,826 (1,059 ) 732
Unearned income 115 (36) (120)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses (593) 122 922
Other liabilities 148 (25) (120)
Income taxes (325) 323 (194)
Other , net (92) (205) (165)
Net cash pr ovided by operating activities 6,061 3,827  4,185
Investing activities   
Purchases of fixed maturity securities (10,487 ) (8,244 ) (9,795 )
Proceeds from fixed maturity securities:   
Sales 5,914 6,442  7,932
Maturities, calls and redemptions 2,437 1,938  1,848
Purchases of equity securities (11,825 ) (896) (5,416 )
Proceeds from sales of equity securities 12,364 2,809  3,463
Purchases of other invested assets (642) (531) (1,164 )
Proceeds from sales of other invested assets 320 411 219
Changes in collateral and settlement of non-hedging derivatives — — 65
Changes in securities lending collateral 254 (149) 625
Purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired — (1,760 ) (2,080 )
Purchases of property and equipment (1,077 ) (1,208 ) (791)
Other , net (50) (71) 12
Net cash used in investing activities (2,792 ) (1,259 ) (5,082 )
Financing activities   
Net (repayments of) proceeds from commercial paper borrowings (297) (107) 175
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 2,473 835 5,458
Repayments of long-term borrowings (1,123 ) (1,684 ) (2,815 )
Proceeds from short-term borrowings 7,590 9,120  5,835
Repayments of short-term borrowings (8,035 ) (9,250 ) (5,000 )
Changes in securities lending payable (254) 150 (625)
Changes in bank overdrafts (169) (210) 71
Premiums paid on equity call options (1) — —
Proceeds from sale of put options — 1 1
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under Equity Units stock purchase contracts — 1,250  —
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,701 ) (1,685 ) (1,998 )
Change in collateral and settlements of debt-related derivatives (34) 23 (149)
Cash dividends (818) (776) (705)
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under employee stock plans 187 173 225
Taxes paid through withholding of common stock under employee stock plans (84) (81) (46)
Net cash (used in) pr ovided by financing activities (2,266 ) (2,241 ) 427
Effect of for eign exchange rates on cash and cash equivalents — (2) 4
Change in cash and cash equivalents 1,003 325 (466)
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 3,934 3,609  4,075
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 4,937 $ 3,934  $ 3,609
See accompanying notes.
-77-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Shar eholders’  Equity
 Common Stock  Additional
Paid-in
Capital  Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Loss Total
Shareholders’
Equity (In millions)Number
of SharesPar
Value Retained
Earnings  
January 1, 2017 263.7 $ 3 $ 8,805 $ 16,560  $ (267) $ 25,101
Net income — — — 3,843  — 3,843
Other comprehensive income — — — — 166  166
Premiums for and settlement of equity options — — 1 — — 1
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (10.5) — (356) (1,642 ) — (1,998 )
Dividends and dividend equivalents — — — (707) — (707)
Issuance of common stock under employee stock
plans, net of related tax benefits 2.9 — 342 — — 342
Convertible debenture conversions — — (245) — — (245)
December 31, 2017 256.1 3 8,547 18,054  (101) 26,503
Adoption of Accounting Standards Update No.
2016-01 (Note 2) — — — 320  (320) —
January 1, 2018 256.1 3 8,547 18,374  (421) 26,503
Net income — — — 3,750  — 3,750
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (474) (474)
Issuance of common stock under Equity Units
stock purchase contracts 6.0 — 1,250 — — 1,250
Premiums for and settlement of equity options — — 1 — — 1
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (6.8) — (243) (1,442 ) — (1,685 )
Dividends and dividend equivalents — — — (785) — (785)
Issuance of common stock under employee stock
plans, net of related tax benefits 2.1 — 318 — — 318
Convertible debenture conversions — — (337) — — (337)
Adoption of Accounting Standards Update No.
2018-02 (Note 2) — — — 91 (91) —
December 31, 2018 257.4 3 9,536 19,988  (986) 28,541
Adoption of Accounting Standards Update No.
2016-02 (Note 2) — — — 26 — 26
January 1, 2019 257.4 3 9,536 20,014  (986) 28,567
Net income — — — 4,807  — 4,807
Other comprehensive income — — — — 690  690
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (6.3) — (275) (1,426 ) — (1,701 )
Dividends and dividend equivalents — — — (822) — (822)
Issuance of common stock under employee stock
plans, net of related tax benefits 1.8 — 396 — — 396
Convertible debenture repurchases and
conversions — — (209) — — (209)
December 31, 2019 252.9 $ 3 $ 9,448 $ 22,573  $ (296) $ 31,728
See accompanying notes.
-78-
Anthem, Inc.
 
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
 
December 31, 2019
 
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
1. Organization
References to the terms “we,” “our,” “us” or “Anthem” used throughout these Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
refer to Anthem, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries.
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving
approximately 41 medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2019. We offer a broad spectrum of
network-based managed care plans to Large Group, Small Group, Individual, Medicaid and Medicare markets. Our managed care
plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations, or PPOs; Health Maintenance Organizations, or HMOs; Point-of-Service plans;
traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including Consumer-Driven Health Plans; and hospital only and limited benefit
products. In addition, we provide a broad array of managed care services to self-funded customers, including claims processing,
stop loss insurance, actuarial services, provider network access, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs
and other administrative services. We provide an array of specialty and other insurance products and services such as pharmacy
benefits management, or PBM, dental, vision, life and disability insurance benefits, radiology benefit management and analytics-
driven personal healthcare. We also provide services to the federal government in connection with our Federal Health Products &
Services business, which administers the Federal Employees Health Benefits, or FEHB, Program.
We are an independent licensee of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association, or BCBSA, an association of independent
health benefit plans. We serve our members as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield, or
BCBS, licensee for Colorado, Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City
area), Nevada, New Hampshire, New York (in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia
(excluding the Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business
as Anthem Blue Cross, Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also
conduct business through arrangements with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we
also serve customers in numerous states across the country as Aim Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, CareMore,
Freedom Health, HealthLink, HealthSun, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. Also, in the second quarter of
2019, we began providing PBM services through our IngenioRx subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance operations in all
50 states and the District of Columbia through our subsidiaries.
2. Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation: The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Anthem and its
subsidiaries and have been prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP. All significant
intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Certain of our subsidiaries operate outside of the United States and have functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar, or
USD. We translate the assets and liabilities of those subsidiaries to USD using the exchange rate in effect at the end of the period.
We translate the revenues and expenses of those subsidiaries to USD using the average exchange rates in effect during the period.
The net effect of these translation adjustments is included in “Foreign currency translation adjustments” in our consolidated
statements of comprehensive income.
Reclassifications: Certain prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates: The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires us to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes.
Actual results could differ from those estimates.
-79-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Cash and Cash Equivalents: Cash and cash equivalents includes available cash and all highly liquid investments with
maturities of three months or less when purchased. We control a number of bank accounts that are used exclusively to hold
customer funds for the administration of customer benefits, and we have cash and cash equivalents on deposit to meet certain
regulatory requirements. These amounts totaled $215 and $222 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, and are included in
the cash and cash equivalents line on our consolidated balance sheets.
Investments: Financial Accounting Standards Board, or FASB, other-than-temporary impairment, or OTTI, guidance applies to
fixed maturity securities and provides guidance on the recognition, presentation of, and disclosures for OTTIs. If a fixed maturity
security is in an unrealized loss position and we have the intent to sell the fixed maturity security, or it is more likely than not that
we will have to sell the fixed maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, the decline in value is deemed to be
other-than-temporary and is presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements
of income. For impaired fixed maturity securities that we do not intend to sell or it is more likely than not that we will not have to
sell such securities, but we expect that we will not fully recover the amortized cost basis, the credit component of the OTTI is
presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements of income and the non-
credit component of the OTTI is recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss in our consolidated balance sheets.
Furthermore, unrealized losses entirely caused by non-credit related factors related to fixed maturity securities for which we expect
to fully recover the amortized cost basis continue to be recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss.
The credit component of an OTTI is determined primarily by comparing the net present value of projected future cash flows
with the amortized cost basis of the fixed maturity security. The net present value is calculated by discounting our best estimate of
projected future cash flows at the effective interest rate implicit in the fixed maturity security at the date of acquisition. For
mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities, cash flow estimates are based on assumptions regarding the underlying collateral,
including prepayment speeds, vintage, type of underlying asset, geographic concentrations, default rates, recoveries and changes in
value. For all other securities, cash flow estimates are driven by assumptions regarding probability of default, including changes in
credit ratings and estimates regarding timing and amount of recoveries associated with a default.
For asset-backed securities included in fixed maturity securities, we recognize income using an effective yield based on
anticipated prepayments and the estimated economic life of the securities. When estimates of prepayments change, the effective
yield is recalculated to reflect actual payments to date and anticipated future payments. The net investment in the securities is
adjusted to the amount that would have existed had the new effective yield been applied since the acquisition of the securities. Such
adjustments are reported within net investment income.
Effective January 1, 2018 and in accordance with the FASB guidance, the changes in fair value of our marketable equity
securities are recognized in our results of operations within net realized gains and losses on financial instruments. Prior to 2018, the
unrealized gains or losses on our equity securities previously classified as available-for-sale were included in accumulated other
comprehensive loss as a separate component of shareholders’ equity, unless the decline in value was deemed to be other-than-
temporary and we did not have the intent and ability to hold such equity securities until their full cost could be recovered, in which
case such equity securities were written down to fair value and the loss was charged to other-than-temporary impairment losses
recognized in income.
We maintain various rabbi trusts to account for the assets and liabilities under certain deferred compensation plans. Under
these plans, the participants can defer certain types of compensation and elect to receive a return on the deferred amounts based on
the changes in fair value of various investment options, primarily a variety of mutual funds. We have corporate-owned life
insurance policies on certain participants in our deferred compensation plans. The cash surrender value of the corporate-owned life
insurance policies is reported in other invested assets, long-term, in the consolidated balance sheets. The remaining rabbi trust
assets are generally invested according to the participant’s investment election and are classified as trading, which are reported in
other invested assets, current, in the consolidated balance sheets.
We use the equity method of accounting for investments in companies in which our ownership interest enables us to influence
the operating or financial decisions of the investee company. Our proportionate share of equity in net income of these
unconsolidated affiliates is reported within net investment income.
-80-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Investment income is recorded when earned. All securities sold resulting in investment gains and losses are recorded on the
trade date. Realized gains and losses are determined on the basis of the cost or amortized cost of the specific securities sold.
We participate in securities lending programs whereby marketable securities in our investment portfolio are transferred to
independent brokers or dealers in exchange for cash and securities collateral. Under FASB guidance related to accounting for
transfers and servicing of financial assets and extinguishments of liabilities, we recognize the collateral as an asset, which is
reported as securities lending collateral on our consolidated balance sheets, and we record a corresponding liability for the
obligation to return the collateral to the borrower, which is reported as securities lending payable. The securities on loan are
reported in the applicable investment category on our consolidated balance sheets. Unrealized gains or losses on securities lending
collateral are included in accumulated other comprehensive loss as a separate component of shareholders’ equity. The market value
of loaned securities and that of the collateral pledged can fluctuate in non-synchronized fashions. To the extent the loaned
securities’ value appreciates faster or depreciates slower than the value of the collateral pledged, we are exposed to the risk of the
shortfall. As a primary mitigating mechanism, the loaned securities and collateral pledged are marked to market on a daily basis and
the shortfall, if any, is collected accordingly. Secondarily, the collateral level is set at 102% of the value of the loaned securities,
which provides a cushion before any shortfall arises. The investment of the cash collateral is subject to market risk, which is
managed by limiting the investments to higher quality and shorter duration instruments.
Receivables: Premium receivables include the uncollected amounts from insured groups, individuals and government
programs. Premium receivables are reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $237 and $278 at December 31, 2019 and
2018, respectively. Self-funded receivables include administrative fees, claims and other amounts due from self-funded customers.
Self-funded receivables are reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $46 and $47 at December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively. The allowance for doubtful accounts is based on historical collection trends and our judgment regarding the ability to
collect specific accounts.
Other receivables include pharmacy rebates, provider advances, claims recoveries, reinsurance receivables, proceeds due from
brokers on investment trades, other government receivables and other miscellaneous amounts due to us. These receivables are
reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $242 and $280 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, which is based
on historical collection trends and our judgment regarding the ability to collect specific accounts.
Income Taxes: We file a consolidated income tax return. Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are recognized for
temporary differences between the financial statement and tax return basis of assets and liabilities based on enacted tax rates and
laws. The deferred tax benefits of the deferred tax assets are recognized to the extent realization of such benefits is more likely than
not. Deferred income tax expense or benefit generally represents the net change in deferred income tax assets and liabilities during
the year, excluding the impact from amounts initially recorded for business combinations, if any, and amounts recorded to
accumulated other comprehensive loss. Current income tax expense represents the tax consequences of revenues and expenses
currently taxable or deductible on various income tax returns for the year reported.
We account for income tax contingencies in accordance with FASB guidance that contains a model to address uncertainty in
tax positions and clarifies the accounting for income taxes by prescribing a minimum recognition threshold, which all income tax
positions must achieve before being recognized in the financial statements.
Property and Equipment: Property and equipment is recorded at cost, net of accumulated depreciation. Depreciation is
computed principally by the straight-line method over estimated useful lives ranging from fifteen to thirty-nine years for buildings
and improvements, three to five years for computer equipment and software, and the lesser of the remaining life of the building
lease, if any, or seven years for furniture and other equipment. Leasehold improvements are depreciated over the term of the related
lease. Certain costs related to the development or purchase of internal-use software are capitalized and amortized over estimated
useful lives ranging from five to ten years.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets: FASB guidance requires business combinations to be accounted for using the
acquisition method of accounting, and it also specifies the types of acquired intangible assets that are required to be recognized and
reported separately from goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of acquisition over the fair value of net assets
acquired. Other intangible assets represent the values assigned to customer relationships, provider and hospital networks, Blue
Cross and Blue Shield and other trademarks, licenses and other agreements, such as non-compete. Goodwill and other intangible
assets are allocated to reportable segments based on the relative fair value of the components of the businesses acquired.
-81-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives are not amortized but are tested for impairment at least annually. We
complete our annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives during the fourth quarter
of each year. Certain interim impairment tests are also performed when potential impairment indicators exist or changes in our
business or other triggering events occur. Goodwill and other intangible assets are allocated to reporting units for purposes of the
annual goodwill impairment test. Other intangible assets with indefinite lives, such as trademarks, are tested for impairment
separately.
FASB guidance allows for qualitative assessments of whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is
less than its carrying amount for purposes of a goodwill impairment analysis and whether it is more likely than not that an
indefinite-lived intangible asset is impaired for purposes of an indefinite-lived intangible asset impairment analysis. Quantitative
analysis must be performed if qualitative analyses are not conclusive. Entities also have the option to bypass the assessment of
qualitative factors and proceed directly to performing quantitative analyses. Our impairment tests require us to make assumptions
and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units, including goodwill and other intangible assets with
indefinite lives. Estimated fair values developed based on our assumptions and judgments might be significantly different if other
reasonable assumptions and estimates were to be used.
Qualitative analysis involves assessing situations and developments that could affect key drivers used to evaluate whether the
fair value of our goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets are impaired. Our procedures include assessing our financial
performance, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors, and entity specific
events.
Fair value for purposes of a quantitative goodwill impairment test is calculated using a blend of the projected income and
market valuation approaches. The projected income approach is developed using assumptions about future revenue, expenses and
net income derived from our internal planning process. Our assumed discount rate is based on our industry’s weighted-average cost
of capital and reflects volatility associated with the cost of equity capital. Market valuations include market comparisons to publicly
traded companies in our industry and are based on observed multiples of certain measures including revenue; earnings before
interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, or EBITDA; and book value of invested capital. A goodwill impairment loss is
recognized to the extent that the carrying amount exceeds the asset’s fair value. This determination is made at the reporting unit
level and consists of two steps. First, the fair value of a reporting unit is determined and compared to its carrying amount. Second,
if the carrying amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, an impairment loss is recognized for any excess of the carrying
amount of the reporting unit’s goodwill over the implied fair value of that goodwill. The implied fair value of goodwill is
determined by allocating the fair value of the reporting unit in a manner similar to a purchase price allocation on a business
acquisition, at the impairment test date.
Fair value for purposes of a quantitative impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible assets is estimated using a projected
income approach. We recognize an impairment loss when the estimated fair value of indefinite-lived intangible assets is less than
the carrying value. If significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may
be required to record impairment losses against future income.
Derivative Financial Instruments: We primarily invest in the following types of derivative financial instruments: interest rate
swaps, futures, forward contracts, put and call options, swaptions, embedded derivatives and warrants. Derivatives embedded
within non-derivative instruments, such as options embedded in convertible fixed maturity securities, are bifurcated from the host
instrument when the embedded derivative is not clearly and closely related to the host instrument. Our use of derivatives is limited
by statutes and regulations promulgated by the various regulatory bodies to which we are subject, and by our own derivative policy.
Our derivative use is generally limited to hedging purposes, on an economic basis, and we generally do not use derivative
instruments for speculative purposes.
We have exposure to economic losses due to interest rate risk arising from changes in the level or volatility of interest rates. We
attempt to mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk through active portfolio management, including rebalancing our existing
portfolios of assets and liabilities, as well as changing the characteristics of investments to be purchased or sold in the future. In
addition, derivative financial instruments are used to modify the interest rate exposure of certain liabilities or forecasted
transactions. These strategies include the use of interest rate swaps and forward contracts, which are used to lock-in interest rates or
to hedge, on an economic basis, interest rate risks associated with variable rate debt. We have used these types of instruments as
designated hedges against specific liabilities.
-82-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
All investments in derivatives are recorded as assets or liabilities at fair value. If certain correlation, hedge effectiveness and
risk reduction criteria are met, a derivative may be specifically designated as a hedge of exposure to changes in fair value or cash
flow. The accounting for changes in the fair value of a derivative depends on the intended use of the derivative and the nature of
any hedge designation thereon. Amounts excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness, if any, as well as the ineffective
portion of the gain or loss, are reported in results of operations immediately. If the derivative is not designated as a hedge, the gain
or loss resulting from the change in the fair value of the derivative is recognized in results of operations in the period of change.
Cash flows associated with the settlement of non-designated derivatives are shown on a net basis in investing activity in our
consolidated statements of cash flow.
From time to time, we may also purchase derivatives to hedge, on an economic basis, our exposure to foreign currency
exchange fluctuations associated with the operations of certain of our subsidiaries. We generally use futures or forward contracts
for these transactions. We generally do not designate these contracts as hedges and, accordingly, the changes in fair value of these
derivatives are recognized in results of operations immediately.
Credit exposure associated with non-performance by the counterparties to derivative instruments is generally limited to the
uncollateralized fair value of the asset related to instruments recognized in the consolidated balance sheets. We attempt to mitigate
the risk of non-performance by selecting counterparties with high credit ratings and monitoring their creditworthiness and by
diversifying derivatives among multiple counterparties. At December 31, 2019, we believe there were no material concentrations of
credit risk with any individual counterparty.
We generally enter into master netting agreements, which reduce credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with
the same counterparty. Certain of our derivative agreements also contain credit support provisions that require us or the
counterparty to post collateral if there are declines in the derivative fair value or our credit rating. The derivative assets and
derivative liabilities are reported at their fair values net of collateral and netting by the counterparty.
Retirement Benefits: We recognize the funded status of pension and other postretirement benefit plans on the consolidated
balance sheets based on fiscal-year-end measurements of plan assets and benefit obligations. Prepaid pension benefits represent
prepaid costs related to defined benefit pension plans and are reported with other noncurrent assets. Postretirement benefits
represent outstanding obligations for retiree medical, life, vision and dental benefits. Liabilities for pension and other
postretirement benefits are reported with current and noncurrent liabilities based on the amount by which the actuarial present value
of benefits payable in the next twelve months included in the benefit obligation exceeds the fair value of plan assets.
We determine the expected return on plan assets using the calculated value of plan assets, which recognizes changes in the fair
value of plan assets in a systematic manner over three years. We apply a corridor approach to amortize unrecognized actuarial gains
or losses. Under this approach, only accumulated net actuarial gains or losses in excess of 10% of the greater of the projected
benefit obligation or the fair value of plan assets are amortized over the average remaining service or lifetime of the workforce as a
component of net periodic benefit cost.
The discount rate reflects the current rate at which the pension liabilities could be effectively settled at the end of the year
based on our most recent measurement date. We use the annual spot rate approach for setting our discount rate. Under the spot rate
approach, individual spot rates from a full yield curve of published rates are used to discount each plan’s cash flows to determine
the plan’s obligations.
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of other postretirement benefits are based on an
initial assumed healthcare cost trend rate declining to an ultimate healthcare cost trend rate over a select number of years.
Medical Claims Payable: Liabilities for medical claims payable include estimated provisions for incurred but not paid claims
on an undiscounted basis, as well as estimated provisions for expenses related to the processing of claims. Incurred but not paid
claims include (1) an estimate for claims that are incurred but not reported, as well as claims reported to us but not yet processed
through our systems; and (2) claims reported to us and processed through our systems but not yet paid.
Liabilities for both claims incurred but not reported and reported but not yet processed through our systems are determined in
the aggregate, employing actuarial methods that are commonly used by health insurance actuaries and meet Actuarial Standards of
Practice. Actuarial Standards of Practice require that the claim liabilities be appropriate under moderately adverse circumstances.
We determine the amount of the liability for incurred but not paid claims by following a
-83-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
detailed actuarial process that uses both historical claim payment patterns as well as emerging medical cost trends to project our
best estimate of claim liabilities. Under this process, historical paid claims data is formatted into “claim triangles,” which compare
claim incurred dates to the dates of claim payments. This information is analyzed to create “completion factors” that represent the
average percentage of total incurred claims that have been paid through a given date after being incurred. Completion factors are
applied to claims paid through the period-end date to estimate the ultimate claim expense incurred for the period. Actuarial
estimates of incurred but not paid claim liabilities are then determined by subtracting the actual paid claims from the estimate of the
ultimate incurred claims. 
For the most recent incurred months (typically the most recent two months), the percentage of claims paid for claims incurred
in those months is generally low. This makes the completion factor methodology less reliable for such months. Therefore, incurred
claims for recent months are not projected from historical completion and payment patterns; rather, they are projected by estimating
the claims expense for those months based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare trend levels, or “trend factors.”
We regularly review and set assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization when initially establishing claim liabilities. We
continually monitor and adjust the claims liability and benefit expense based on subsequent paid claims activity. If it is determined
that our assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization are materially different than actual results, our income statement and
financial position could be impacted in future periods.
Premium deficiencies are recognized when it is probable that expected claims and administrative expenses will exceed future
premiums on existing medical insurance contracts without consideration of investment income. Determination of premium
deficiencies for longer duration life and disability contracts includes consideration of investment income. For purposes of premium
deficiencies, contracts are deemed to be either short or long duration and are grouped in a manner consistent with our method of
acquiring, servicing and measuring the profitability of such contracts. Once established, premium deficiencies are released
commensurate with actual claims experience over the remaining life of the contract. No premium deficiencies were established at
December 31, 2019 or 2018.
Benefit expense includes incurred medical claims as well as quality improvement expenses for our fully-insured members.
Quality improvement activities are those designed to improve member health outcomes, prevent hospital readmissions and improve
patient safety. They also include expenses for wellness and health promotion provided to our members.
Reserves for Future Policy Benefits: Reserves for future policy benefits include liabilities for life and long-term disability
insurance policy benefits based upon interest, mortality and morbidity assumptions from published actuarial tables, modified based
upon our experience. Future policy benefits also include liabilities for insurance policies for which some of the premiums received
in earlier years are intended to pay anticipated benefits to be incurred in future years. Future policy benefits are continually
monitored and reviewed, and when reserves are adjusted, differences are reflected in benefit expense.
The current portion of reserves for future policy benefits relates to the portion of such reserves that we expect to pay within
one year. We believe that our liabilities for future policy benefits, along with future premiums received, are adequate to satisfy our
ultimate benefit liability; however, these estimates are inherently subject to a number of variable circumstances. Consequently, the
actual results could differ materially from the amounts recorded in our consolidated financial statements.
 Other Policyholder Liabilities: Other policyholder liabilities include rate stabilization reserves associated with retrospectively
rated insurance contracts and certain case-specific reserves. Other policyholder liabilities also includes liabilities for premium
refunds based upon the minimum medical loss ratio, or MLR, the relative health risk of members, or other contractual or regulatory
requirements. Rate stabilization reserves represent accumulated premiums that exceed what customers owe us based on actual
claim experience. The timing of payment of these retrospectively rated refunds is based on the contractual terms with our customers
and can vary from period to period based on the specific contractual requirements.
We are required to meet certain minimum MLR thresholds prescribed by the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and
the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended, or collectively, the ACA. If we do not meet or exceed the
minimum MLR thresholds specified by the ACA, we are required to pay rebates to certain customers. Minimum MLR rebates are
calculated by subsidiary, state and applicable line of business (Large Group, Small Group, Individual, Student Health and
Medicare) in accordance with regulations issued by the Department of Health and Human Services, or HHS. Such calculations are
made using estimated calendar year medical loss expense and premiums, as defined by HHS.
-84-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
We follow HHS guidelines for determining the types of expenses that may be included in our minimum MLR rebate
calculations, which differ from benefit expense and premiums as reported in our consolidated financial statements prepared in
conformity with GAAP. Certain amounts reported as expense in our consolidated GAAP financial statements may be reported as a
reduction of premiums in accordance with HHS regulations. In addition, profit amounts included in our payments to third-party
administrative service providers are recorded as benefit expense in our consolidated GAAP financial statements while HHS does
not allow for the inclusion of these expenses within the medical loss expense for purposes of calculating minimum MLR.
Revenue Recognition: Premiums for fully-insured contracts are recognized as revenue over the period insurance coverage is
provided, and, if applicable, net of amounts recognized for MLR rebates, risk adjustment, reinsurance and risk corridor under
contractual premium stabilization arrangements, the ACA or other regulatory requirements. Premium payments from contracted
government agencies are based on eligibility lists produced by the government agencies. Premiums related to the unexpired
contractual coverage periods are reflected in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets as unearned income. Premiums include
revenue adjustments for retrospectively rated contracts where revenue is based on the estimated loss experience of the contract.
Premium rates for certain lines of business are subject to approval by the Department of Insurance of each respective state.
Additionally, delays in annual premium rate changes from contracted government agencies require that we defer the recognition of
any increases to the period in which the premium rates become final. The value of the impact can be significant in the period in
which it is recognized depending on the magnitude of the premium rate increase, the membership to which it applies and the length
of the delay between the effective date of the rate increase and the final contract date. Premium rate decreases are recognized in the
period the change in premium rate becomes effective and the change in the rate is known, which may be prior to the period when
the contract amendment affecting the rate is finalized.
Administrative fees and other revenue include revenue from certain group contracts that provide for the group to be at risk for
all, or with supplemental insurance arrangements, a portion, of their claims experience. We charge these self-funded groups an
administrative fee, which is based on the number of members in a group or the group’s claim experience. In addition,
administrative fees and other revenue include amounts received for the administration of Medicare or certain other government
programs. Under our self-funded arrangements, revenue is recognized as administrative services are performed. All benefit
payments under these programs are excluded from benefit expense.
Administrative fees and other revenue also include product revenue for services performed by our IngenioRx pharmacy benefit
manager, or PBM, for unaffiliated PBM customers. Unaffiliated PBM customers include our self-funded groups that have
contracted with IngenioRx for PBM services and, beginning on January 1, 2020, third-party health plans. Product revenues and
costs of goods sold for Anthem health plans are eliminated in consolidation. Product revenue for PBM services is recognized using
the gross method at the negotiated contract price when IngenioRx has concluded that it is the principal and it controls the services
before prescription drugs are transferred to the customer. IngenioRx determined it is the principal due to its contractual rights to
design and develop a listing of prescription drugs offered to the customer (formulary management); its control over establishing the
pharmacy network available to the customer to have its prescription fulfilled (network management); and its discretion over
establishing the pricing for prescription drugs. Overall, control over these activities indicate IngenioRx is primarily responsible for
fulfilling the promise to provide PBM services. Product revenues include ingredient costs (net of any rebates or discounts),
including any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, and administrative fees. IngenioRx recognizes revenue when
control of the prescription drugs is transferred to customers, in an amount it expects to be entitled to in exchange for the services
provided.
For our non-fully-insured contracts, we had no material contract assets, contract liabilities or deferred contract costs recorded
on our consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2019. Revenue recognized in 2019 and 2018 from performance obligations
related to prior years, such as due to changes in transaction price, was not material. For contracts that have an original expected
duration of greater than one year, revenue expected to be recognized in future periods related to unfulfilled contractual performance
obligations and contracts with variable consideration related to undelivered performance obligations is not material.
Cost of Products Sold: IngenioRx’s cost of products sold includes the cost of prescription drugs dispensed to unaffiliated PBM
customers (net of rebates or discounts). This cost includes any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer. Cost of products
sold also includes per-claim administrative fees for prescription fulfillment by its vendor and certain IngenioRx direct costs related
to sales and administration of customer contracts.
-85-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Share-Based Compensation: Our current compensation philosophy provides for share-based compensation, including stock
options, restricted stock awards and an employee stock purchase plan. Stock options are granted for a fixed number of shares with
an exercise price at least equal to the fair value of the shares at the date of the grant. Restricted stock awards are issued at the fair
value of the stock on the grant date. The employee stock purchase plan allows for a purchase price per share which is 90% of the
fair value of a share of common stock on the lower of the first or last trading day of the plan quarter. The employee stock purchase
plan discount is recognized as compensation expense based on GAAP guidance. All other share-based payments to employees are
recognized as compensation expense in our consolidated statements of income based on their fair values. Additionally, excess tax
benefits, which result from actual tax benefits realized when awards vest or options are exercised exceeding deferred tax benefits
previously recognized based on grant date fair value, are recognized as tax benefits in the income statement. Our share-based
employee compensation plans and assumptions are described in Note 14, “Capital Stock.” Also see “Recently Adopted Accounting
Guidance” within this Note 2 for reference to accounting changes adopted related to share-based compensation.
Advertising and Marketing Costs: We use print, broadcast and other advertising to promote our products and to develop our
corporate image. We market our products through direct marketing activities and an extensive network of independent agents,
brokers and retail partnerships for Individual and Medicare customers, and for certain Local Group customers with a smaller
employee base. Products for National Accounts and Local Group customers with a larger employee base are generally sold through
independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer who work with industry specialists from our in-house sales force. In
the Individual and Small Group markets, we offer products through state or federally facilitated marketplaces, or public exchanges,
and off-exchange products. The cost of advertising and marketing for product promotion is expensed as incurred, while advertising
and marketing costs associated with our corporate image is expensed when first aired. Total advertising and marketing expense was
$467, $385 and $338 for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Health Insurance Provider Fee: The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee, or HIP Fee, on health insurers
that write certain types of health insurance on U.S. risks, which has been permanently repealed effective January 1, 2021. The
annual HIP Fee is allocated to health insurers based on the ratio of the amount of an insurer’s net premium revenues written during
the preceding calendar year to the amount of health insurance premium for all U.S. health risk for those certain lines of business
written during the preceding calendar year. We record our estimated liability for the HIP Fee in full at the beginning of the year
with a corresponding deferred asset that is amortized on a straight-line basis to selling, general and administrative expense. The
final calculation and payment of the annual HIP Fee is due by September 30th of each fee year. The HIP Fee is non-deductible for
federal income tax purposes. Our affected products are priced to cover the increased selling, general and administrative and income
tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee. The total amount due from allocations to health insurers was $14,300 for 2018. The HIP
Fee was suspended for 2017 and 2019, has resumed and increased to $15,523 for 2020 and has been permanently eliminated
beginning in 2021. For the year ended December 31, 2018, we recognized $1,544 as selling, general and administrative expense
related to the HIP Fee. There was no corresponding expense for 2019 or 2017 due to the suspension of the HIP Fee for 2019 and
2017.
Leases: We lease office space and certain computer and related equipment under noncancelable operating leases. We determine
whether an arrangement is or contains a lease at its inception. We recognize lease liabilities based on the present value of the
minimum lease payments not yet paid by using the lease term, any amounts probable of being owed under any residual value
guarantees and the discount rate determined at lease commencement. As our leases do not generally provide an implicit rate, we use
our incremental secured borrowing rate commensurate with the underlying lease terms to determine the present value of our lease
payments. Our lease liabilities may include amounts for options to extend or terminate a lease when it is reasonably certain that we
will exercise that option. We recognize operating right-of-use, or ROU, assets at an amount equal to the lease liability adjusted for
prepaid or accrued rent, the remaining balance of any lease incentives and unamortized initial direct costs.
The operating lease liabilities are reported in other current liabilities and other noncurrent liabilities and the related ROU assets
are reported in other noncurrent assets on our consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2019. Lease expense for our operating
leases is calculated on a straight-line basis over the lease term and is reported in selling, general and administrative expense on our
consolidated statements of income. For our office space leases, we account for the lease and non-lease components (such as
common area maintenance) as a single lease component. We also do not recognize a lease liability or ROU asset for our office
space leases whose lease terms, at commencement, are twelve months or less and that do not include a purchase option or option to
extend that we are reasonably certain to exercise.
-86-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Earnings per Share: Earnings per share amounts, on a basic and diluted basis, have been calculated based upon the weighted-
average common shares outstanding for the period.
Basic earnings per share excludes dilution and is computed by dividing income available to common shareholders by the
weighted-average number of common shares outstanding for the period. Diluted earnings per share may include the dilutive effect
of stock options, restricted stock, convertible debentures and Equity Units, using the treasury stock method. See Note 12, “Debt,”
for a description of our Equity Units. The treasury stock method assumes exercise of stock options and vesting of restricted stock,
with the assumed proceeds used to purchase common stock at the average market price for the period. The difference between the
number of shares assumed issued and number of shares assumed purchased represents the dilutive shares.
Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance: In March 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-01, Leases
(Topic 842): Codification Improvements. In July 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic
842): Targeted Improvements and Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-10, Codification Improvements to Topic 842, Leases.
These updates provide additional clarification, an optional transition method, a practical expedient and implementation guidance on
the previously issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842). Collectively, these updates supersede the
lease guidance in Accounting Standards Codification, or ASC, Topic 840 and require lessees to recognize for all leases, with the
exception of short-term leases, a lease liability, which is a lessee’s obligation to make lease payments arising from a lease,
measured on a discounted basis. Concurrently, lessees are required to recognize an ROU asset, which is an asset that represents the
lessee’s right to use, or control the use of, a specified asset for the lease term. We adopted this standard on January 1, 2019 by
applying the optional transition method on the adoption date and did not adjust comparative periods. We also elected the package of
practical expedients permitted, which, among other things, allowed us to carry forward the lease classification for our existing
leases. In preparation for the adoption of this standard and to enable preparation of the required financial information, we
implemented a new lease accounting software solution as well as new internal controls. The adoption of this standard impacted our
2019 opening consolidated balance sheet, as we recorded operating lease liabilities of $728 and ROU assets of $637, which equals
the lease liabilities net of accrued rent, lease incentives and the carrying amount of ceased-use liabilities previously recorded on our
consolidated balance sheet under the prior guidance. We also recognized a cumulative-effect adjustment of $26 to our opening
retained earnings for deferred gains on our previous sale-leaseback transactions. The adoption of this standard did not have an
impact on our consolidated statements of income or cash flows.
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-13, Fair Value Measurement (Topic 820): Disclosure
Framework—Changes to the Disclosure Requirements for Fair Value Measurement, or ASU 2018-13. The amendments in ASU
2018-13 eliminate, add, and modify certain disclosure requirements for fair value measurements. The amendments are effective for
interim and annual periods beginning after December 15, 2019, with early adoption permitted for either the entirety of ASU 2018-
13 or only the provisions that eliminate or modify disclosure requirements. We early adopted the provisions that eliminate and
modify disclosure requirements, on a retrospective basis, effective in our 2018 Annual Report on Form 10-K. We adopted the new
disclosure requirements on January 1, 2020, on a prospective basis. The new disclosure requirements are effective for our interim
and annual reporting periods beginning on or after the adoption date.
In February 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-02, Income Statement—Reporting Comprehensive
Income (Topic 220): Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income, or ASU 2018-02. On
December 22, 2017, the federal government enacted a tax bill, H.R.1, An act to provide for reconciliation pursuant to titles II and V
of the concurrent resolution on the budget for fiscal year 2018, or the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act contains
significant changes to corporate taxation, including, but not limited to, reducing the U.S. federal corporate income tax rate from
35% to 21% and modifying or limiting many business deductions. Current FASB guidance requires adjustments of deferred taxes
due to a change in the federal corporate income tax rate to be included in income from operations. As a result, the tax effects of
items within accumulated other comprehensive loss did not reflect the appropriate tax rate. The amendments in ASU 2018-02 allow
a reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained earnings for stranded tax effects resulting from the change
in the federal corporate income tax rate. We adopted the amendments in ASU 2018-02 for our interim and annual reporting periods
beginning on January 1, 2018 and reclassified $91 of stranded tax effects from accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained
earnings on our consolidated balance sheets. The adoption of ASU 2018-02 did not have any impact on our consolidated results of
operations or cash flows.
-87-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
In August 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-12, Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted
Improvements to Accounting for Hedging Activities, or ASU 2017-12. This update amends the hedge accounting recognition and
presentation requirements in ASC Topic 815 with the objective of improving the financial reporting of hedging relationships to
better portray the economic results of an entity’s risk management activities in its financial statements. The update also makes
certain targeted improvements to simplify the application of the hedge accounting guidance and provides several transition
elections. We adopted ASU 2017-12 on October 1, 2017. The adoption of ASU 2017-12 did not have a material impact on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In May 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-09, Compensation - Stock Compensation (Topic 718):
Scope of Modification Accounting, or ASU 2017-09. This update provides guidance about which changes to the terms or conditions
of a share-based payment award require an entity to apply modification accounting in ASC Topic 718. We adopted ASU 2017-09
on January 1, 2018. The guidance has been and will be applied prospectively to awards modified on or after the adoption date. The
adoption of ASU 2017-09 did not have any impact on our consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In March 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-08, Receivables—Nonrefundable Fees and Other
Costs (Subtopic 310-20): Premium Amortization on Purchased Callable Debt Securities, or ASU 2017-08. This update changes the
amortization period for certain purchased callable debt securities held at a premium by shortening the amortization period for the
premium to the earliest call date. Under current guidance, the premium is generally amortized over the contractual life of the
instrument. The amendments are to be applied on a modified retrospective basis through a cumulative-effect adjustment directly to
retained earnings as of the beginning of the period of adoption. We adopted ASU 2017-08 on January 1, 2019, and the adoption of
this standard did not have a material impact on our beginning retained earnings or on our consolidated financial position, results of
operations or cash flows.
In March 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-07, Compensation - Retirement Benefits (Topic 715):
Improving the Presentation of Net Periodic Pension Cost and Net Periodic Postretirement Benefit Cost, or ASU 2017-07. This
amendment requires entities to disaggregate the service cost component from the other components of the benefit cost and present
the service cost component in the same income statement line item as other employee compensation costs arising from services
rendered by the pertinent employees during the period. The other components of net benefit cost are required to be presented in the
income statement separately from the service cost component and outside a subtotal of income from operations. Certain of our
defined benefit plans have previously been frozen, resulting in no annual service costs, and the remaining service costs for our non-
frozen plan are not material. We adopted ASU 2017-07 on January 1, 2018 and it did not have a material impact on our results of
operations, cash flows or consolidated financial position.
In December 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-20, Technical Corrections and
Improvements to Topic 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers. In May 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update
No. 2016-12, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Narrow-Scope Improvements and Practical Expedients. In
April 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-10, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606):
Identifying Performance Obligations and Licensing, or ASU 2016-10. In March 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards
Update No. 2016-08, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Principal versus Agent Considerations (Reporting
Revenue Gross verses Net). These updates provide additional clarification and implementation guidance on the previously issued
Accounting Standards Update No. 2014-09, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606). Collectively, these updates
require a company to recognize revenue when it transfers promised goods or services to customers in an amount that reflects the
consideration to which the company expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods or services. These updates supersede almost
all existing revenue recognition guidance under GAAP, with certain exceptions, including an exception for our premium revenues,
which are recorded on the Premiums line item on our consolidated statements of income and will continue to be accounted for in
accordance with the provisions of ASC Topic 944, Financial Services - Insurance. Our administrative service and other contracts
that are subject to these Accounting Standards Updates are recorded in the Administrative fees and other revenue line item on our
consolidated statements of income and were immaterial to our consolidated total operating revenue at the time of adoption. We
adopted these standards on January 1, 2018 using the modified retrospective approach. The adoption of these standards did not
have a material impact on our beginning retained earnings, results of operations, cash flows or consolidated financial position.
In November 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-18, Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230):
Restricted Cash, or ASU 2016-18. This update amends ASC Topic 230 to add and clarify guidance on the classification and
-88-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
presentation of restricted cash in the statement of cash flows. The guidance requires entities to show the changes in the total of
cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents in the statement of cash flows. We adopted ASU 2016-18 on
January 1, 2018 using a retrospective approach. The adoption of ASU 2016-18 did not have a material impact on our consolidated
statements of cash flows and did not impact our results of operations or consolidated financial position.
In August 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-15, Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230):
Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments, or ASU 2016-15. This update addresses the presentation and
classification on the statement of cash flows for eight specific items, with the objective of reducing existing diversity in practice in
how certain cash receipts and cash payments are presented and classified. We adopted ASU 2016-15 on January 1, 2018. The
adoption of ASU 2016-15 did not have a material impact on our consolidated statements of cash flows, results of operations or
consolidated financial position.
In March 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-09, Compensation - Stock Compensation (Topic
718): Improvements to Employee Share-Based Payment Accounting, or ASU 2016-09. The amendments in this update simplify
several aspects of accounting for and reporting on share-based payment transactions, including the income tax consequences,
classification of awards as either equity or liabilities, and classification on the statement of cash flows. We adopted the amendments
in ASU 2016-09 on January 1, 2017. We continue to estimate forfeitures expected to occur in determining stock compensation
recognized in each period. We prospectively recognized tax benefits of $36, or $0.13 per diluted share, for the year ended
December 31, 2017 in our consolidated statements of income, which previously would have been recorded to additional paid-in
capital. In addition, we prospectively recognized excess tax benefits as an operating activity within our consolidated statement of
cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2017. Finally, we retrospectively recognized taxes paid on our employees’ behalf
through the withholding of common stock as a financing activity within our consolidated statements of cash flows for the years
ended December 31, 2017 and 2016.
In January 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-01, Financial Instruments - Overall (Subtopic 825-
10): Recognition and Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities, or ASU 2016-01. The amendments in ASU 2016-
01 change the accounting for non-consolidated equity investments that are not accounted for under the equity method of accounting
by requiring changes in fair value to be recognized in income. Additionally, ASU 2016-01 simplifies the impairment assessment of
equity investments without readily determinable fair values; requires entities to use the exit price when estimating the fair value of
financial instruments; and modifies various presentation disclosure requirements for financial instruments. We adopted ASU 2016-
01 on January 1, 2018 as a cumulative-effect adjustment and reclassified $320 of unrealized gains on equity investments, net of tax,
from accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained earnings on our consolidated balance sheet. Effective January 1, 2018, our
results of operations include the changes in fair value of these financial instruments.
Recent Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted: In December 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-
12, Income Taxes (Topic 740): Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes, or ASU 2019-12. The amendments in ASU 2019-12
remove certain exceptions to the general principles in ASC Topic 740. The amendments also clarify and amend existing guidance to
improve consistent application. The amendments are effective for our annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2020,
with early adoption permitted. The transition method (retrospective, modified retrospective, or prospective basis) related to the
amendments depends on the applicable guidance, and all amendments for which there is no transition guidance specified are to be
applied on a prospective basis. We are currently evaluating the effects the adoption of ASU 2019-12 will have on our consolidated
financial statements.
In November 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-11, Codification Improvements to Topic 326,
Financial Instruments - Credit Losses. In May 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-05, Financial
Instruments - Credit Losses (Topic 326): Targeted Transition Relief. In April 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update
No. 2019-04, Codification Improvements to Topic 326, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses, Topic 815, Derivatives and Hedging,
and Topic 825, Financial Instruments. In November 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-19,
Codification Improvements to Topic 326, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses. These updates provide an option to irrevocably
elect to measure certain individual financial assets at fair value instead of amortized cost and provide additional clarification and
implementation guidance on certain aspects of the previously issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-13, Financial
Instruments - Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments, or ASU 2016-13, and have the
same effective date and transition requirements as ASU 2016-13. ASU 2016-13 introduces a current expected credit loss model for
measuring expected credit losses for certain types of financial instruments
-89-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
held at the reporting date based on historical experience, current conditions and reasonable supportable forecasts. ASU 2016-13
replaces the current incurred loss model for measuring expected credit losses, requires expected losses on available-for-sale debt
securities to be recognized through an allowance for credit losses rather than as reductions in the amortized cost of the securities
and provides for additional disclosure requirements. ASU 2016-13 requires a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance
of retained earnings on the statement of financial position at the date of adoption and a prospective transition approach for debt
securities for which an OTTI had been recognized before the adoption date. The effect of a prospective transition approach is to
maintain the same amortized cost basis before and after the date of adoption. We adopted ASU 2016-13 on January 1, 2020, and the
adoption did not have a material impact on our beginning retained earnings or on our consolidated financial position, results of
operations or cash flows.
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-15, Intangibles—Goodwill and Other—Internal-Use
Software (Subtopic 350-40): Customer’s Accounting for Implementation Costs Incurred in a Cloud Computing Arrangement that is
a Service Contract, or ASU 2018-15. The amendments in ASU 2018-15 require implementation costs incurred by customers in
cloud computing arrangements to be deferred and recognized over the term of the arrangement, if those costs would be capitalized
by the customer in a software licensing arrangement under the internal-use software guidance. The amendments also require an
entity to disclose the nature of its hosting arrangements and adhere to certain presentation requirements in its balance sheet, income
statement and statement of cash flows. We adopted ASU 2018-15 on January 1, 2020 using a prospective approach for all
implementation costs incurred after the date of adoption, and the adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated financial
position, results of operations or cash flows.
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-14, Compensation—Retirement Benefits—Defined
Benefit Plans—General (Subtopic 715-20): Disclosure Framework—Changes to the Disclosure Requirements for Defined Benefit
Plans, or ASU 2018-14. The amendments in ASU 2018-14 eliminate, add and modify certain disclosure requirements for
employers that sponsor defined benefit pension or other postretirement plans. The amendments are effective for our annual
reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2020, with early adoption permitted. The guidance is to be applied on a
retrospective basis to all periods presented. We are currently evaluating the effects the adoption of ASU 2018-14 will have on our
disclosures.
In August 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-12, Financial Services Insurance (Topic
944): Targeted Improvements to the Accounting for Long-Duration Contracts, or ASU 2018-12. The amendments in ASU 2018-12
make changes to a variety of areas to simplify or improve the existing recognition, measurement, presentation and disclosure
requirements for long-duration contracts issued by an insurance entity. The amendments require insurers to annually review the
assumptions they make about their policyholders and update the liabilities for future policy benefits if the assumptions change. The
amendments also simplify the amortization of deferred contract acquisition costs and add new disclosure requirements about the
assumptions insurers use to measure their liabilities and how they may affect future cash flows. The amendments in ASU 2018-12
will be effective for our interim and annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2021. The amendments related to the
liability for future policy benefits for traditional and limited-payment contracts and deferred acquisition costs are to be applied to
contracts in force as of the beginning of the earliest period presented, with an option to apply such amendments retrospectively with
a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings as of the earliest period presented. The amendments for
market risk benefits are to be applied retrospectively. We are currently evaluating the effects the adoption of ASU 2018-12 will
have on our consolidated financial position, results of operations, cash flows, and related disclosures.
In January 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-04, Intangibles - Goodwill and Other (Topic 350):
Simplifying the Test for Goodwill Impairment, or ASU 2017-04. This update removes Step 2 of the goodwill impairment test under
current guidance, which requires a hypothetical purchase price allocation. The new guidance requires an impairment charge to be
recognized for the amount by which the carrying amount exceeds the reporting unit’s fair value. Upon adoption, the guidance is to
be applied prospectively. We adopted ASU 2017-04 on January 1, 2020, and the adoption did not have an impact on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
There were no other new accounting pronouncements that were issued or became effective during the year ended
December 31, 2019 that had, or are expected to have, a material impact on our financial position, results of operations, cash flows
or financial statement disclosures.
-90-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
3. Business Acquisitions
Pending Acquisition of Beacon
On June 6, 2019, we announced our entrance into an agreement to acquire Beacon Health Options, Inc., or Beacon, the largest
independently held behavioral health organization in the country. Beacon services approximately forty million individuals across all
fifty states. This acquisition aligns with our strategy to diversify into health services and deliver both integrated solutions and care
delivery models that personalize care for people with complex and chronic conditions. The acquisition is expected to close during
the first quarter of 2020 and is subject to standard closing conditions and customary approvals.
Acquisition of America’s 1st Choice
On February 15, 2018, we completed our acquisition of Freedom Health, Inc., Optimum HealthCare, Inc., America’s 1st
Choice of South Carolina, Inc. and related entities, or collectively, America’s 1st Choice, a Medicare Advantage organization that
offers HMO products, including Chronic Special Needs Plans and Dual-Eligible Special Needs Plans under its Freedom Health and
Optimum HealthCare brands in Florida and its America’s 1st Choice of South Carolina brand in South Carolina. At the time of
acquisition, through its Medicare Advantage Plans, America’s 1st Choice served approximately one hundred and thirty-five
thousand members in twenty-five Florida and three South Carolina counties. This acquisition aligns with our plans for continued
growth in the Medicare Advantage and Special Needs populations.
In accordance with FASB accounting guidance for business combinations, the consideration transferred was allocated to the
fair value of America’s 1st Choice’s assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including identifiable intangible assets. The excess of
the consideration transferred over the fair value of net assets acquired resulted in goodwill of $1,029 at December 31, 2018, of
which $333 was tax deductible. All of the goodwill was allocated to our Government Business segment. Goodwill recognized from
the acquisition of America’s 1st Choice primarily relates to the future economic benefits arising from the assets acquired and is
consistent with our stated intentions to strengthen our position and expand operations in the government sector to service Medicare
Advantage and Special Needs populations.
The fair value of the net assets acquired from America’s 1st Choice includes $711 of other intangible assets at December 31,
2018, which primarily consist of finite-lived customer relationships with amortization periods ranging from 7 to 13 years. The
results of operations of America’s 1st Choice are included in our consolidated financial statements within our Government Business
segment for the periods following February 15, 2018. The pro forma effects of this acquisition for prior periods were not material to
our consolidated results of operations.
Acquisition of HealthSun
On December 21, 2017, we completed our acquisition of HealthSun Health Plans, Inc., or HealthSun, which at the time of
acquisition served approximately forty thousand members in the state of Florida through its Medicare Advantage Plans, and which
received a five-star rating from the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services. This acquisition aligns with our plans for continued
growth in the Medicare Advantage and dual-eligible populations. The results of operations of HealthSun are included in our
consolidated financial statements within our Government Business segment for the periods following December 21, 2017. The pro
forma effects of this acquisition for prior periods were not material to our consolidated results of operations.
Termination of Agreement and Plan of Merger with Cigna Corporation
On July 24, 2015, we and Cigna Corporation, or Cigna, announced that we entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, or
Cigna Merger Agreement, dated as of July 23, 2015, to acquire all outstanding shares of Cigna. On May 12, 2017, we delivered to
Cigna a notice terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement. Both we and Cigna have commenced litigation against the other seeking
various actions and damages, including Cigna’s damage claim for a $1,850 termination fee pursuant to the terms of the Cigna
Merger Agreement. For additional information, see Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory
Proceedings - Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation.”
-91-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
4. Investments
A summary of current and long-term fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale, at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
      Non-Credit
Component of
OTTIs
Recognized in
Accumulated Other
Comprehensive
Loss Cost or
Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
Gains Gross Unrealized Losses
Estimated
Fair Value 
  Less than
12 Months12 Months
or Greater  
December 31, 2019        
Fixed maturity securities:        
United States Government securities $ 524$ 4 $ (3)$ — $ 525 $ —
Government sponsored securities 136 5 — — 141 —
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 4,592 262 (3) — 4,851 —
Corporate securities 8,870 339 (9) (15) 9,185 (3)
Residential mortgage-backed securities 3,654 87 (6) (3) 3,732 —
Commercial mortgage-backed
securities 84 2 — — 86 —
Other securities 1,648 21 (3) (5) 1,661 —
Total fixed maturity securities $19,508$ 720 $ (24)$ (23)$20,181 $ (3)
December 31, 2018        
Fixed maturity securities:        
United States Government securities $ 414$ 3 $ — $ (1)$ 416 $ —
Government sponsored securities 108 1 — (1) 108 —
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 4,716 91 (3) (19) 4,785 —
Corporate securities 8,189 33 (170) (115) 7,937 (3)
Residential mortgage-backed securities 2,769 31 (3) (47) 2,750 —
Commercial mortgage-backed
securities 69 — — (2) 67 —
Other securities 1,115 14 (8) (5) 1,116 —
Total fixed maturity securities $17,380$ 173 $ (184)$ (190)$17,179 $ (3)
-92-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
For fixed maturity securities in an unrealized loss position at December 31, 2019 and 2018, the following table summarizes the
aggregate fair values and gross unrealized losses by length of time those securities have continuously been in an unrealized loss
position.
 Less than 12 Months  12 Months or Greater
 Number of
Securities Estimated
Fair Value Gross
Unrealized
Loss  Number of
SecuritiesEstimated
Fair ValueGross
Unrealized
Loss
(Securities are whole amounts)          
December 31, 2019       
Fixed maturity securities:       
United States Government securities 27 $ 250 $ (3) 2$ 1$ —
Government sponsored securities 14 12 — 3 1 —
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 114 306 (3) 14 11 —
Corporate securities 386 558 (9) 224 286 (15)
Residential mortgage-backed
securities 321 635 (6) 189 237 (3)
Commercial mortgage-backed
securities 1 3 — 4 8 —
Other securities 166 415 (3) 113 358 (5)
Total fixed maturity securities 1,029 $ 2,179 $ (24) 549$ 902$ (23)
December 31, 2018       
Fixed maturity securities:       
United States Government securities 5 $ 47 $ — 25$ 79$ (1)
Government sponsored securities 8 11 — 24 31 (1)
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 177 295 (3) 604 1,032 (19)
Corporate securities 2,185 4,503 (170) 1,220 2,072 (115)
Residential mortgage-backed
securities 259 383 (3) 816 1,458 (47)
Commercial mortgage-backed
securities 6 11 — 19 37 (2)
Other securities 193 599 (8) 93 237 (5)
Total fixed maturity securities 2,833 $ 5,849 $ (184) 2,801$ 4,946$ (190)
The amortized cost and fair value of fixed maturity securities at December 31, 2019, by contractual maturity, are shown below.
Expected maturities may differ from contractual maturities because the issuers of the securities may have the right to prepay
obligations.
 Amortized
Cost  Estimated
Fair Value
Due in one year or less $ 532 $ 534
Due after one year through five years 5,367 5,503
Due after five years through ten years 5,633 5,864
Due after ten years 4,238 4,462
Mortgage-backed securities 3,738 3,818
Total fixed maturity securities $ 19,508 $ 20,181
-93-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Equity Securities
A summary of current and long-term marketable equity securities at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Equity Securities:   
Exchange traded funds $ 44 $ 2
Fixed maturity mutual funds 643 557
Common equity securities 267 654
Private equity securities 85 313
Total $ 1,039 $ 1,526
Investment Income
The major categories of net investment income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 are as follows:
2019 2018 2017
Fixed maturity securities $ 721$ 681$ 614
Equity securities 100 86 116
Cash equivalents 64 51 25
Other 149 193 153
Investment income 1,034 1,011 908
Investment expense (29) (41) (41)
Net investment income $ 1,005$ 970$ 867
-94-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Investment Gains
Net realized investment gains/losses and the net change in unrealized appreciation/depreciation on investments for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 are as follows:
 2019  2018 2017
Net realized gains (losses):    
Fixed maturity securities:    
Gross realized gains from sales $ 125 $ 85$ 137
Gross realized losses from sales (59) (116) (55)
Net realized gains (losses) from sales of fixed maturity securities 66 (31) 82
Equity securities:    
Gross realized gains 147 77 140
Gross realized losses (84) (276) (17)
Net realized gains (losses) on equity securities 63 (199) 123
Other investments:    
Gross realized gains from sales 3 27 —
Gross realized losses from sales (1) — (5)
Net realized gains (losses) from sales of other investments 2 27 (5)
Net realized gains (losses) on investments 131 (203) 200
    
Other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income:    
Fixed maturity securities (13) (9) (4)
Equity securities — — (15)
Other investments (34) (17) (14)
Other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income (47) (26) (33)
    
Change in net unrealized gains (losses) on investments:    
Fixed maturity securities 874 (529) 156
Equity securities — — 111
Other investments — 5 (10)
Total change in net unrealized gains (losses) on investments 874 (524) 257
Deferred income tax (expense) benefit (194) 106 (84)
Change in net unrealized gains (losses) on investments 680 (418) 173
    
Net realized gains (losses) on investments, other-than-temporary
impairment losses recognized in income and change in net unrealized
gains (losses) on investments $ 764 $ (647)$ 340
The gains and losses related to equity securities for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
 2019 2018
Net realized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities $ 63$ (199)
Less: Net realized (gains) losses recognized on equity securities sold during the period (39) 57
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized in income on equity securities still held at December 31$ 24$ (142)
-95-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A primary objective in the management of our fixed maturity and equity portfolios is to maximize total return relative to
underlying liabilities and respective liquidity needs. In achieving this goal, assets may be sold to take advantage of market
conditions or other investment opportunities as well as tax considerations. Sales will generally produce realized gains and losses. In
the ordinary course of business, we may sell securities at a loss for a number of reasons, including, but not limited to: (i) changes in
the investment environment; (ii) expectations that the fair value could deteriorate further; (iii) desire to reduce exposure to an issuer
or an industry; (iv) changes in credit quality; or (v) changes in expected cash flow.
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls or redemptions of fixed maturity securities and the related gross realized gains and gross
realized losses for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
Proceeds $ 8,351$ 8,380$ 9,780
Gross realized gains 125 85 137
Gross realized losses (59) (116) (55)
A significant judgment in the valuation of investments is the determination of when an other-than-temporary decline in value
has occurred. We follow a consistent and systematic process for recognizing impairments on securities that sustain other-than-
temporary declines in value. We have established a committee responsible for the impairment review process. The decision to
impair a security incorporates both quantitative criteria and qualitative information. The impairment review process considers a
number of factors including, but not limited to: (i) the extent to which the fair value is less than book value, (ii) the financial
condition and near term prospects of the issuer, (iii) our intent and ability to retain impaired investments for a period of time
sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value, (iv) our intent to sell or the likelihood that we will need to sell a fixed
maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, (v) whether the debtor is current on interest and principal payments,
(vi) the reasons for the decline in value (i.e., credit event compared to liquidity, general credit spread widening, currency exchange
rate or interest rate factors) and (vii) general market conditions and industry or sector specific factors. For securities that are
deemed to be other-than-temporarily impaired, the security is adjusted to fair value and the resulting losses are recognized in the
consolidated statements of income. The new cost basis of the impaired security is not increased for future recoveries in fair value.
Other-than-temporary impairments recorded in 2019, 2018 and 2017 were primarily the result of the continued credit
deterioration on specific issuers in the bond markets. There were no individually material OTTI losses on investments by issuer
during 2019, 2018 or 2017.
Investment securities are exposed to various risks, such as interest rate, market and credit. Due to the level of risk associated
with certain investment securities and the level of uncertainty related to changes in the value of investment securities, it is possible
that changes in these risk factors in the near term could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations or shareholders’
equity.
The changes in the amount of the credit component of OTTI losses on fixed maturity securities recognized in income, for
which a portion of the OTTI losses was recognized in other comprehensive income, was not material for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 or 2017.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, there were no investments that exceeded 10% of shareholders’ equity and no fixed maturity
investments that did not produce income during the years then ended.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had committed approximately $999 and $873, respectively, to future capital calls from
various third-party investments in exchange for an ownership interest in the related entities.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, securities with carrying values of approximately $505 and $487, respectively, were deposited
by our insurance subsidiaries under requirements of regulatory authorities.
-96-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Securities Lending Programs
The fair value of the collateral received at the time of the securities lending transactions amounted to $351 and $604 at
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The value of the collateral represented 103% and 102% of the market value of the
securities on loan at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
The remaining contractual maturities of our securities lending transactions at December 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Overnight
and
Continuous
Securities lending transactions  
Cash $ 291
United States Government securities 59
Other securities 1
Total $ 351
-97-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
5. Derivative Financial Instruments
We primarily invest in the following types of derivative financial instruments: interest rate swaps, futures, forward contracts,
put and call options, swaptions, embedded derivatives and warrants. We also enter into master netting agreements which reduce
credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions. At December 31, 2019 we had received collateral of $22 related to our
derivative financial instruments. As of December 31, 2018 we had posted collateral of $1 related to our derivative financial
instruments.
A summary of the aggregate contractual or notional amounts and estimated fair values related to derivative financial
instruments at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 Contractual/
Notional
Amount Balance Sheet Location Estimated Fair Value
 Asset (Liability)
December 31, 2019     
Hedging instruments     
Interest rate swaps - fixed to floating $ 1,200 Other assets/other liabilities  $ 22$ (1)
     
Non-hedging instruments     
Interest rate swaps 1 Equity securities  — —
Futures 134 Equity securities  1 —
Subtotal non-hedging 135 Subtotal non-hedging  1 —
Total derivatives $ 1,335 Total derivatives  23 (1)
  Amounts netted  (1) 1
  Net derivatives  $ 22$ —
     
December 31, 2018     
Hedging instruments     
Interest rate swaps - fixed to floating $ 1,200 Other assets/other liabilities  $ 7$ (11)
     
Non-hedging instruments     
Interest rate swaps 164 Equity securities  4 (1)
Options 100 Other assets/other liabilities  — —
Futures 415 Equity securities  5 (5)
Subtotal non-hedging 679 Subtotal non-hedging  9 (6)
Total derivatives $ 1,879 Total derivatives  16 (17)
  Amounts netted  (14) 14
  Net derivatives  $ 2$ (3)
-98-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Fair Value Hedges
We have entered into various interest rate swap contracts to convert a portion of our interest rate exposure on our long-term
debt from fixed rates to floating rates. The floating rates payable on all of our fair value hedges are benchmarked to the London
Interbank Offered Rate, or LIBOR. A summary of our outstanding fair value hedges at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
Type of Fair Value Hedges  Year
Entered
Into Outstanding Notional Amount
Interest Rate
Received  Expiration Date  2019  2018
Interest rate swap  2018 $ 50 $ 50 4.101% September 1, 2027
Interest rate swap  2018 450 450 3.300  January 15, 2023
Interest rate swap  2018 90 90 4.350  August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap  2017 50 50 4.350  August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap  2015 200 200 4.350  August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap  2014 150 150 4.350  August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap  2013 10 10 4.350  August 15, 2020
Interest rate swap  2012 200 200 4.350  August 15, 2020
Total notional amount outstanding  $ 1,200 $ 1,200  
The following amounts were recorded on our consolidated balance sheets related to cumulative basis adjustments for fair value
hedges at December 31, 2019 and 2018:
Balance Sheet Classification in Which
Hedged Item is IncludedCarrying Amount of Hedged LiabilityCumulative Amount of Fair Value Hedging
Adjustment Included in the Carrying Amount of the
Hedged Liability
2019 2018 2019 2018
Current portion of long term-debt $ 1,598$ 849$ 22$ 7
Long-term debt 17,787 17,217 (1) (11)
Cash Flow Hedges
We have entered into a series of forward starting pay fixed interest rate swaps with the objective of eliminating the variability
of cash flows in the interest payments on anticipated future financings. During 2019, swaps in the notional amount of $425 were
terminated. We paid an aggregate of $35 to the swap counter parties upon termination.
The unrecognized loss for all expired and terminated cash flow hedges included in accumulated other comprehensive loss, net
of tax, was $262 and $246 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. As of December 31, 2019, the total amount of
amortization over the next twelve months for all cash flow hedges is estimated to increase interest expense by approximately $15.
No amounts were excluded from effectiveness testing.
-99-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of the effect of cash flow hedges in accumulated other comprehensive loss for the years ended December 31, 2019,
2018 and 2017 is as follows:
  Hedge
Loss
Recognized
in Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Income Statement
Location of
Loss
Reclassification
from Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive Loss Hedge Loss
Reclassified from
Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Loss Type of Cash Flow Hedge   
Year ended December 31, 2019    
Forward starting pay fixed swaps  $ (35) Interest expense  $ (15)
Year ended December 31, 2018    
Forward starting pay fixed swaps  (33) Interest expense  (14)
Year ended December 31, 2017    
Forward starting pay fixed swaps  (112) Interest expense  (7)
Forward starting pay fixed swaps  Net realized gains (losses) on
financial instruments  (7)
Income Statement Relationship of Fair Value and Cash Flow Hedging
A summary of the relationship between the effects of fair value and cash flow hedges on the total amount of income and
expense presented in our consolidated statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 Classification and Amount of Gain (Loss) Recognized in Income on Fair Value and Cash Flow
Hedging Relationships
 2019  2018 2017
 Net Realized
Gains (Losses)
on Financial
InstrumentsInterest
Expense Net Realized
Gains (Losses)
on Financial
Instruments Interest
ExpenseNet Realized
Gains (Losses)
on Financial
InstrumentsInterest
Expense
Total amount of income or expense in the
income statement in which the effects of fair
value or cash flow hedges are recorded $ 114$ (746) $ (180) $ (753)$ 145$ (739)
Gain (loss) on fair value hedging
relationships:        
Interest rate swaps:        
Hedged items — 2 — — — —
Derivatives designated as hedging
instruments — (2) — — — —
Loss on cash flow hedging relationships:        
Forward starting pay fixed swaps:        
Amount of loss reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive loss
into net income — (15) — (14) — (7)
Amount of loss reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive loss
into net income due to ineffectiveness
and missed forecasted transactions — — — — (7) —
-100-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Non-Hedging Derivatives
A summary of the effect of non-hedging derivatives on our consolidated statements of income for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
Type of Non-hedging DerivativesIncome Statement Location of
Gain (Loss) RecognizedDerivative
Gain (Loss)
Recognized
Year ended December 31, 2019  
Interest rate swaps Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments $ 1
Options Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (8)
Futures Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (10)
Total  $ (17)
Year ended December 31, 2018  
Interest rate swaps Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments $ 14
Options Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 1
Futures Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 8
Total  $ 23
Year ended December 31, 2017  
Interest rate swaps Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments $ (9)
Options Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (36)
Futures Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments (3)
Total  $ (48)
6. Fair Value
Assets and liabilities recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets are categorized based upon the level of judgment
associated with the inputs used to measure their fair value. Level inputs, as defined by FASB guidance for fair value measurements
and disclosures, are as follows:
Level Input: Input Definition:
Level I  Inputs are unadjusted, quoted prices for identical assets or liabilities in active markets at the measurement date.
Level II
 Inputs other than quoted prices included in Level I that are observable for the asset or liability through
corroboration with market data at the measurement date.
Level III
 Unobservable inputs that reflect management’s best estimate of what market participants would use in pricing
the asset or liability at the measurement date.
The following methods, assumptions and inputs were used to determine the fair value of each class of the following assets and
liabilities recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets:
Cash equivalents: Cash equivalents primarily consist of highly rated money market funds with maturities of three months or
less, and are purchased daily at par value with specified yield rates. Due to the high ratings and short-term nature of the funds, we
designate all cash equivalents as Level I.
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale: Fair values of available-for-sale fixed maturity securities are based on quoted
market prices, where available. These fair values are obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use
Level I or Level II inputs for the determination of fair value to facilitate fair value measurements and disclosures. Level II securities
primarily include corporate securities, securities from states, municipalities and political subdivisions, mortgage-backed securities,
United States Government securities and certain other asset-backed securities. For securities not actively traded, the pricing
services may use quoted market prices of comparable instruments or discounted cash flow analyses, incorporating inputs that are
currently observable in the markets for similar securities. We have controls
-101-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
in place to review the pricing services’ qualifications and procedures used to determine fair values. In addition, we periodically
review the pricing services’ pricing methodologies, data sources and pricing inputs to ensure the fair values obtained are
reasonable. Inputs that are often used in the valuation methodologies include, but are not limited to, broker quotes, benchmark
yields, credit spreads, default rates and prepayment speeds. We also have certain fixed maturity securities, primarily corporate debt
securities, that are designated Level III securities. For these securities, the valuation methodologies may incorporate broker quotes
or discounted cash flow analyses using assumptions for inputs such as expected cash flows, benchmark yields, credit spreads,
default rates and prepayment speeds that are not observable in the markets.
Equity securities: Fair values of equity securities are generally designated as Level I and are based on quoted market prices.
For certain equity securities, quoted market prices for the identical security are not always available, and the fair value is estimated
by reference to similar securities for which quoted prices are available. These securities are designated Level II. We also have
certain equity securities, including private equity securities, for which the fair value is estimated based on each security’s current
condition and future cash flow projections. Such securities are designated Level III. The fair values of these private equity
securities are generally based on either broker quotes or discounted cash flow projections using assumptions for inputs such as the
weighted-average cost of capital, long-term revenue growth rates and earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization,
and/or revenue multiples that are not observable in the markets.
Other invested assets, current: Other invested assets, current include securities held in rabbi trusts that are classified as trading.
These securities are designated Level I securities, as fair values are based on quoted market prices.
Securities lending collateral: Fair values of securities lending collateral are based on quoted market prices, where available.
These fair values are obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or Level II inputs for the
determination of fair value, to facilitate fair value measurements and disclosures.
Derivatives: Fair values are based on the quoted market prices by the financial institution that is the counterparty to the
derivative transaction. We independently verify prices provided by the counterparties using valuation models that incorporate
market observable inputs for similar derivative transactions. Derivatives are designated as Level II securities.
In addition, the following methods and assumptions were used to determine the fair value of each class of pension benefit plan
assets and other benefit plan assets not defined above (see Note 10, “Retirement Benefits,” for fair values of benefit plan assets):
Mutual funds: Fair values are based on quoted market prices, which represent the net asset value, or NAV, of the shares held.
Common and collective trusts: Fair values of common/collective trusts that replicate traded money market funds are based on
cost, which approximates fair value. Fair values of common/collective trusts that invest in securities are valued at the NAV of the
shares held, where the trust applies fair value measurements to the underlying investments to determine the NAV.
Alternative investments: Fair values are estimated based on the plan’s proportionate share of the undistributed partners’ capital
as reported in audited financial statements of the partnership.
Contract with insurance company: Fair value of the contract in the insurance company general investment account is
determined by the insurance company based on the fair value of the underlying investments of the account.
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust: Fair value is based on the plan’s proportionate share of the fair value of investments held by
the trust, qualified as a Department of Labor Regulation 2520.103-12 entity, or DOL 103-12 trust, as reported in the audited
financial statements of the trust, where the trustee applies fair value measurements to the underlying investments of the trust.
Life insurance contracts: Fair value is based on the cash surrender value of the policies as reported by the insurer.
-102-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of fair value measurements by level for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2019   
Assets:   
Cash equivalents $2,015 $ — $ — $2,015
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale:   
United States Government securities — 525 — 525
Government sponsored securities — 141 — 141
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt — 4,851 — 4,851
Corporate securities — 8,882 303 9,185
Residential mortgage-backed securities — 3,730 2 3,732
Commercial mortgage-backed securities — 86 — 86
Other securities — 1,654 7 1,661
Total fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale — 19,869 312 20,181
Equity securities:  
Exchange traded funds 44 — — 44
Fixed maturity mutual funds — 643 — 643
Common equity securities 236 31 — 267
Private equity securities — — 85 85
Total equity securities 280 674 85 1,039
Other invested assets, current 13 — — 13
Securities lending collateral — 353 — 353
Derivatives — 23 — 23
Total assets $2,308 $20,919$ 397$23,624
Liabilities:   
Derivatives $ — $ (1)$ — $ (1)
Total liabilities $ — $ (1)$ — $ (1)
   
December 31, 2018   
Assets:   
Cash equivalents $1,815 $ — $ — $1,815
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale:   
United States Government securities — 416 — 416
Government sponsored securities — 108 — 108
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt — 4,785 — 4,785
Corporate securities 2 7,648 287 7,937
Residential mortgage-backed securities — 2,744 6 2,750
Commercial mortgage-backed securities — 67 — 67
Other securities — 1,099 17 1,116
Total fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale 2 16,867 310 17,179
Equity securities:  
Exchange traded funds 2 — — 2
Fixed maturity mutual funds — 557 — 557
Common equity securities 601 53 — 654
Private equity securities — — 313 313
Total equity securities 603 610 313 1,526
Other invested assets, current 21 — — 21
Securities lending collateral 314 290 — 604
Derivatives — 16 — 16
Total assets $2,755 $17,783$ 623$21,161
Liabilities:   
Derivatives $ — $ (17)$ — $ (17)
Total liabilities $ — $ (17)$ — $ (17)
-103-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of assets measured at fair value on a recurring basis using Level III
inputs for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 Corporate
Securities Residential
Mortgage-
backed
Securities Other
Securities Equity
Securities Total
Year ended December 31, 2019       
Beginning balance at January 1, 2019 $ 287 $ 6 $ 17 $ 313 $ 623
Total gains (losses):       
Recognized in net income (7) — — (6) (13)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss 3 — — — 3
Purchases 122 — 2 65 189
Sales (22) — — (79) (101)
Settlements (71) (2) (6) — (79)
Transfers into Level III — — 3 2 5
Transfers out of Level III (9) (2) (9) (210) (230)
Ending balance at December 31, 2019 $ 303 $ 2 $ 7 $ 85 $ 397
Change in unrealized losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2019 $ — $ — $ — $ 6 $ 6
       
Year ended December 31, 2018       
Beginning balance at January 1, 2018 $ 229 $ 5 $ 16 $ 287 $ 537
Total (losses) gains:       
Recognized in net income 1 — — (229) (228)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss (5) — — — (5)
Purchases 120 2 18 290 430
Sales (33) — (1) (35) (69)
Settlements (88) (1) (10) — (99)
Transfers into Level III 65 — 9 — 74
Transfers out of Level III (2) — (15) — (17)
Ending balance at December 31, 2018 $ 287 $ 6 $ 17 $ 313 $ 623
Change in unrealized losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2018 $ — $ — $ — $ 30 $ 30
       
Year ended December 31, 2017       
Beginning balance at January 1, 2017 $ 239 $ 11 $ 43 $ 188 $ 481
Total (losses) gains:       
Recognized in net income (1) — — — (1)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss 3 — — 11 14
Purchases 88 4 36 89 217
Sales (48) (5) (1) (1) (55)
Settlements (64) (2) (7) — (73)
Transfers into Level III 15 3 15 — 33
Transfers out of Level III (3) (6) (70) — (79)
Ending balance at December 31, 2017 $ 229 $ 5 $ 16 $ 287 $ 537
Change in unrealized losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2017 $ (3) $ — $ — $ — $ (3)
There were no individually material transfers into or out of Level III during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 or 2017.
Our valuation policy is determined by members of our treasury and accounting departments. Whenever possible, our policy is
to obtain quoted market prices in active markets to estimate fair values for recognition and disclosure purposes. Where quoted
market prices in active markets are not available, fair values are estimated using discounted cash flow analyses, broker quotes or
other valuation techniques. These techniques are significantly affected by our assumptions,
-104-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
including discount rates and estimates of future cash flows. Potential taxes and other transaction costs are not considered in
estimating fair values. Our valuation policy is generally to obtain quoted prices for each security from third-party pricing services,
which are derived through recently reported trades for identical or similar securities making adjustments through the reporting date
based upon available market observable information. As we are responsible for the determination of fair value, we perform analysis
on the prices received from the pricing services to determine whether the prices are reasonable estimates of fair value. This analysis
is performed by our internal treasury personnel who are familiar with our investment portfolios, the pricing services engaged and
the valuation techniques and inputs used. Our analysis includes procedures such as a review of month-to-month price fluctuations
and price comparisons to secondary pricing services. There were no adjustments to quoted market prices obtained from the pricing
services during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 or 2017.
Certain assets and liabilities are measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis; that is, the instruments are not measured at fair
value on an ongoing basis but are subject to fair value adjustments only in certain circumstances. As disclosed in Note 3, “Business
Acquisitions,” we completed our acquisition of America’s 1st Choice on February 15, 2018. The net assets acquired in our
acquisition of America’s 1st Choice and resulting goodwill and other intangible assets were recorded at fair value primarily using
Level III inputs. The majority of America’s 1st Choice assets acquired and liabilities assumed were recorded at their carrying values
as of the respective date of acquisition, as their carrying values approximated their fair values due to their short-term nature. The
fair values of goodwill and other intangible assets acquired in our acquisition of America’s 1st Choice were internally estimated
based on the income approach. The income approach estimates fair value based on the present value of the cash flows that the
assets could be expected to generate in the future. We developed internal estimates for the expected cash flows and discount rate in
the present value calculation. Other than the assets acquired and liabilities assumed in our acquisition of America’s 1st
Choice described above, there were no other material assets or liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis during the
years ended December 31, 2019 or 2018.
In addition to the preceding disclosures on assets recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets, FASB guidance also
requires the disclosure of fair values for certain other financial instruments for which it is practicable to estimate fair value, whether
or not such values are recognized in the consolidated balance sheets.
Non-financial instruments such as real estate, property and equipment, other current assets, deferred income taxes, intangible
assets and certain financial instruments, such as policy liabilities, are excluded from the fair value disclosures. Therefore, the fair
value amounts cannot be aggregated to determine our underlying economic value.
The carrying amounts reported in the consolidated balance sheets for cash, accrued investment income, premium receivables,
self-funded receivables, other receivables, income taxes receivable, unearned income, accounts payable and accrued expenses,
security trades pending payable, securities lending payable and certain other current liabilities approximate fair value because of the
short-term nature of these items. These assets and liabilities are not listed in the table below.
The following methods and assumptions were used to estimate the fair value of each class of financial instrument that is
recorded at its carrying value on the consolidated balance sheets:
Other invested assets, long-term: Other invested assets, long-term primarily include our investments in limited partnerships,
joint ventures and other non-controlled corporations, as well as the cash surrender value of corporate-owned life insurance policies.
Investments in limited partnerships, joint ventures and other non-controlled corporations are carried at our share in the entities’
undistributed earnings, which approximates fair value. The carrying value of corporate-owned life insurance policies represents the
cash surrender value as reported by the respective insurer, which approximates fair value.
Short-term borrowings: The fair value of our short-term borrowings is based on quoted market prices for the same or similar
debt, or if no quoted market prices were available, on the current market interest rates estimated to be available to us for debt of
similar terms and remaining maturities.
Long-term debt - commercial paper: The carrying amount for commercial paper approximates fair value, as the underlying
instruments have variable interest rates at market value.
Long-term debt - senior unsecured notes and surplus notes: The fair values of our notes are based on quoted market prices in
active markets for the same or similar debt, or, if no quoted market prices are available, on the current market observable rates
estimated to be available to us for debt of similar terms and remaining maturities.
-105-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Long-term debt—convertible debentures: The fair value of our convertible debentures is based on the quoted market price in
the active private market in which the convertible debentures trade.
A summary of the estimated fair values by level of each class of financial instrument that is recorded at its carrying value on
our consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 
Carrying
ValueEstimated Fair Value
 Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2019    
Assets:    
Other invested assets, long-term $ 4,228$ — $ — $ 4,228 $ 4,228
Liabilities:    
Debt:    
Short-term borrowings 700 — 700 — 700
Commercial paper 400 — 400 — 400
Notes 18,840 — 20,470 — 20,470
Convertible debentures 145 — 904 — 904
    
December 31, 2018    
Assets:    
Other invested assets, long-term $ 3,726$ — $ — $ 3,726 $ 3,726
Liabilities:    
Debt:    
Short-term borrowings 1,145 — 1,145 — 1,145
Commercial paper 697 — 697 — 697
Notes 17,178 — 17,145 — 17,145
Convertible debentures 191 — 1,030 — 1,030
-106-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
7. Income Taxes
The components of deferred income taxes at December 31, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
 2019  2018
Deferred tax assets relating to:   
Retirement benefits $ 211 $ 226
Accrued expenses 280 301
Insurance reserves 114 96
Net operating loss carryforwards 4 7
Bad debt reserves 82 104
State income tax 11 32
Deferred compensation 22 20
Unrealized losses on securities — 41
Other 77 72
Total deferred tax assets 801 899
Deferred tax liabilities relating to:   
Investment basis difference 78 52
Unrealized gains on securities 153 —
Intangible assets:   
Trademarks and state Medicaid licenses 1,529 1,529
Customer, provider and hospital relationships 239 290
Internally developed software and other amortization differences 528 461
Retirement benefits 194 183
Debt discount 19 27
State deferred tax 77 105
Depreciation and amortization 48 47
Other 163 165
Total deferred tax liabilities 3,028 2,859
Net deferred tax liability $ 2,227 $ 1,960
Included as a component of the state deferred tax liabilities above is a net valuation allowance for states net operating losses of
$45 and $95, respectively, at December 31, 2019 and 2018.
Significant components of the provision for income taxes for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 consist of the
following:
 2019 2018  2017
Current tax expense:   
Federal $ 1,019$ 1,128 $ 1,356
State and local 84 78 39
Total current tax expense 1,103 1,206 1,395
Deferred tax expense (benefit) 75 112 (1,274)
Total income tax expense $ 1,178$ 1,318 $ 121
-107-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
State and local current tax expense is reported gross of federal benefit, and includes amounts related to audit settlements,
uncertain tax positions, state tax credits and true up of prior years’ tax. Such items are included in multiple lines in the following
rate reconciliation table on a net of federal tax basis.
A reconciliation of income tax expense recorded in the consolidated statements of income and amounts computed at the
statutory federal income tax rate for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 2019  2018 2017
 Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
Amount at statutory rate $1,257 21.0 % $1,064 21.0 %$1,387 35.0 %
State and local income taxes net of federal tax
expense/benefit 138 2.3  63 1.2 (2) (0.1)
Tax exempt interest and dividends received
deduction (24) (0.4) (27) (0.5) (58) (1.4)
HIP Fee — —  324 6.4 — —
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act — —  (28) (0.6) (1,108) (27.9)
Other, net (193) (3.2) (78) (1.5) (98) (2.5)
Total income tax expense $1,178 19.7 % $1,318 26.0 %$ 121 3.1 %
During the year ended December 31, 2018, we recognized income tax expense of $324, or $1.23 per diluted share, as a result
of the non-tax deductibility of the HIP Fee payment. On December 22, 2017, the federal government enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act, which contains significant changes to corporate taxation, including, but not limited to, reducing the U.S. federal corporate
income tax rate from 35% to 21% and modifying or limiting many business deductions. At December 31, 2018, we completed our
accounting for the tax effects of enactment of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act and there was no material change to our 2017 provisional
amount. In addition we reclassified, for our interim and annual reporting periods beginning on January 1, 2018, $91 of stranded tax
effects from accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained earnings on our consolidated balance sheets.
During the year ended December 31, 2017, we recognized an income tax benefit of $1,108, or $4.14 per diluted share, as a
result of the provisional amount recorded related to the remeasurement of our deferred tax balance as a result of the enactment of
the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. The HIP Fee payment was suspended for 2017.
The change in the carrying amount of gross unrecognized tax benefits from uncertain tax positions for the years ended
December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 2019  2018
Balance at January 1 $ 241 $ 190
Additions based on:  
Tax positions related to current year 1 35
Tax positions related to prior years — 50
Reductions based on:  
Tax positions related to prior years (63) (31)
Settlements with taxing authorities (33) (3)
Balance at December 31 $ 146 $ 241
The table above excludes interest, net of related tax benefits, which is treated as income tax expense (benefit) under our
accounting policy. The interest is included in the amounts described in the following paragraph.
The amount of unrecognized tax benefits that would impact our effective tax rate in future periods, if recognized, was $140 and
$237 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Also included in the table above, at December 31, 2019, is $2 that would be
recognized as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital, which would not affect our effective tax rate. In
-108-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
addition to the contingent liabilities included in the table above, during 2017 we filed protective state income tax refund claims of
approximately $310. There were no equivalent protective state income tax refund claims filed in 2019 or 2018.
For the year ended December 31, 2019, tax loss contingencies recorded in a prior year were released; therefore, we recognized
a net interest benefit of $11. For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, we recognized a net interest expense of $15 and $3,
respectively. We had accrued approximately $26 and $37 for the payment of interest at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
As of December 31, 2019, as further described below, certain tax years remain open to examination by the Internal Revenue
Service, or IRS, and various state and local authorities. In addition, we continue to discuss certain industry issues with the IRS. As a
result of these examinations and discussions, we have recorded amounts for uncertain tax positions. It is anticipated that the amount
of unrecognized tax benefits will change in the next twelve months due to possible settlements of audits and changes in temporary
items. However, the ultimate resolution of these items is dependent on the completion of negotiations with various taxing
authorities. While it is difficult to determine when other tax settlements will actually occur, it is reasonably possible that one could
occur in the next twelve months and our unrecognized tax benefits could change within a range of approximately $(9) to $(102). 
We are a member of the IRS Compliance Assurance Process, or CAP. The objective of CAP is to reduce taxpayer burden and
uncertainty while assuring the IRS of the accuracy of tax returns prior to filing, thereby reducing or eliminating the need for post-
filing examinations.
As of December 31, 2019, the IRS examination of our 2019 and 2017 tax years continues to be in process.
In certain states, we pay premium taxes in lieu of state income taxes. Premium taxes are reported in selling, general and
administrative expense.
At December 31, 2019, we had unused federal tax net operating loss carryforwards of approximately $8 to offset future taxable
income. The loss carryforwards expire in the years 2032 through 2037. During 2019, 2018 and 2017, federal income taxes paid
totaled $1,403, $738 and $1,503, respectively.
8. Property and Equipment
A summary of property and equipment at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 2019  2018
Computer software, purchased and internally developed $ 4,314 $ 3,532
Computer equipment, furniture and other equipment 1,264 1,266
Leasehold improvements 715 563
Building and improvements 169 169
Land and improvements 17 18
Property and equipment, gross 6,479 5,548
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (3,346) (2,813)
Property and equipment, net $ 3,133 $ 2,735
Depreciation expense for 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $147, $124 and $111, respectively. Amortization expense on computer
software and leasehold improvements for 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $528, $528 and $490, respectively, which includes
amortization expense on computer software, both purchased and internally developed, for 2019, 2018 and 2017 of $450, $465 and
$435, respectively. Capitalized costs related to the internal development of software of $3,939 and $3,226 at December 31, 2019
and 2018, respectively, are reported with computer software.
-109-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
9. Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
A summary of the change in the carrying amount of goodwill for our segments (see Note 19, “Segment Information”) for 2019
and 2018 is as follows:
 Commercial
and Specialty
Business  Government
Business  Other  Total
Balance as of January 1, 2018 $ 11,818 $ 7,402 $ 11 $ 19,231
Acquisitions — 1,285 — 1,285
Adjustments (267) 266 (11) (12)
Balance as of December 31, 2018 11,551 8,953 — 20,504
Adjustments — (674) 670 (4)
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ 11,551 $ 8,279 $ 670 $ 20,500
Accumulated impairment as of December 31, 2019 $ (41) $ — $ — $ (41)
The increase in goodwill in 2018 was primarily due to the acquisition of America’s 1st Choice in February 2018. For additional
information regarding this acquisition, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions”.
Goodwill adjustments in 2019 include certain reclassifications made for changes in segment reporting. The adjustments in
2018 include measurement period adjustments for HealthSun as well as certain reclassifications made for changes in segment
reporting. For additional information, see Note 19, “Segment Information”.
As required by FASB guidance, we completed annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with
indefinite lives during 2019, 2018 and 2017. We perform these annual impairment tests during the fourth quarter. FASB guidance
also requires interim impairment testing to be performed when potential impairment indicators exist. These tests involve the use of
estimates related to the fair value of goodwill and intangible assets with indefinite lives and require a significant degree of
management judgment and the use of subjective assumptions. Qualitative testing procedures include assessing our financial
performance, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors and entity specific
events. For quantitative testing, the fair values are estimated using the projected income and market valuation approaches,
incorporating Level III internal estimates for inputs, including, but not limited to, revenue projections, income projections, cash
flows and discount rates. We did not incur any impairment losses in 2019, 2018 or 2017, as the estimated fair values of our
reporting units were substantially in excess of their carrying values.
The components of other intangible assets as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
 2019 2018
Gross
Carrying
Amount Accumulated
Amortization Net
Carrying
AmountGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
Amortization Net
Carrying
Amount
Intangible assets with finite lives:       
Customer relationships $ 4,500 $ (3,469) $ 1,031$ 4,495$ (3,185) $ 1,310
Provider and hospital relationships 228 (98) 130 228 (85) 143
Other 352 (129) 223 352 (88) 264
Total 5,080 (3,696) 1,384 5,075 (3,358) 1,717
Intangible assets with indefinite lives:       
Blue Cross and Blue Shield and other
trademarks 6,299 — 6,299 6,299 — 6,299
State Medicaid licenses 991 — 991 991 — 991
Total 7,290 — 7,290 7,290 — 7,290
Other intangible assets $ 12,370 $ (3,696) $ 8,674$ 12,365$ (3,358) $ 9,007
-110-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
As of December 31, 2019, the estimated amortization expense for each of the five succeeding years is as follows: 2020, $290;
2021, $244; 2022, $195; 2023, $162; and 2024, $85.
10. Retirement Benefits
 We sponsor various non-contributory employee defined benefit plans through certain subsidiaries. 
The Anthem Cash Balance Plan A and the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B are cash balance pension plans covering certain
eligible employees of the affiliated companies that participate in these plans. Effective January 1, 2006, benefits were curtailed,
with the result that most participants stopped accruing benefits but continue to earn interest on benefits accrued prior to the
curtailment. Certain participants subject to collective bargaining and certain other participants who met grandfathering rules
continued to accrue benefits. Participants who did not receive credits and/or benefit accruals were included in the Anthem Cash
Balance Plan A, while employees who were still receiving credits and/or benefits participated in the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B.
Effective January 1, 2019, benefits under the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B were curtailed. All grandfathered participants no longer
have pay credits added to their accounts but continue to earn interest on existing account balances. Participants continue to earn
years of pension service for vesting purposes. Several pension plans acquired through various corporate mergers and acquisitions
were merged into these plans in prior years.
The Employees’ Retirement Plan of Blue Cross of California, or the BCC Plan, is a defined benefit pension plan that covers
eligible employees of Blue Cross of California who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement. Effective January 1, 2007,
benefits were curtailed under the BCC Plan with the result that no Blue Cross of California employees hired or rehired after
December 31, 2006 are eligible to participate in the BCC Plan.
All of the plans’ assets consist primarily of equity securities, fixed maturity securities, investment funds and cash. The funding
policies for all plans are to contribute amounts at least sufficient to meet the minimum funding requirements set forth in the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, or ERISA, as amended by the Pension Protection Act of 2006, and
in accordance with income tax regulations, plus such additional amounts as are necessary to provide assets sufficient to meet the
benefits to be paid to plan participants.
We use a December 31 measurement date for determining benefit obligations and the fair value of plan assets. 
The following tables disclose consolidated “pension benefits,” which include the defined benefit pension plans described
above, and consolidated “other benefits,” which include postretirement health and welfare benefits including medical, vision and
dental benefits offered to certain employees. Calculations were computed using assumptions at the December 31 measurement
dates.
The reconciliation of the benefit obligation is as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2019  2018 2019 2018
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 1,743 $ 1,872$ 431$ 524
Service cost — 8 1 1
Interest cost 62 55 15 15
Actuarial loss (gain) 200 (70) 5 (57)
Benefits paid (125) (122) (29) (52)
Benefit obligation at end of year $ 1,880 $ 1,743$ 423$ 431
-111-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The changes in the fair value of plan assets are as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2019  2018 2019 2018
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ 1,818 $ 2,012$ 336$ 356
Actual return on plan assets 329 (76) 55 (17)
Employer contributions 4 4 5 49
Benefits paid (125) (122) (29) (52)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $ 2,026 $ 1,818$ 367$ 336
 The net amount included in the consolidated balance sheets is as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2019  2018 2019 2018
Noncurrent assets $ 212 $ 134$ — $ —
Current liabilities (6) (6) — —
Noncurrent liabilities (60) (53) (56) (95)
Net amount at December 31 $ 146 $ 75$ (56)$ (95)
 The net amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive loss that have not been recognized as components of net
periodic benefit costs are as follows:
 Pension Benefits  Other Benefits
 2019 2018  2019 2018
Net actuarial loss $ 734$ 751 $ 25$ 58
Prior service cost (credit) 1 1 (19) (34)
Net amount before tax at December 31 $ 735$ 752 $ 6$ 24
The estimated net actuarial loss and prior service cost for the defined benefit pension plans that will be reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive loss into net periodic benefit costs over the next year are $22 and $0, respectively. The estimated
net actuarial loss and prior service credit for postretirement benefit plans that will be reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive loss into net periodic benefit costs over the next year are $0 and $7, respectively. 
The accumulated benefit obligation for the defined benefit pension plans was $1,878 and $1,742 at December 31, 2019 and
2018, respectively. 
As of December 31, 2019, certain pension plans had accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets. For those same
plans, the projected benefit obligation was also in excess of plan assets. Such plans had a combined projected benefit obligation,
accumulated benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets of $104, $102 and $39, respectively. 
The weighted-average assumptions used in calculating the benefit obligations for all plans are as follows: 
 Pension Benefits  Other Benefits
 2019 2018  2019  2018
Discount rate 3.11% 4.15% 2.93% 4.04%
Rate of compensation increase 3.00% 3.00% 3.00% 3.00%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 7.33% 7.44% 7.00% 7.00%
-112-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The components of net periodic benefit credit included in the consolidated statements of income are as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Pension Benefits    
Service cost $ — $ 8 $ 10
Interest cost 62 55 66
Expected return on assets (138) (147) (147)
Recognized actuarial loss 17 22 22
Settlement loss 9 5 7
Net periodic benefit credit $ (50)$ (57) $ (42)
    
Other Benefits    
Service cost $ 1$ 1 $ 1
Interest cost 15 15 21
Expected return on assets (22) (24) (23)
Recognized actuarial loss 2 3 11
Amortization of prior service credit (12) (12) (13)
Net periodic benefit credit $ (16)$ (17) $ (3)
During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, we incurred total settlement losses of $9, $5 and $7, respectively,
as lump-sum payments exceeded the service cost and interest cost components of net periodic benefit cost for certain of our plans. 
The weighted-average assumptions used in calculating the net periodic benefit cost for all plans are as follows:
 2019  2018 2017
Pension Benefits    
Discount rate 4.15% 3.44% 3.77%
Rate of compensation increase 3.00% 3.00% 3.00%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 7.44% 7.83% 7.95%
    
Other Benefits    
Discount rate 4.04% 3.42% 3.82%
Rate of compensation increase 3.00% 3.00% 3.00%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 7.00% 7.00% 7.00%
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of pre-Medicare (those who are not currently
eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2019 measurement date was 7.00% for 2020 with a gradual
decline to 4.50% by the year 2028. The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of post-Medicare
(those who are currently eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2019 measurement date was 6.00% for
2020 with a gradual decline to 4.50% by the year 2028. These estimated trend rates are subject to change in the future. The
healthcare cost trend rate assumption affects the amounts reported. For example, an increase in the assumed healthcare cost trend
rate of one percentage point would increase the postretirement benefit obligation as of December 31, 2019 by $23 and would
increase service and interest costs by $1. Conversely, a decrease in the assumed healthcare cost trend rate of one percentage point
would decrease the postretirement benefit obligation as of December 31, 2019 by $20 and would decrease service and interest costs
by $1. 
Plan assets include a diversified mix of equity securities, investment grade fixed maturity securities and other types of
investments across a range of sectors and levels of capitalization to maximize long-term return for a prudent level of risk. The
-113-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
weighted-average target allocation for pension benefit plan assets is 44% equity securities, 48% fixed maturity securities, and 8% to
all other types of investments. Equity securities primarily include a mix of domestic securities, foreign securities and mutual funds
invested in equities. Fixed maturity securities primarily include treasury securities, corporate bonds and asset-backed investments
issued by corporations and the U.S. government. Other types of investments primarily include insurance contracts designed
specifically for employee benefit plans and partnership interests, collective trusts that replicate money market funds and insurance
contracts designed specifically for employee benefit plans. As of December 31, 2019, there were no significant concentrations of
investments in the pension benefit assets or other benefit assets. No plan assets were invested in Anthem common stock.
Pension benefit assets and other benefit assets recorded at fair value are categorized based upon the level of judgment
associated with the inputs used to measure their fair value.
 The fair values of our pension benefit assets and other benefit assets by asset category and level inputs at December 31, 2019,
excluding cash, investment income receivable and amounts due to/from brokers, resulting in a net asset of $64, are as follows (see
Note 6, “Fair Value,” for additional information regarding the definition of level inputs):
 Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2019      
Pension Benefit Assets:      
Equity securities:      
U.S. securities $ 626$ — $ — $ 626
Foreign securities 197 — — 197
Mutual funds 38 — — 38
Fixed maturity securities:      
Government securities — 252 — 252
Corporate securities — 339 — 339
Asset-backed securities — 163 — 163
Other types of investments:      
Alternative investments — 136 52 188
Insurance company contracts — — 175 175
Total pension benefit assets $ 861$ 890$ 227 $ 1,978
      
Other Benefit Assets:      
Equity securities:      
U.S. securities $ 8$ — $ — $ 8
Foreign securities 2 — — 2
Mutual funds 25 — — 25
Fixed maturity securities:      
Government securities — 2 — 2
Corporate securities — 4 — 4
Asset-backed securities — 3 — 3
Other types of investments:      
Alternative investments — 1 — 1
Life insurance contracts — — 294 294
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust — 12 — 12
Total other benefit assets $ 35$ 22$ 294 $ 351
-114-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The fair values of our pension benefit assets and other benefit assets by asset category and level inputs at December 31, 2018,
excluding cash, investment income receivable and amounts due to/from brokers, resulting in a net asset of $69, are as follows:
 Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2018    
Pension Benefit Assets:    
Equity securities:    
U.S. securities $ 488 $ — $ — $ 488
Foreign securities 147 — — 147
Mutual funds 36 — — 36
Fixed maturity securities:    
Government securities — 248 — 248
Corporate securities — 347 — 347
Asset-backed securities — 153 — 153
Other types of investments:    
Alternative investments — — 187 187
Insurance company contracts — — 166 166
Total pension benefit assets $ 671 $ 748$ 353$ 1,772
    
Other Benefit Assets:    
Equity securities:    
U.S. securities $ 9 $ — $ — $ 9
Foreign securities 3 — — 3
Mutual funds 27 — — 27
Fixed maturity securities:    
Government securities — 3 — 3
Corporate securities — 5 — 5
Asset-backed securities — 5 — 5
Other types of investments:    
Alternative investments — — 2 2
Life insurance contracts — — 249 249
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust — 10 — 10
Total other benefit assets $ 39 $ 23$ 251$ 313
-115-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of plan assets measured at fair value using Level III inputs for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 Alternative
Investments Insurance
Company
Contracts Life
Insurance
Contracts Total
Year ended December 31, 2019    
Beginning balance at January 1, 2019 $ 189 $ 166 $ 249$ 604
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date 28 12 45 85
Purchases 24 6 — 30
Sales (52) (9) — (61)
Transfers out of Level III (137) — — (137)
Ending balance at December 31, 2019 $ 52 $ 175 $ 294$ 521
    
Year ended December 31, 2018    
Beginning balance at January 1, 2018 $ 221 $ 173 $ 269$ 663
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date (10) (7) (15) (32)
Purchases — 8 — 8
Sales (22) (8) (5) (35)
Ending balance at December 31, 2018 $ 189 $ 166 $ 249$ 604
    
Year ended December 31, 2017    
Beginning balance at January 1, 2017 $ 114 $ 173 $ 238$ 525
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date 20 (1) 31 50
Purchases 126 10 — 136
Sales (39) (9) — (48)
Ending balance at December 31, 2017 $ 221 $ 173 $ 269$ 663
During 2019, we transferred one of our alternative investments from Level III to Level II based on the inputs used to measure
fair value. There were no other transfers into or out of Level III during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 or 2017.
Our current funding strategy is to fund an amount at least equal to the minimum required funding as determined under ERISA
with consideration of maximum tax deductible amounts. We may elect to make discretionary contributions up to the maximum
amount deductible for income tax purposes. For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, no material contributions
were necessary to meet ERISA required funding levels. However, during each of the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017, we made tax deductible discretionary contributions to the pension benefit plans of $4. Employer contributions to other
benefit plans represent discretionary contributions and do not include payments to retirees for current benefits.
-116-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Our estimated future payments for pension benefits and postretirement benefits, which reflect expected future service, as
appropriate, are as follows:
 Pension
BenefitsOther
Benefits
2020 $ 126$ 37
2021 126 36
2022 127 35
2023 124 34
2024 120 33
2025 - 2029 567 140
In addition to the defined benefit plans, we maintain the Anthem 401(k) Plan, which is a qualified defined contribution plan
covering substantially all employees. Voluntary employee contributions are matched by us subject to certain limitations.
Contributions made by us totaled $201, $211 and $142 during 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Contributions in 2018 include
approximately $58 for a one time contribution made to employees following the enactment of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.
11. Medical Claims Payable
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment (see Note 19, “Segment
Information”), for the year ended December 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business  Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 2,586$ 4,680 $ 7,266
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (10) (24) (34)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 2,576 4,656 7,232
Net incurred medical claims:   
Current year 25,942 52,753 78,695
Prior years redundancies (190) (310) (500)
Total net incurred medical claims 25,752 52,443 78,195
Net payments attributable to:   
Current year medical claims 23,026 47,268 70,294
Prior years medical claims 2,277 4,242 6,519
Total net payments 25,303 51,510 76,813
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,025 5,589 8,614
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 14 19 33
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,039$ 5,608 $ 8,647
-117-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment, for the year ended
December 31, 2018 is as follows:
 Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business  Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 3,383$ 4,431 $ 7,814
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (78) (27) (105)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 3,305 4,404 7,709
Business combinations and purchase adjustments — 199 199
Net incurred medical claims:   
Current year 24,094 45,487 69,581
Prior years redundancies (456) (474) (930)
Total net incurred medical claims 23,638 45,013 68,651
Net payments attributable to:   
Current year medical claims 21,633 41,115 62,748
Prior years medical claims 2,734 3,845 6,579
Total net payments 24,367 44,960 69,327
Net medical claims payable, end of year 2,576 4,656 7,232
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 10 24 34
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 2,586$ 4,680 $ 7,266
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment, for the year ended December
31, 2017 is as follows:
 Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business  Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 3,247$ 4,409 $ 7,656
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (521) (18) (539)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 2,726 4,391 7,117
Business combinations and purchase adjustments — 76 76
Net incurred medical claims:   
Current year 29,467 40,910 70,377
Prior years redundancies (462) (671) (1,133)
Total net incurred medical claims 29,005 40,239 69,244
Net payments attributable to:   
Current year medical claims 26,250 36,673 62,923
Prior years medical claims 2,176 3,629 5,805
Total net payments 28,426 40,302 68,728
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,305 4,404 7,709
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 78 27 105
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,383$ 4,431 $ 7,814
Amounts incurred related to prior years vary from previously estimated liabilities as the claims are ultimately settled.
Liabilities at any period-end are continually reviewed and re-estimated as information regarding actual claims payments, or runout,
becomes known. This information is compared to the originally established year end liability. Negative amounts reported for
incurred medical claims related to prior years result from claims being settled for amounts less than originally
-118-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
estimated. The prior year redundancy of $500 shown above for the year ended December 31, 2019 represents an estimate based on
paid claim activity from January 1, 2019 to December 31, 2019. Medical claim liabilities are usually described as having a “short
tail,” which means that they are generally paid within twelve months of the member receiving service from the provider.
Accordingly, the majority of the $500 redundancy relates to claims incurred in calendar year 2018.
The following table provides a summary of the two key assumptions having the most significant impact on our incurred but not
paid liability estimates for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, which are the completion and trend factors. These
two key assumptions can be influenced by utilization levels, unit costs, mix of business, benefit plan designs, provider
reimbursement levels, processing system conversions and changes, claim inventory levels, claim processing patterns, claim
submission patterns and operational changes resulting from business combinations.
 Favorable Developments
by Changes in Key Assumptions
 2019 2018  2017
Assumed trend factors $ (325)$ (515) $ (631)
Assumed completion factors (175) (415) (502)
Total $ (500)$ (930) $ (1,133)
The favorable development recognized in 2019 resulted primarily from trend factors in late 2018 developing more favorably
than originally expected as well as a smaller but significant contribution from completion factor development.
The favorable development recognized in 2018 and 2017 resulted from trend and completion factors developing more
favorably than originally expected.  
The reconciliation of net incurred medical claims to benefit expense included in the consolidated statements of income is as
follows:
  Years Ended December 31
  2019 2018  2017
Net incurred medical claims:     
Commercial & Specialty Business  $ 25,752$ 23,638 $ 29,005
Government Business  52,443 45,013 40,239
Total net incurred medical claims  78,195 68,651 69,244
Quality improvement and other claims expense  3,591 3,244 2,992
Benefit expense  $ 81,786$ 71,895 $ 72,236
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Commercial & Specialty Business for the years ended December 31,
2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
Commercial & Specialty BusinessCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
 2017 2018
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2019
2017 & Prior $ 31,731$ 31,275$ 31,241
2018  24,094 23,938
2019   25,942
Total   $ 81,121
-119-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Commercial & Specialty Business for the years ended December 31,
2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
Commercial & Specialty BusinessCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
 2017 2018
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2019
2017 & Prior $ 28,426$ 31,160$ 31,210
2018  21,633 23,860
2019   23,026
Total   $ 78,096
At December 31, 2019, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for the
Commercial & Specialty Business was $31, $78 and $2,916 for the claim years 2017 and prior, 2018 and 2019, respectively.
At December 31, 2019, the cumulative number of reported claims for the Commercial & Specialty Business was 121, 89 and
84 for the claim years 2017 and prior, 2018 and 2019, respectively.
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Government Business as of and for the years ended December 31,
2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
Government BusinessCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
 2017 2018
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2019
2017 & Prior $ 44,706$ 44,232$ 44,120
2018  45,686 45,488
2019   52,753
Total   $ 142,361
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Government Business as of and for the years ended December 31, 2019,
2018 and 2017 is as follows:
Government BusinessCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
 2017 2018
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2019
2017 & Prior $ 40,302$ 44,147$ 44,104
2018  41,115 45,400
2019   47,268
Total   $ 136,772
At December 31, 2019, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for the
Government Business was $16, $89 and $5,484 for the claim years 2017 and prior, 2018 and 2019, respectively.
At December 31, 2019, the cumulative number of reported claims for the Government Business was 221, 216 and 230 for the
claim years 2017 and prior, 2018 and 2019, respectively.
The information about incurred claims development, paid claims development and cumulative number of reported claims for
the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2018, for both the Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business, is
unaudited and presented as supplementary information.
-120-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The cumulative number of reported claims for each claim year, for both the Commercial & Specialty Business and
Government Business, have been developed using historical data captured by our claim payment systems. The provided claim
amounts are not a precise tool for understanding utilization of medical services. They could be impacted by a variety of factors
including changes in provider billing practices, provider reimbursement arrangements, mix of services, benefit design or processing
systems. The cumulative number of reported claims has been provided to comply with FASB accounting standards and is not used
by management in its claims analysis. Our cumulative number of reported claims may not be comparable to similar measures
reported by other health benefits companies.
The reconciliation of the Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business incurred and paid claims development
information for the three years ended December 31, 2019, reflected in the tables above, to the consolidated ending balance for
medical claims payable included in the consolidated balance sheet, as of December 31, 2019, is as follows:
 Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business Total
Cumulative incurred claims and allocated claim adjustment expenses, net of
reinsurance $ 81,121$ 142,361$ 223,482
Less: Cumulative paid claims and allocated claim adjustment expenses, net of
reinsurance 78,096 136,772 214,868
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,025 5,589 8,614
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 14 19 33
Insurance lines other than short duration — 195 195
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,039$ 5,803$ 8,842
12. Debt
Short-term Borrowings
We are a member, through certain subsidiaries, of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Indianapolis, the Federal Home Loan Bank
of Cincinnati and the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta, or collectively, the FHLBs. As a member we have the ability to obtain
short-term cash advances, subject to certain minimum collateral requirements. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, $650 and $645,
respectively, were outstanding under our short-term FHLB borrowings. These outstanding short-term FHLB borrowings at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 had fixed interest rates of 1.664% and 2.458%, respectively.
Through certain subsidiaries, we have entered into multiple 364-day lines of credit, or the Subsidiary Credit Facilities, with
separate lenders for general corporate purposes. The Subsidiary Credit Facilities provide combined credit of up to $600. The
interest rate on each line of credit is based on the LIBOR rate plus a predetermined rate. Our ability to borrow under the lines of
credit is subject to compliance with certain covenants. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, $50 and $500, respectively, were
outstanding under our Subsidiary Credit Facilities.
-121-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Long-term Debt
The carrying value of long-term debt at December 31, 2019 and 2018 consists of the following:
 2019  2018
Senior unsecured notes:  
2.250%, due 2019 $ — $ 849
2.500%, due 2020 899 897
4.350%, due 2020 699 688
3.700%, due 2021 699 698
2.950%, due 2022 747 747
3.125%, due 2022 847 846
3.300%, due 2023 1,013 1,000
3.350%, due 2024 846 846
3.500%, due 2024 795 794
2.375%, due 2025 845 —
3.650%, due 2027 1,590 1,589
4.101%, due 2028 1,253 1,250
2.875%, due 2029 819 —
5.950%, due 2034 334 334
5.850%, due 2036 396 396
6.375%, due 2037 366 366
5.800%, due 2040 124 124
4.625%, due 2042 888 887
4.650%, due 2043 987 986
4.650%, due 2044 792 791
5.100%, due 2044 594 594
4.375%, due 2047 1,386 1,386
4.550%, due 2048 838 838
3.700%, due 2049 811 —
4.850%, due 2054 247 247
Surplus note:  
9.000%, due 2027 25 25
Senior convertible debentures:  
2.750%, due 2042 145 191
Variable rate debt:  
Commercial paper program 400 697
Total long-term debt 19,385 18,066
Current portion of long-term debt (1,598) (849)
Long-term debt, less current portion $ 17,787 $ 17,217
All debt is a direct obligation of Anthem, Inc., except for the surplus note, the FHLB borrowings and the Subsidiary Credit
Facilities.
We generally issue senior unsecured notes, or Notes, for long-term borrowing purposes. Certain of these Notes may have a call
feature that allows us to redeem the Notes at any time at our option and/or a put feature that allows a Note holder to
-122-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
redeem the Notes upon the occurrence of both a change in control event and a downgrade of the Notes below an investment grade
rating.
On September 9, 2019, we issued $850 aggregate principal amount of 2.375% Notes due 2025, or the 2025 Notes, $825
aggregate principal amount of 2.875% Notes due 2029, or the 2029 Notes, and $825 aggregate principal amount of 3.700% Notes
due 2049, or the 2049 Notes, under our shelf registration statement. Interest on the 2025 Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears
on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing January 15, 2020. Interest on the 2029 Notes and the 2049 Notes is payable
semi-annually in arrears on March 15 and September 15 each year, commencing March 15, 2020. The proceeds were used for
working capital and general corporate purposes, including, but not limited to, the repurchase of our common stock pursuant to our
share repurchase program, repayment of short-term and long-term debt and to fund acquisitions.
On August 15, 2019, we repaid, at maturity, the $850 outstanding balance of our 2.250% senior unsecured notes.
On July 16, 2018, we repaid, at maturity, the $650 outstanding balance of our 2.300% senior unsecured notes. On January 15,
2018, we repaid, at maturity, the $625 outstanding balance of our 1.875% senior unsecured notes.
On May 1, 2018, we settled our Equity Units stock purchase contracts at a settlement rate of 0.2412 shares of our common
stock, using a market value formula set forth in the Equity Units purchase contracts. This resulted in the issuance of approximately
6 shares. We had issued 25 Equity Units on May 12, 2015, pursuant to an underwriting agreement dated May 6, 2015, in an
aggregate principal amount of $1,250. Each Equity Unit had a stated amount of $50 (whole dollars) and consisted of a purchase
contract obligating the holder to purchase a certain number of shares of our common stock on May 1, 2018, subject to earlier
termination or settlement, for a price in cash of $50 (whole dollars); and a 5% undivided beneficial ownership interest in $1,000
(whole dollars) principal amount of our 1.900% remarketable subordinated notes, or RSNs, due 2028. On March 2, 2018, we
remarketed the RSNs and used the proceeds to purchase U.S. Treasury securities that were pledged to secure the stock purchase
obligations of the holders of the Equity Units. The purchasers of the RSNs transferred the RSNs to us in exchange for $1,250
principal amount of our 4.101% senior notes due 2028, or the 2028 Notes, and a cash payment of $4. We canceled the RSNs upon
receipt and recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $18. At the remarketing, we also issued $850 aggregate principal
amount of 4.550% notes due 2048, or the 2048 Notes, under our shelf registration statement. We used the proceeds from the 2048
Notes for working capital and general corporate purposes. Interest on the 2028 Notes and the 2048 Notes is payable semi-annually
in arrears on March 1 and September 1 of each year, commencing on September 1, 2018.
On November 21, 2017, we issued $900 aggregate principal amount of 2.500% Notes due 2020, or the 2020 Notes, $750
aggregate principal amount of 2.950% Notes due 2022, or the 2022 Notes, $850 aggregate principal amount of 3.350% Notes due
2024, or the 2024 Notes, $1,600 aggregate principal amount of 3.650% Notes due 2027, or the 2027 Notes and $1,400 aggregate
principal amount of 4.375% Notes due 2047, or the 2047 Notes, under our shelf registration statement. Interest on the 2020 Notes is
payable semi-annually in arrears on May 21 and November 21 of each year, commencing on May 21, 2018. Interest on the 2022
Notes, the 2024 Notes, the 2027 Notes and the 2047 Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on June 1 and December 1 of each
year, commencing on June 1, 2018. The net proceeds were used to fund the acquisitions of HealthSun and America’s 1st Choice;
and redemption of the Tender Notes, discussed below.
On November 14, 2017, we initiated a cash tender offer to purchase any and all of our 7.000% Notes due 2019, or the Any and
All Notes, and certain of our 5.950% Notes due 2034, 5.850% Notes due 2036, 6.375% Notes due 2037, 5.800% Notes due 2040
and 5.100% Notes due 2044, or the Maximum Tender Offer Notes, and collectively with the Any and All Notes, the Tender Notes.
On November 21, 2017, we repurchased $185 aggregate principal amount of the Any and All Notes, plus applicable premium and
accrued and unpaid interest, for cash totaling $199. On November 30, 2017, we repurchased $836 aggregate principal amount of
the Maximum Tender Offer Notes, plus applicable premium and accrued and unpaid interest, for cash totaling $1,095. We
recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $266 for the repurchase of the Tender Notes.
On December 14, 2017, we redeemed the $255 remaining outstanding principal balance of our 7.000% Notes due 2019, plus
applicable premium for early redemption and accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date, for cash totaling $275. We
recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $14 for the repurchase of these Notes.
-123-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The surplus note is an unsecured obligation of Anthem Insurance Companies, Inc., or Anthem Insurance, a wholly owned
subsidiary, and is subordinate in right of payment to all of Anthem Insurance’s existing and future indebtedness. Any payment of
interest or principal on the surplus note may be made only with the prior approval of the Indiana Department of Insurance, or IDOI,
and only out of capital and surplus funds of Anthem Insurance that the IDOI determines to be available for the payment under
Indiana insurance laws.
We have a senior revolving credit facility, or the 5-Year Facility, with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes. In
June 2019, we amended and restated the credit agreement for the 5-Year Facility to, among other things, extend the maturity date
from August 2020 to June 2024 and decrease the amount of credit available from $3,500 to $2,500. In June 2019, we also entered
into a 364-day senior revolving credit facility, or 364-Day Facility, with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes, which
provides for credit in the amount of $1,000 and matures in June 2020. There were no amounts outstanding under the 5-Year Facility
or the 364-Day Facility at any time during the years ended December 31, 2019 or 2018.
We have an authorized commercial paper program of up to $3,500, the proceeds of which may be used for general corporate
purposes. In August 2019, we increased the amount available under the commercial paper program from $2,500 to $3,500. At
December 31, 2019, we had $400 outstanding under our commercial paper program with a weighted-average interest rate of
1.8528%. At December 31, 2018, we had $697 outstanding under our commercial paper program with a weighted-average interest
rate of 2.8270%. Commercial paper borrowings have been classified as long-term debt at December 31, 2019 and 2018, as our
general practice and intent is to replace short-term commercial paper outstanding at expiration with additional short-term
commercial paper for an uninterrupted period extending for more than one year, and we have the ability to redeem our commercial
paper with borrowings under the senior revolving credit facilities described above.
During the year ended December 31, 2015, we entered into a bridge facility commitment letter and a joinder agreement, and a
term loan facility, to finance a portion of the consideration under the now terminated Cigna Merger Agreement. In January 2017,
we reduced the size of the bridge facility from $22,500 to $19,500 and extended the termination date under the Cigna Merger
Agreement, as well as the availability of commitments under the bridge facility and term loan facility, to April 30, 2017. We
recorded $108 of interest expense related to the amortization of the bridge loan facility and other related fees during the year ended
December 31, 2017. The commitment of the lenders to provide the bridge facility and term loan facility expired on April 30, 2017.
Convertible Debentures
On October 9, 2012, we issued $1,500 of senior convertible debentures, or the Debentures, in a private offering to qualified
institutional buyers pursuant to Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Act. The Debentures are
governed by an indenture dated as of October 9, 2012 between us and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as
trustee, or the Indenture. The Debentures bear interest at a rate of 2.750% per year, payable semi-annually in arrears in cash on
April 15 and October 15 of each year, and mature on October 15, 2042, unless earlier redeemed, repurchased or converted into
shares of common stock at the applicable conversion rate. The Debentures also have a contingent interest feature that will require
us to pay additional interest based on certain thresholds and for certain events, as defined in the Indenture, beginning on
October 15, 2022.
Holders may convert their Debentures at their option prior to the close of business on the business day immediately preceding
April 15, 2042, only under the following circumstances: (1) during any fiscal quarter if the last reported sale price of our common
stock for at least 20 trading days during a period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on the last trading day of the preceding
fiscal quarter is greater than or equal to 130% of the applicable conversion price on each applicable trading day; (2) during the five
business day period after any 10 consecutive trading day period, or the measurement period, in which the trading price per $1,000
(whole dollars) principal amount of Debentures for each trading day of that measurement period was less than 98% of the product
of the last reported sale price of our common stock and the applicable conversion rate on each such day; (3) if we call any or all of
the Debentures for redemption, at any time prior to the close of business on the third scheduled trading day prior to the redemption
date; or (4) upon the occurrence of specified corporate events, as defined in the Indenture. On and after April 15, 2042 and until the
close of business on the third scheduled trading day immediately preceding the Debentures’ maturity date of October 15, 2042,
holders may convert their Debentures into common stock at any time irrespective of the preceding circumstances. The Debentures
are redeemable at our option at any time on or after October 20, 2022, upon the occurrence of certain events, as defined in the
Indenture.
-124-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Upon conversion of the Debentures, we will deliver cash up to the aggregate principal amount of the Debentures converted.
With respect to any conversion obligation in excess of the aggregate principal amount of the Debentures converted, we have the
option to settle the excess with cash, shares of our common stock or a combination thereof based on a daily conversion value,
determined in accordance with the Indenture. The initial conversion rate for the Debentures was 13.2319 shares of our common
stock per Debenture, which represented a 25% conversion premium based on the closing price of $60.46 per share of our common
stock on October 2, 2012 (the date the Debentures’ terms were finalized) and is equivalent to an initial conversion price of
$75.575 per share of our common stock.
During the year ended December 31, 2019, we repurchased $15 of the aggregate principal balance of the Debentures. In
addition, $57 aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion by certain holders in accordance with
the terms and provisions of the Indenture. We elected to settle the excess of the principal amount of the repurchases and
conversions with cash for total payments of $273. We recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the Debentures of
$2, based on the fair values of the debt on the repurchase and conversion settlement dates. During the year ended December 31,
2018, $109 aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion. We elected to settle the excess of the
principal amount of the conversions with cash for total payments of $402. We recognized a gain on the extinguishment of debt
related to the debentures of $7. During the year ended December 31, 2017, $117 aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was
surrendered for conversion. We elected to settle the excess of the principal amount of the conversions with cash for total payments
of $345 and recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the debentures of $2.
As of December 31, 2019, our common stock was last traded at a price of $302.03 per share. If the remaining Debentures had
been converted or matured at December 31, 2019, we would have been obligated to pay the principal of the Debentures plus an
amount in cash or shares equal to $691. The Debentures and underlying shares of our common stock have not been and will not be
registered under the Securities Act, or any state securities laws, and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent
registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
We have accounted for the Debentures in accordance with the cash conversion guidance in FASB guidance for debt with
conversion and other options. As a result, the value of the embedded conversion option, net of deferred taxes and equity issuance
costs, has been bifurcated from its debt host and recorded as a component of additional paid-in capital in our consolidated balance
sheets.
The following table summarizes, at December 31, 2019, the related balances, conversion rate and conversion price of the
Debentures:
Outstanding principal amount $ 215
Unamortized debt discount $ 68
Net debt carrying amount $ 145
Equity component carrying amount $ 78
Conversion rate (shares of common stock per $1,000 of principal amount) 13.9500
Effective conversion price (per $1,000 of principal amount) $ 71.6843
The remaining amortization period of the unamortized debt discount as of December 31, 2019 is approximately 23 years. The
unamortized discount will be amortized into interest expense using the effective interest method based on an effective interest rate
of 5.130%, which represents the market interest rate for a comparable debt instrument that does not have a conversion feature.
During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, we recognized $9, $12 and $17, respectively, of interest expense
related to the Debentures, of which $7, $10 and $14, respectively, represented interest expense recognized at the stated interest rate
of 2.750% and $2, $2 and $3, respectively, represented interest expense resulting from amortization of the debt discount.
Total interest paid during 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $755, $728, and $778, respectively. 
We were in compliance with all applicable covenants under all of our outstanding debt agreements at December 31, 2019 and
2018.
-125-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Future maturities of all long-term debt outstanding at December 31, 2019 are as follows: 2020, $1,998; 2021, $699; 2022,
$1,594; 2023, $1,013; 2024, $1,641 and thereafter, $12,440.
13. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings
In the ordinary course of business, we are defendants in, or parties to, a number of pending or threatened legal actions or
proceedings. To the extent a plaintiff or plaintiffs in the following cases have specified in their complaint or in other court filings
the amount of damages being sought, we have noted those alleged damages in the descriptions below. With respect to the cases
described below, we contest liability and/or the amount of damages in each matter and believe we have meritorious defenses.
Where available information indicates that it is probable that a loss has been incurred as of the date of the consolidated
financial statements and we can reasonably estimate the amount of that loss, we accrue the estimated loss by a charge to income. In
many proceedings, however, it is difficult to determine whether any loss is probable or reasonably possible. In addition, even where
loss is possible or an exposure to loss exists in excess of the liability already accrued with respect to a previously identified loss
contingency, it is not always possible to reasonably estimate the amount of the possible loss or range of loss.
With respect to many of the proceedings to which we are a party, we cannot provide an estimate of the possible losses, or the
range of possible losses in excess of the amount, if any, accrued, for various reasons, including but not limited to some or all of the
following: (i) there are novel or unsettled legal issues presented, (ii) the proceedings are in early stages, (iii) there is uncertainty as
to the likelihood of a class being certified or decertified or the ultimate size and scope of the class, (iv) there is uncertainty as to the
outcome of pending appeals or motions, (v) there are significant factual issues to be resolved, and/or (vi) in many cases, the
plaintiffs have not specified damages in their complaint or in court filings. For those legal proceedings where a loss is probable, or
reasonably possible, and for which it is possible to reasonably estimate the amount of the possible loss or range of losses, we
currently believe that the range of possible losses, in excess of established reserves is, in the aggregate, from $0 to approximately
$750 at December 31, 2019. This estimated aggregate range of reasonably possible losses is based upon currently available
information taking into account our best estimate of such losses for which such an estimate can be made.
Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation
We are a defendant in multiple lawsuits that were initially filed in 2012 against the BCBSA and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
licensees, or Blue plans, across the country. The cases were consolidated into a single, multi-district proceeding captioned In re
Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation that is pending in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Alabama,
or the Court. Generally, the suits allege that the BCBSA and the Blue plans have conspired to horizontally allocate geographic
markets through license agreements, best efforts rules that limit the percentage of non-Blue revenue of each plan, restrictions on
acquisitions rules governing the BlueCard and National Accounts programs and other arrangements in violation of the Sherman
Antitrust Act, or Sherman Act, and related state laws. The cases were brought by two putative nationwide classes of plaintiffs,
health plan subscribers and providers, and actions filed in twenty-eight states have been consolidated into the multi-district
proceeding.
In response to cross motions for partial summary judgment by plaintiffs and defendants, the Court issued an order in April
2018 determining that the defendants’ aggregation of geographic market allocations and output restrictions are to be analyzed under
a per se standard of review, and the BlueCard program and other alleged Section 1 Sherman Act violations are to be analyzed under
the rule of reason standard of review. The Court also found that there remain genuine issues of material fact as to whether
defendants operate as a single entity with regard to the enforcement of the Blue Cross Blue Shield trademarks. No dates have been
set for either the final pretrial conferences or trials in these actions. In March 2019, the Court issued a Fourth Amended Scheduling
Order requiring that briefing on motions for class certification and related expert reports, merits and damages expert reports, and
certain dispositive motions occur in 2019. In April 2019, plaintiffs filed their motions for class certification in conjunction with
their supporting expert reports. Defendants filed their motions to exclude plaintiffs’ experts, as well as their opposition to plaintiffs’
motions for class certification, in July 2019. The case has been stayed until further notice from the Court.
-126-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
We intend to vigorously defend these suits; however, their ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
Blue Cross of California Taxation Litigation
In July 2013, our California affiliate Blue Cross of California (doing business as Anthem Blue Cross), or BCC, was named as a
defendant in a California taxpayer action filed in Los Angeles County Superior Court, captioned Michael D. Myers v. State Board
of Equalization, et al. This action was brought under a California statute that permits an individual taxpayer to sue a governmental
agency when the taxpayer believes the agency has failed to enforce governing law. Plaintiff contends that BCC, a licensed Health
Care Service Plan, or HCSP, is an “insurer” for purposes of taxation despite acknowledging it is not an “insurer” under regulatory
law. At the time, under California law, “insurers” were required to pay a gross premiums tax, or GPT, calculated as 2.35% on gross
premiums. As a licensed HCSP, BCC has paid the California Corporate Franchise Tax, or CFT, the tax paid by California
businesses generally. Plaintiff contends that BCC must pay the GPT rather than the CFT, and seeks a writ of mandate directing the
taxing agencies to collect the GPT and an order requiring BCC to pay GPT back taxes, interest, and penalties for the eight-year
period prior to the filing of the complaint.
In March 2018, the Superior Court denied BCC’s motion for judgment on the pleadings and similar motions brought by other
entities. We filed a writ of mandate in the California Court of Appeal. Although the California Court of Appeal initially accepted
our writ, it later indicated that it will not hear the issues raised by our writ until the case concludes in the Superior Court. The
Superior Court has postponed the March 2020 trial date to July 2020. The parties are currently engaged in discovery and are in the
process of retaining experts. Because GPT is constitutionally imposed in lieu of certain other taxes, BCC has filed protective tax
refund claims with the City of Los Angeles, the California Department of Health Care Services and the Franchise Tax Board to
protect its rights to recover certain taxes previously paid should BCC eventually be determined to be subject to the GPT for the tax
periods at issue in the litigation. BCC intends to vigorously defend this suit; however, its ultimate outcome cannot be presently
determined.
Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management Litigation
In March 2016, we filed a lawsuit against Express Scripts, Inc., or Express Scripts, our vendor for PBM services, captioned
Anthem, Inc. v. Express Scripts, Inc., in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York. The lawsuit seeks to recover
over $14,800 in damages for pharmacy pricing that is higher than competitive benchmark pricing under the agreement between the
parties, or the ESI PBM Agreement, over $158 in damages related to operational breaches, as well as various declarations under the
ESI PBM Agreement between the parties, including that Express Scripts: (i) breached its obligation to negotiate in good faith and to
agree in writing to new pricing terms; (ii) was required to provide competitive benchmark pricing to us through the term of the ESI
PBM Agreement; (iii) has breached the ESI PBM Agreement; and (iv) is required under the ESI PBM Agreement to provide post-
termination services, at competitive benchmark pricing, for one year following any termination.
Express Scripts has disputed our contractual claims and is seeking declaratory judgments: (i) regarding the timing of the
periodic pricing review under the ESI PBM Agreement; and (ii) that it has no obligation to ensure that we receive any specific level
of pricing, that we have no contractual right to any change in pricing under the ESI PBM Agreement and that its sole obligation is
to negotiate proposed pricing terms in good faith. In the alternative, Express Scripts claims that we have been unjustly enriched by
its payment of $4,675 at the time we entered into the ESI PBM Agreement. In March 2017, the court granted our motion to dismiss
Express Scripts’ counterclaims for (i) breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing, and (ii) unjust enrichment with
prejudice. The only remaining claims are for breach of contract and declaratory relief. Fact discovery has been completed. We
intend to vigorously pursue our claims and defend against any counterclaims, which we believe are without merit; however, the
ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
In re Express Scripts/Anthem ERISA Litigation
We are a defendant in a class action lawsuit that was initially filed in June 2016 against Anthem, Inc. and Express Scripts,
which has been consolidated into a single multi-district lawsuit captioned In Re Express Scripts/Anthem ERISA Litigation, in the
U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York. The consolidated complaint was filed by plaintiffs against Express
Scripts and us on behalf of all persons who are participants in or beneficiaries of any ERISA or non-ERISA healthcare plan from
December 1, 2009 to December 31, 2019 in which we provided prescription drug benefits through the ESI PBM Agreement and
paid a percentage based co-insurance payment in the course of using that prescription drug benefit. The plaintiffs allege that we
breached our duties, either under ERISA or with respect to the implied covenant of
-127-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
good faith and fair dealing implied in the health plans, (i) by failing to adequately monitor Express Scripts’ pricing under the ESI
PBM Agreement and (ii) by placing our own pecuniary interest above the best interests of our insureds by allegedly agreeing to
higher pricing in the ESI PBM Agreement in exchange for the purchase price for our NextRx PBM business, and (iii) with respect
to the non-ERISA members, by negotiating and entering into the ESI PBM Agreement that was allegedly detrimental to the
interests of such non-ERISA members. Plaintiffs seek to hold us and Express Scripts jointly and severally liable and to recover all
losses suffered by the proposed class, equitable relief, disgorgement of alleged ill-gotten gains, injunctive relief, attorney’s fees and
costs and interest.
In April 2017, we filed a motion to dismiss the claims brought against us, and it was granted, without prejudice, in January
2018. Plaintiffs filed a notice of appeal with the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit, which was heard in October
2018 but has not yet been decided. We intend to vigorously defend this suit; however, its ultimate outcome cannot be presently
determined.
Cigna Corporation Merger Litigation
In July 2015, we and Cigna announced that we entered into the Cigna Merger Agreement, pursuant to which we would acquire
all outstanding shares of Cigna. In July 2016, the U.S. Department of Justice, or DOJ, along with certain state attorneys general,
filed a civil antitrust lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia, or District Court, seeking to block the merger.
In February 2017, Cigna purported to terminate the Cigna Merger Agreement and commenced litigation against us in the Delaware
Court of Chancery, or Delaware Court, seeking damages, including the $1,850 termination fee pursuant to the terms of the Cigna
Merger Agreement, and a declaratory judgment that its purported termination of the Cigna Merger Agreement was lawful, among
other claims, which is captioned Cigna Corp. v. Anthem Inc.
Also in February 2017, we initiated our own litigation against Cigna in the Delaware Court seeking a temporary restraining
order to enjoin Cigna from terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement, specific performance compelling Cigna to comply with the
Cigna Merger Agreement and damages, which is captioned Anthem Inc. v. Cigna Corp. In April 2017, the U.S. Circuit Court of
Appeals for the District of Columbia affirmed the ruling of the District Court, which blocked the merger. In May 2017, after the
Delaware Court denied our motion to enjoin Cigna from terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement, we delivered to Cigna a notice
terminating the Cigna Merger Agreement.
In the Delaware Court litigation, trial commenced in late February 2019 and concluded in March 2019. The Delaware Court
held closing argument in November 2019 and took the matter under consideration. In February 2020, the Delaware Court requested
supplemental briefing. The parties have been instructed to negotiate a schedule for the supplemental submissions. We believe
Cigna’s allegations are without merit, and we intend to vigorously pursue our claims and defend against Cigna’s allegations;
however, the ultimate outcome of our litigation with Cigna cannot be presently determined.
In October 2018, a shareholder filed a derivative lawsuit in the State of Indiana Marion County Superior Court, captioned
Henry Bittmann, Derivatively, et al. v. Joseph R Swedish, et al., purportedly on behalf of us and our shareholders against certain
current and former directors and officers alleging breaches of fiduciary duties, unjust enrichment and corporate waste associated
with the Cigna Merger Agreement. This case has been stayed at the request of the parties pending the outcome of our litigation with
Cigna in the Delaware Court. This lawsuit’s ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) Civil Investigative Demands
Beginning in December 2016, the DOJ has issued civil investigative demands to us to discover information about our chart
review and risk adjustment programs under Parts C and D of the Medicare program. We understand the DOJ is investigating the
programs of other Medicare Advantage health plans, along with providers and vendors. We continue to cooperate with the DOJ’s
investigation, and the ultimate outcome cannot presently be determined.
Cyber Attack Regulatory Proceedings and Litigation
In February 2015, we reported that we were the target of a sophisticated external cyber attack, during which the attackers
gained unauthorized access to certain of our information technology systems and obtained personal information related to many
individuals and employees. To date, there is no evidence that credit card or medical information was accessed or
-128-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
obtained. Upon discovery of the cyber attack, we took immediate action to remediate the security vulnerability and have continued
to implement security enhancements since this incident.
Federal and state agencies are investigating, or have investigated, events related to the cyber attack, including how it occurred,
its consequences and our responses. The investigations have all been resolved with the exception of an ongoing investigation by a
multi-state group of attorneys general, which remains outstanding. Although we are cooperating in this investigation, we may be
subject to additional fines or other obligations. We intend to vigorously defend the remaining regulatory investigation; however, its
ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
We have contingency plans and insurance coverage for certain expenses and potential liabilities of this nature and will pursue
coverage for all applicable losses; however, the ultimate outcome of our pursuit of insurance coverage cannot be presently
determined.
Other Contingencies
From time to time, we and certain of our subsidiaries are parties to various legal proceedings, many of which involve claims for
coverage encountered in the ordinary course of business. We, like HMOs and health insurers generally, exclude certain healthcare
and other services from coverage under our HMO, PPO and other plans. We are, in the ordinary course of business, subject to the
claims of our enrollees arising out of decisions to restrict or deny reimbursement for uncovered services. The loss of even one such
claim, if it results in a significant punitive damage award, could have a material adverse effect on us. In addition, the risk of
potential liability under punitive damage theories may increase significantly the difficulty of obtaining reasonable reimbursement
of coverage claims.
In addition to the lawsuits described above, we are also involved in other pending and threatened litigation of the character
incidental to our business, and are from time to time involved as a party in various governmental investigations, audits, reviews and
administrative proceedings. These investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings include routine and special
inquiries by state insurance departments, state attorneys general, the U.S. Attorney General and subcommittees of the U.S.
Congress. Such investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings could result in the imposition of civil or criminal
fines, penalties, other sanctions and additional rules, regulations or other restrictions on our business operations. Any liability that
may result from any one of these actions, or in the aggregate, could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial
position or results of operations.
Contractual Obligations and Commitments
In the second quarter of 2019, we began using our new pharmacy benefits manager called IngenioRx to market and sell a PBM
product to fully-insured and self-funded Anthem health plan customers throughout the country, as well as to customers outside of
the health plans we own. This comprehensive product portfolio includes features such as drug formularies, a pharmacy network,
prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities. Also beginning in the second quarter of 2019, we began
delegating certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health,
L.L.C., or CVS Health, which is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation, pursuant to a five-year agreement with CVS Health, or
the CVS PBM Agreement. We intend to retain the responsibilities for IngenioRx’s clinical and formulary strategy and development,
member and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy. From December
2009 through December 2019, we delegated certain PBM functions and administrative services to Express Scripts pursuant to the
ESI PBM Agreement. In January 2019, we exercised our contractual right to terminate the ESI PBM Agreement earlier than the
original expiration date of December 31, 2019, due to the acquisition of Express Scripts by Cigna. We began transitioning existing
members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019, and completed the transition of all of our members on
January 1, 2020. Prior to the termination of the ESI PBM Agreement, Express Scripts managed the network of pharmacy providers,
operated mail order pharmacies and processed prescription drug claims on our behalf, while we sold and supported the product for
our members, made formulary decisions, sold drug benefit design strategy and provided front line member support. Express Scripts
continues to provide certain audit and run out transition services related to our PBM business. Notwithstanding our termination of
the ESI PBM Agreement, the litigation between us and Express Scripts regarding the ESI PBM Agreement continues. For
additional information regarding this lawsuit, refer to the Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings–Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy
Benefit Management Litigation section above. We believe we have appropriately recognized all rights and obligations under the
ESI PBM Agreement as of December 31, 2019.
-129-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Vulnerability from Concentrations
Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist primarily of cash equivalents,
investment securities, premium receivables and instruments held through hedging activities. All investment securities are managed
by professional investment managers within policies authorized by our Board of Directors. Such policies limit the amounts that
may be invested in any one issuer and prescribe certain investee company criteria. Concentrations of credit risk with respect to
premium receivables are limited due to the large number of employer groups that constitute our customer base in the states in
which we conduct business. As of December 31, 2019, there were no significant concentrations of financial instruments in a single
investee, industry or geographic location.
14. Capital Stock 
Stock Incentive Plans
Our Board of Directors has adopted the 2017 Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, or 2017 Incentive Plan, which has been
approved by our shareholders. The term of the 2017 Incentive Plan is such that no awards may be granted on or after May 18, 2027.
The 2017 Incentive Plan gives authority to the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors to make incentive awards to our
non-employee directors, employees and consultants, consisting of stock options, stock, restricted stock, restricted stock units, cash-
based awards, stock appreciation rights, performance shares and performance units. The 2017 Incentive Plan limits the number of
available shares for issuance to 37.5 shares, subject to adjustment as set forth in the 2017 Incentive Plan.
Stock options are granted for a fixed number of shares with an exercise price at least equal to the fair value of the shares at the
grant date. Historically, stock options have vested over three years in equal semi-annual installments and generally have a term of
ten years from the grant date. Amendments to the 2017 Incentive Plan, effective July 1, 2018, require future grants of stock options
to vest in three equal annual installments.
Certain option grants contain provisions whereby the employee continues to vest in the award subsequent to termination due to
retirement. Our attribution method for newly granted awards considers all vesting and other provisions, including retirement
eligibility, in determining the requisite service period over which the fair value of the awards will be recognized.
Awards of restricted stock or restricted stock units are issued at the fair value of the stock on the grant date and may also
include one or more performance measures that must be met for the award to vest. For restricted stock or restricted stock units
without performance measures, the restrictions lapse in three equal annual installments. Restricted stock or restricted stock units
with performance measures vest in three year installments. Performance units issued in 2019 will vest in 2022, based on earnings
targets over the three year period of 2019 to 2021. Performance units issued in 2018 will vest in 2021, based on earnings targets
over the three year period of 2018 to 2020. Performance units issued in 2017 will vest in 2020, based on earnings targets over the
three year period of 2017 to 2019.
For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, we recognized share-based compensation expense of $294, $226 and
$170, respectively, as well as related tax benefits of $78, $61 and $68, respectively.
A summary of stock option activity for the year ended December 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Number of
SharesWeighted-Average
Option Price per
Share  Weighted-Average
Remaining
Contractual Life
(Years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
Outstanding at January 1, 2019 3.7$ 149.65  
Granted 0.7 306.61  
Exercised (1.2) 126.10  
Forfeited or expired (0.1) 241.26  
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 3.1 190.31 6.18$ 355
Exercisable at December 31, 2019 2.0 145.37 4.93$ 312
-130-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The intrinsic value of options exercised during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 amounted to $188, $172
and $192, respectively. We recognized tax benefits of $52, $47 and $76 during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively, from option exercises and disqualifying dispositions. During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, we
received cash of $143, $141 and $200, respectively, from exercises of stock options.
The total fair value of restricted stock awards that vested during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $245,
$237 and $127, respectively.
A summary of the status of nonvested restricted stock activity, including restricted stock units, for the year ended
December 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Restricted
Stock Shares
and Units  Weighted-Average
Grant Date
Fair Value
per Share
Nonvested at January 1, 2019 1.7 $ 183.32
Granted 0.6 305.88
Vested (0.8) 153.79
Forfeited (0.1) 242.38
Nonvested at December 31, 2019 1.4 242.47
During the year ended December 31, 2019, we granted approximately 0.2 restricted stock units that are contingent upon us
achieving earning targets over the three year period of 2019 to 2021. These grants have been included in the activity shown above,
but will be subject to adjustment at the end of 2021, based on results in the three year period.
As of December 31, 2019, the total remaining unrecognized compensation expense related to nonvested stock options and
restricted stock, including restricted stock units, amounted to $25 and $139, respectively, which will be amortized over the
weighted-average remaining requisite service periods of 11 months and 12 months, respectively.
As of December 31, 2019, there were approximately 20.5 shares of common stock available for future grants under the 2017
Incentive Plan.
 Fair Value
We use a binomial lattice valuation model to estimate the fair value of all stock options granted. Expected volatility
assumptions used in the binomial lattice model are based on an analysis of implied volatilities of publicly traded options on our
stock and historical volatility of our stock price. The risk-free interest rate is derived from the U.S. Treasury strip rates at the time
of the grant. The expected term of the options was derived from the outputs of the binomial lattice model, which incorporates post-
vesting forfeiture assumptions based on an analysis of historical data. The dividend yield was based on our estimate of future
dividend yields. Similar groups of employees that have dissimilar exercise behavior are considered separately for valuation
purposes. We utilize the multiple-grant approach for recognizing compensation expense associated with each separately vesting
portion of the share-based award.
-131-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The following weighted-average assumptions were used to estimate the fair values of options granted during the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017:
 2019 2018  2017
Risk-free interest rate 2.69% 2.90% 2.31%
Volatility factor 25.00% 30.00% 32.00%
Dividend yield (annual) 1.00% 1.30% 1.60%
Weighted-average expected life (years) 4.40 3.70 4.00
The following weighted-average fair values were determined for the years ending December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017:
 2019 2018 2017
Options granted during the year $ 68.66$ 55.48$ 40.88
Restricted stock awards granted during the year 305.88 233.73 174.44
The binomial lattice option-pricing model requires the input of highly subjective assumptions including the expected stock
price volatility. Because our stock option grants have characteristics significantly different from those of traded options, and
because changes in the subjective input assumptions can materially affect the fair value estimate, in our opinion, existing models do
not necessarily provide a reliable single measure of the fair value of our stock option grants.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
We have registered 14.0 shares of common stock for the Employee Stock Purchase Plan, or the Stock Purchase Plan, which is
intended to provide a means to encourage and assist employees in acquiring a stock ownership interest in Anthem. Pursuant to the
terms of the Stock Purchase Plan, an eligible employee is permitted to purchase no more than $25,000 (actual dollars) worth of
stock in any calendar year, based on the fair value of the stock at the end of each plan quarter. Employees become participants by
electing payroll deductions from 1% to 15% of gross compensation. Once purchased, the stock is accumulated in the employee’s
investment account. The Stock Purchase Plan allows participants to purchase shares of our common stock at a discounted price per
share of 90% of the fair value of a share of common stock on the lower of the first or last trading day of the plan quarter purchase
period. The Stock Purchase Plan discount was recognized as compensation expense for the year ended December 31, 2019, based
on GAAP guidance. There were 0.2 shares issued during the year ended December 31, 2019. As of December 31, 2019, 4.9 shares
were available for issuance under the Stock Purchase Plan.
Use of Capital and Stock Repurchase Program
We regularly review the appropriate use of capital, including acquisitions, common stock and debt security repurchases and
dividends to shareholders. The declaration and payment of any dividends or repurchases of our common stock or debt is at the
discretion of our Board of Directors and depends upon our financial condition, results of operations, future liquidity needs,
regulatory and capital requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our Board of Directors.
-132-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of the cash dividend activity for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows: 
Declaration Date Record Date  Payment DateCash Dividend per
Share Total
Year ended December 31, 2019    
January 29, 2019 March 18, 2019 March 29, 2019 $ 0.80 $ 206
April 23, 2019 June 10, 2019 June 25, 2019 0.80 206
July 23, 2019 September 10, 2019 September 25, 2019 0.80 204
October 22, 2019 December 5, 2019 December 20, 2019 0.80 202
     
Year ended December 31, 2018    
January 30, 2018 March 9, 2018 March 23, 2018 $ 0.75 $ 192
April 24, 2018 June 8, 2018 June 25, 2018 0.75 196
July 24, 2018 September 10, 2018 September 25, 2018 0.75 195
October 30, 2018 December 5, 2018 December 21, 2018 0.75 193
On January 28, 2020, our Audit Committee declared a quarterly cash dividend to shareholders of $0.95 per share on the
outstanding shares of our common stock. This quarterly dividend is payable on March 27, 2020 to the shareholders of record as of
March 16, 2020.
Under our Board of Directors’ authorization, we maintain a common stock repurchase program. On December 7, 2017, the
Board of Directors authorized a $5,000 increase to the common stock repurchase program. Repurchases may be made from time to
time at prevailing market prices, subject to certain restrictions on volume, pricing and timing. The repurchases are effected from
time to time in the open market, through negotiated transactions, including accelerated share repurchase agreements, and through
plans designed to comply with Rule 10b5-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Our stock repurchase program
is discretionary, as we are under no obligation to repurchase shares. We repurchase shares under the program when we believe it is
a prudent use of capital. The excess cost of the repurchased shares over par value is charged on a pro rata basis to additional paid-in
capital and retained earnings.
A summary of common stock repurchases for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 Years Ended December 31
 2019 2018
Shares repurchased 6.3 6.8
Average price per share $ 268.65$ 248.34
Aggregate cost $ 1,701$ 1,685
Authorization remaining at end of year $ 3,792$ 5,493
We expect to utilize the remaining authorized amount over a multi-year period, subject to market and industry conditions.
For additional information regarding the use of capital for debt security repurchases, see Note 12, “Debt.”
-133-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
15. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
A reconciliation of the components of accumulated other comprehensive loss at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 2019  2018
Investments:  
Gross unrealized gains $ 720 $ 173
Gross unrealized losses (44) (371)
Net pretax unrealized gains (losses) 676 (198)
Deferred tax (liability) asset (155) 39
Net unrealized gains (losses) on investments 521 (159)
Non-credit components of OTTI on investments:  
Gross unrealized losses (3) (3)
Deferred tax asset 1 1
Net unrealized non-credit component of OTTI on investments (2) (2)
Cash flow hedges:  
Gross unrealized losses (331) (311)
Deferred tax asset 69 65
Net unrealized losses on cash flow hedges (262) (246)
Defined benefit pension plans:  
Deferred net actuarial loss (734) (751)
Deferred prior service cost (1) (1)
Deferred tax asset 188 193
Net unrecognized periodic benefit costs for defined benefit pension plans (547) (559)
Postretirement benefit plans:  
Deferred net actuarial loss (25) (58)
Deferred prior service credits 19 34
Deferred tax asset 2 6
Net unrecognized periodic benefit costs for postretirement benefit plans (4) (18)
Foreign currency translation adjustments:  
Gross unrealized losses (3) (3)
Deferred tax asset 1 1
Net unrealized losses on foreign currency translation adjustments (2) (2)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss $ (296) $ (986)
-134-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Other comprehensive income (loss) reclassification adjustments for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 are as
follows:
 2019  2018 2017
Investments:    
Net holding gain (loss) on investment securities arising during the period, net
of tax (expense) benefit of $(198), $133, and ($153), respectively $ 695 $ (465)$ 280
Reclassification adjustment for net realized (gain) loss on investment
securities, net of tax expense (benefit) of $4, $(13), and $58, respectively (15) 47 (107)
Total reclassification adjustment on investments 680 (418) 173
Non-credit component of OTTI on investments:    
Non-credit component of OTTI on investments, net of tax benefit (expense)
of $0, $1, and ($3), respectively — (2) 4
Cash flow hedges:    
Holding (loss) gain, net of tax benefit (expense) of $4, $(10), and $35,
respectively (16) 37 (65)
Other:    
Net change in unrecognized periodic benefit costs for defined benefit pension
and postretirement benefit plans, net of tax (expense) benefit of $(9), $29, and
$(35), respectively 26 (90) 51
Foreign currency translation adjustment, net of tax expense of $0, $0, and ($1),
respectively — (1) 3
Net gain (loss) recognized in other comprehensive loss, net of tax (expense) benefit
of $(199), $140, and ($99), respectively $ 690 $ (474)$ 166
16. Reinsurance
We reinsure certain risks with other companies and assume risk from other companies. We remain primarily liable to
policyholders under ceded insurance contracts and are contingently liable for amounts recoverable from reinsurers in the event that
such reinsurers do not meet their contractual obligations.
A summary of direct, assumed and ceded premiums written and earned for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
is as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Written Earned Written Earned  Written  Earned
Direct $ 93,953 $ 93,505 $ 84,835 $ 85,213 $ 83,974 $ 83,418
Assumed 822 713 264 259 275 275
Ceded (45) (45) (51) (51) (44) (45)
Net premiums $ 94,730 $ 94,173 $ 85,048 $ 85,421 $ 84,205 $ 83,648
Percentage—assumed to net
premiums 0.9% 0.8% 0.3% 0.3% 0.3% 0.3%
-135-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of net premiums written and earned by segment (see Note 19, “Segment Information”) for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Written Earned Written Earned  Written  Earned
Reportable segments:     
Commercial & Specialty
Business $ 32,113$ 31,944$ 30,661$ 30,532 $ 35,382 $ 35,503
Government Business 62,617 62,229 54,387 54,889 48,823 48,145
Net premiums $ 94,730$ 94,173$ 85,048$ 85,421 $ 84,205 $ 83,648
The effect of reinsurance on benefit expense for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Direct $ 81,254$ 71,749 $ 72,135
Assumed 589 219 217
Ceded (57) (73) (116)
Net benefit expense $ 81,786$ 71,895 $ 72,236
 The effect of reinsurance on certain assets and liabilities at December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
 2019  2018
Policy liabilities, assumed $ 213 $ 50
Unearned income, assumed 114 6
Premiums payable, ceded 11 17
Premiums receivable, assumed 35 37
-136-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
17. Leases
We lease office space and certain computer and related equipment using noncancelable operating leases. Our leases have
remaining lease terms of 1 year to 15 years.
The information related to our leases is as follows:
 Balance Sheet Location  December 31, 2019
Operating Leases   
Right-of-use assets Other noncurrent assets  $ 575
Lease liabilities, current Other current liabilities  158
Lease liabilities, noncurrent Other noncurrent liabilities  482
  Year Ended December
31, 2019
Lease Expense  
Operating lease expense  $ 198
Short-term lease expense  46
Sublease income  (16)
Total lease expense  $ 228
  
Other  information  
Operating cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities, operating leases  $ 176
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for new lease liabilities, operating leases  $ 112
Weighted average remaining lease term, operating leases  6 years
Weighted average discount rate, operating leases  4.09%
Lease expense for 2018 and 2017 was $207 and $205, respectively.
At December 31, 2019, future lease payments for noncancelable operating leases with initial or remaining terms of one year or
more are as follows:
2020 $ 172
2021 149
2022 136
2023 116
2024 87
Thereafter 135
Total future minimum payments $ 795
Less imputed interest (155)
Total lease liabilities $ 640
As of December 31, 2019, we have additional operating leases for building spaces that have not yet commenced, and some
building spaces are being constructed by the lessors and their agents. These leases have terms of up to 12 years and are expected to
commence on various dates during 2020 and 2021 when the construction is complete and we take possession of the buildings. The
undiscounted lease payments for these leases, which are not included in the tables above, aggregate $394.
-137-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
18. Earnings per Share
The denominator for basic and diluted earnings per share at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 2019  2018 2017
Denominator for basic earnings per share—weighted-average shares 255.5 258.1 261.5
Effect of dilutive securities—employee stock options, non-vested restricted stock awards,
convertible debentures and equity units 4.8 6.1 6.3
Denominator for diluted earnings per share 260.3 264.2 267.8
During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, weighted-average shares related to certain stock options of 0.6,
0.3 and 0.4, respectively, were excluded from the denominator for diluted earnings per share because the stock options were anti-
dilutive. The Equity Unit purchase contracts were settled in May 2018, and approximately 6.0 shares of our common stock were
issued and included in the basic earnings per share calculation.
During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, we issued approximately 0.2, 0.3 and 0.4 restricted stock units,
respectively, of which vesting was contingent upon us meeting certain earnings targets. Contingent restricted stock units are
excluded from the denominator for diluted earnings per share and are included only if and when the contingency is met. The 2019
contingent restricted stock units are being measured over the three year period of 2019 through 2021, the 2018 contingent restricted
stock units are being measured over the three year period of 2018 through 2020 and the 2017 contingent restricted stock units are
being measured over the three year period of 2017 through 2019. Contingent restricted stock units generally vest in March of the
year following each measurement period.
19. Segment Information
Our organizational structure is comprised of three reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business; Government
Business; and Other.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business segment includes our Local Group, National Accounts, Individual and Specialty
businesses. Business units in the Commercial & Specialty Business segment offer fully-insured health products; provide a broad
array of managed care services to self-funded customers including claims processing, underwriting, stop loss insurance, actuarial
services, provider network access, medical cost management, disease management, wellness programs and other administrative
services; and provide an array of specialty and other insurance products and services such as dental, vision, life and disability
insurance benefits.
Our Government Business segment includes our Medicare and Medicaid businesses, National Government Services, or NGS,
and services provided to the federal government in connection with the FEHB program. Our Medicare business includes services
such as Medicare Supplement plans; Medicare Advantage, including Special Needs Plans; Medicare Part D; and dual-eligible
programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans. Our Medicaid business includes our managed care alternatives through publicly
funded healthcare programs, including Medicaid, ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs, Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families programs, programs for seniors and people with disabilities, Children’s Health Insurance Programs, and specialty
programs such as those focused on long-term services and support, HIV/AIDS, foster care, behavioral health and/or substance
abuse disorders, and intellectual disabilities or developmental disabilities. NGS acts as a Medicare contractor for the federal
government in several regions across the nation.
Prior to the second quarter of 2019, our Other segment included certain eliminations and corporate expenses not allocated to
either of our other reportable segments. Beginning with the second quarter of 2019, our Other segment also includes IngenioRx, our
PBM, which began operations during the second quarter of 2019. In addition, during the second quarter, we reclassified our
integrated health services business, our Diversified Business Group, or DBG, from our Government Business segment to the Other
segment to reflect changes in how our segments are being managed. Amounts for prior years have been reclassified to conform to
the current year presentation for comparability. Based on the FASB guidance, as of December 31, 2019, IngenioRx and DBG did
not collectively meet the quantitative thresholds for a reportable segment.
-138-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
We define operating revenues to include premium income and administrative fees and other revenues. Operating revenues are
derived from premiums and fees received, primarily from the sale and administration of health benefit products. Operating gain is
calculated as total operating revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold and selling, general and administrative expense.
Through our participation in various federal government programs, we generated approximately 20.7%, 19.8% and 17.8% of
our total consolidated revenues from agencies of the U.S. government for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017,
respectively. These revenues are contained in the Government Business segment.
The accounting policies of the segments are consistent with those described in the summary of significant accounting policies
in Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” except that certain shared administrative expenses for each
segment are recognized on a pro rata allocated basis, which in the aggregate approximates the consolidated expense. Any difference
between the allocated expenses and actual consolidated expense is included in other expenses not allocated to reportable segments.
Affiliated revenues represent revenues or cost for services provided by IngenioRx and DBG to our subsidiaries, are recorded at cost
or management’s estimate of fair market value, and are eliminated in consolidation. We evaluate performance of the reportable
segments based on operating gain or loss as defined above. We evaluate net investment income, net realized gains on financial
instruments, OTTI losses recognized in income, interest expense, amortization expense, gain or loss on extinguishment of debt,
income taxes and assets and liabilities on a consolidated basis, as these items are managed in a corporate shared service
environment and are not the responsibility of segment operating management.
For our segment reporting, operating gains (losses) generated from IngenioRx and DBG affiliated activity have been included
in our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business based upon their utilization of services from IngenioRx and
DBG.
Financial data by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 Commercial &
Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business Other Eliminations Total
Year ended December 31, 2019       
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 37,421$ 62,632 $ 3,088$ — $103,141
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 4,607 (4,607) —
Operating gain (loss) 4,046 2,054 (101) — 5,999
Depreciation and amortization of property and
equipment — — 675 — 675
Year ended December 31, 2018       
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 35,782$ 55,348 $ 211$ — $91,341
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 1,308 (1,308) —
Operating gain (loss) 3,600 1,928 (102) — 5,426
Depreciation and amortization of property and
equipment — — 652 — 652
Year ended December 31, 2017       
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 40,363$ 48,587 $ 111$ — $89,061
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 16 (16) —
Operating gain (loss) 2,847 1,442 (114) — 4,175
Depreciation and amortization of property and
equipment — — 601 — 601
-139-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
 The major product revenues for each of the reportable segments for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 are as
follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Commercial & Specialty Business   
Managed care products $ 30,311$ 29,012 $ 33,971
Managed care services 5,451 5,218 4,732
Dental/Vision products and services 1,302 1,220 1,218
Other 357 332 442
Total Commercial & Specialty Business 37,421 35,782 40,363
Government Business   
Managed care products 62,229 54,889 48,144
Managed care services 403 459 443
Total Government Business 62,632 55,348 48,587
Other   
Other 7,695 1,519 127
Eliminations   
Eliminations (4,607) (1,308) (16)
Total product revenues $ 103,141$ 91,341 $ 89,061
The classification between managed care products and managed care services in the above table primarily distinguishes
between the levels of risk assumed. Managed care products represent insurance products where we bear the insurance risk, whereas
managed care services represent product offerings where we provide claims adjudication and other administrative services to the
customer, but the customer principally bears the insurance risk. 
Asset, liability and equity details by reportable segment have not been disclosed, as we do not internally report such
information. 
A reconciliation of reportable segments’ operating revenue to the amounts of total revenues included in our consolidated
statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Reportable segments operating revenues $ 103,141$ 91,341 $ 89,061
Net investment income 1,005 970 867
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 114 (180) 145
Other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income (47) (26) (33)
Total revenues $ 104,213$ 92,105 $ 90,040
-140-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of reportable segments’ operating gain to income before income tax expense included in our consolidated
statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Reportable segments operating gain $ 5,999$ 5,426 $ 4,175
Net investment income 1,005 970 867
Net realized gains (losses) on financial instruments 114 (180) 145
Other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income (47) (26) (33)
Interest expense (746) (753) (739)
Amortization of other intangible assets (338) (358) (169)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (2) (11) (282)
Income before income tax expense $ 5,985$ 5,068 $ 3,964
20. Related Party Transactions
We have a 19.50% equity investment in National Accounts Service Company, LLC, or NASCO, which processes National
Accounts claims and provides other administrative services for us and certain other BCBS plans. Administrative expenses incurred
related to NASCO services totaled $78, $79 and $73, for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Amounts due to NASCO were $4 and $5 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
We have an equity investment in APC Passe, LLC, which offers Medicaid products in Arkansas. During the year ended
December 31, 2019, in the normal course of business, we assumed premiums of $408 from APC Passe, LLC, which is included in
our total assumed premiums (see Note 16, “Reinsurance”).
21. Statutory Information
The majority of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries report their accounts in conformity with accounting practices prescribed
or permitted by state insurance regulatory authorities, commonly referred to as statutory accounting, which vary in certain respects
from GAAP. However, certain of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries, including BCC, Blue Cross of California Partnership Plan,
Inc., Golden West Health Plan, Inc. and CareMore Health Plan are regulated by the California Department of Managed Health
Care, or DMHC, and report their accounts in conformity with GAAP (these entities are collectively referred to as the “DMHC
regulated entities”). Typical differences of GAAP reporting as compared to statutory reporting are the recognition of all assets
including those that are non-admitted for statutory purposes and recognition of all deferred tax assets without regard to statutory
limits. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or NAIC, developed a codified version of the statutory accounting
principles, designed to foster more consistency among the states for accounting guidelines and reporting. Prescribed statutory
accounting practices are set forth in a variety of publications of the NAIC as well as state laws, regulations and general
administrative rules.
Our ability to pay dividends and credit obligations is significantly dependent on receipt of dividends from our subsidiaries. The
payment of dividends to us by our insurance and HMO subsidiaries without prior approval of the insurance departments of each
subsidiary’s domiciliary jurisdiction is limited by formula. Dividends in excess of these amounts are subject to prior approval by
the respective state insurance departments or the DMHC.
Our statutory basis insurance and HMO subsidiaries are subject to risk-based capital, or RBC, requirements. RBC is a method
developed by the NAIC to determine the minimum amount of statutory capital appropriate for an insurance company or HMO to
support its overall business operations in consideration of its size and risk profile. The formula for determining the amount of RBC
specifies various factors, weighted based on the perceived degree of risk, which are applied to certain financial balances and
financial activity. Below minimum RBC requirements are classified within certain levels, each of which requires specified
corrective action. Additionally, the DMHC regulated entities are subject to capital and solvency requirements as prescribed by the
DMHC. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, all of our regulated subsidiaries exceeded the minimum applicable mandatory RBC
requirements and/or capital and solvency requirements of their applicable governmental regulator. The statutory RBC necessary to
satisfy regulatory requirements of our statutory basis insurance and HMO subsidiaries was approximately $5,500 and $4,800 as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The tangible net
-141-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
equity required for the DMHC regulated entities was approximately $610 and $570 as of December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
Statutory-basis capital and surplus of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries and capital and surplus of our other regulated
subsidiaries, excluding the DMHC regulated entities, was $13,044 and $12,038 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Statutory-basis net income of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries and net income of our other regulated subsidiaries, excluding
the DMHC regulated entities, was $3,840, $3,412 and $2,674 for 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. GAAP equity of the DMHC
regulated entities was $3,359 and $3,125 at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. GAAP net income of the DMHC regulated
entities was $878, $789 and $1,047 for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
22. Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Selected quarterly financial data is as follows:
 For the Quarter Ended
 March 31 June 30  September 30 December 31
2019     
Total revenues $ 24,666 $ 25,466 $ 26,674$ 27,407
Income before income tax expense 1,945 1,453 1,489 1,098
Net income 1,551 1,139 1,183 934
   
Basic net income per share $ 6.03 $ 4.44 $ 4.64$ 3.69
Diluted net income per share 5.91 4.36 4.55 3.62
     
2018     
Total revenues $ 22,537 $ 22,944 $ 23,251$ 23,373
Income before income tax expense 1,780 1,504 1,242 542
Net income 1,312 1,054 960 424
     
Basic net income per share $ 5.13 $ 4.07 $ 3.70$ 1.64
Diluted net income per share 4.99 3.98 3.62 1.61
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE.
There have been no changes in or disagreements with our independent registered public accounting firm on accounting or
financial disclosures.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES.
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We carried out an evaluation as of December 31, 2019, under the supervision and with the participation of our management,
including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure
controls and procedures as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act. Based upon that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer
and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures are effective in timely alerting them to material
information relating to us (including our consolidated subsidiaries) required to be disclosed in our reports under the Exchange Act.
In addition, based on that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure
controls and procedures were effective in ensuring that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we file or
submit under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and
Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures.
-142-
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 
Management, under the supervision and with the participation of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer,
of Anthem, Inc., or the Company, is responsible for establishing and maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting,
or Internal Control, as such term is defined in the Exchange Act. The Company’s Internal Control is designed to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of the Company’s financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external
reporting purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP. The Company’s Internal Control
includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly
reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with GAAP, and that receipts and expenditures of
the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and
(iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the
Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of inherent limitations in any Internal Control, no matter how well designed, misstatements due to error or fraud may
occur and not be detected. Accordingly, even effective Internal Control can provide only reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP.
Management, under the supervision and with the participation of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer,
assessed the effectiveness of the Company’s Internal Control as of December 31, 2019. Management’s assessment was based on
criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission.
Based on management’s assessment, management has concluded that the Company’s Internal Control was effective as of
December 31, 2019 to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with GAAP.
Ernst & Young LLP, the Company’s independent registered public accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial
statements of the Company for the year ended December 31, 2019, and has also issued an audit report dated February 19, 2020, on
the effectiveness of the Company’s Internal Control as of December 31, 2019, which is included in this Annual Report on Form 10-
K.
/S/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX  /S/    JOHN E. GALLINA
President and Chief Executive Officer  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
During the three months ended December 31, 2019, we implemented certain additional internal controls associated with our
new IngenioRx PBM business. Other than these new controls, there have been no changes in our internal control over financial
reporting that occurred during the three months ended December 31, 2019 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to
materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
-143-
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and the Board of Directors of Anthem, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited Anthem, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in
Internal Control–Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013
framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Anthem, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of Anthem, Inc. as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements
of income, comprehensive income, shareholders’ equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2019, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(c) and our report dated
February 19, 2020 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal
Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities
and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/    ERNST & YOUNG LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 19, 2020
-144-
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION.
None.
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE.
The information required by this Item concerning our Executive Officers, Directors and nominees for Director, Audit
Committee members and financial expert(s) and concerning disclosure of any delinquent filers under Section 16(a) of the Exchange
Act and our Code of Conduct is incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2020 Annual Meeting
of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION.
The information required by this Item concerning remuneration of our Executive Officers and Directors, material transactions
involving such Executive Officers and Directors and Compensation Committee interlocks, as well as the Compensation Committee
Report and CEO Pay Ratio disclosure are incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2020
Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our
last fiscal year.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
Securities authorized for issuance under the our equity compensation plans as of December 31, 2019 are as follows:
Plan
Category1Number of securities to be
issued upon exercise of
outstanding options, warrants
and rights2 
(a)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options, warrants
and rights3
(b)Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under equity
compensation plans (excluding
securities reflected in column
(a))4
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by shareholders as of
December 31, 2019 6,011,131 $190.3125,381,110
1 We have no equity compensation plans pursuant to which awards may be granted in the future that have not been approved by shareholders.
2 Includes shares that may be issued under the Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan and the Anthem 2017 Incentive Compensation Plan
pursuant to the following outstanding awards: 3,143,948  stock options, 575,389  unvested restricted stock units, and 2,291,794  performance
stock units (assuming that the outstanding performance stock units are earned at the maximum award level).
3 Represents the weighted average exercise price of outstanding stock options. Does not take into consideration outstanding restricted stock
units or performance stock units, which, once vested, may be converted into shares of our common stock on a one-for -one basis upon
distribution at no additional cost.
4 Excludes securities reflected in the first column, “Number of securities to be issued upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants and
rights”. Includes 20,528,003  shares of common stock available for issuance as stock options, restricted stock awards, performance stock
awards, performance awards and stock appreciation rights under the Anthem 2017 Incentive Compensation Plan at December 31, 2019.
Includes 4,853,107  shares of common stock available for issuance under the Stock Purchase Plan at December 31, 2019.
 The information required by this Item concerning the stock ownership of management and five percent beneficial owners is
incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2020 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be
filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
-145-
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE.
The information required by this Item concerning certain relationships and related person transactions and director
independence is incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2020 Annual Meeting of
Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES.
The information required by this Item concerning principal accountant fees and services is incorporated herein by reference
from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2020 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
-146-
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES.
(a) 1. Financial Statements:
The following consolidated financial statements of the Company are set forth in Part II, Item 8:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2019 and 2018
Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
2. Financial Statement Schedule:
The following financial statement schedule of the Company is included in Item 15(c):
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant (Parent Company Only).
All other schedules for which provision is made in the applicable accounting regulations of the SEC are not required
under the related instructions, are inapplicable, or the required information is included in the consolidated financial
statements, and therefore, have been omitted.
3. Exhibits required to be filed as part of this report:
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
2.1 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of July 23, 2015 among Anthem, Inc., Anthem Merger Sub. Corp. and
Cigna Corporation, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
July 27, 2015.
3.1 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended and restated effective May 15, 2019,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 15, 2019.
3.2 Bylaws of the Company, as amended effective May 15, 2019, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K/A filed on June 5, 2019.
4.1 Form of Specimen Certificate of the Company’s common stock, $0.01 par value per share, incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Post-Effective Amendment No.1 to Form S-8 Registration Statement filed on May
23, 2017.
4.2 Indenture, dated as of December 9, 2004, between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.,
as trustee, including the Form of the Company’s 5.950% Notes due 2034, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 15, 2004.
4.3 Indenture, dated as of January 10, 2006, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. (formerly known as The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.), as trustee, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2006.
 (a)Form of 5.85% Notes due 2036, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2006.
 (b)Form of 6.375% Notes due 2037, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on June 8, 2007.
-147-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
 (c)Form of 4.350% Notes due 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2010.
 (d)Form of 5.800% Notes due 2040, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2010.
 (e)Form of 3.700% Notes due 2021, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 15, 2011.
 (f)Form of 3.125% Notes due 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2012.
 (g)Form of 4.625% Notes due 2042, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2012.
 (h)Form of 3.300% Notes due 2023, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 10, 2012.
 (i)Form of 4.650% Notes due 2043, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 10, 2012.
 (j)Form of 5.100% Notes due 2044, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on July 31, 2013.
 (k)Form of 3.500% Notes due 2024, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
 (l)Form of 4.650% Notes due 2044, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
 (m)Form of 4.850% Notes due 2054, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
4.4 Indenture dated as of October 9, 2012 between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. as trustee, including the Form of the 2.750% Senior Convertible Debentures due 2042, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 9, 2012.
4.5 Subordinated Indenture, dated as of May 12, 2015, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on May 12, 2015.
4.6 Indenture dated as of November 21, 2017 between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A. as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on November 21, 2017.
 (a)Form of 2.500% Notes due 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
 (b)Form of 2.950% Notes due 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017. 
 (c)Form of 3.350% Notes due 2024, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017. 
 (d)Form of 3.650% Notes due 2027, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
 (e)Form of 4.375% Notes due 2047, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
 (f)Form of 4.101% Notes due 2028, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2018.
 (g)Form of 4.550% Notes due 2048, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2018.
 (h)Form of 2.375% Notes due 2025, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
-148-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
 (i)Form of 2.875% Notes due 2029, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
 (j)Form of 3.700% Notes due 2049, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
4.7  Upon the request of the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company will furnish copies of any other
instruments defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of the Company or its subsidiaries.
4.8 Description of the Company’s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Exchange Act.
10.1* Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 2, 2014.
 (a)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(p) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2014.
 (b)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2015, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2015.
 (c)Form of Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award
Agreement for 2014, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
 (d)Form of Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award
Agreement for 2015, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(p) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
 (e)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2016 and 2017,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(s) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016.  
 (f)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(t) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2016.
10.2*2017 Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective October 1, 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2019.
 (a)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1(r) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September
30, 2017.
 (b)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for the Chief Executive
Officer for 2017, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(b) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2017.
 (c)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(d) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
 (d)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(e) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
 (e)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(f) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
 (f)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(h) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
 (g)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(i) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
-149-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
 (h)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(j) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
 (i)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(l) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
 (j)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
 (k)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
10.3*Anthem, Inc. Comprehensive Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective October
1, 2019, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2019.
10.4*Anthem, Inc. Executive Agreement Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014.
 (a)First Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4(a) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.  
 (b)Second Amendment, dated January 6, 2017, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.3(b) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016.
 (c)Third Amendment, dated August 27, 2018, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4(c) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2018.
10.5*Anthem, Inc. Executive Salary Continuation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2015.
10.6*Anthem, Inc. Directed Executive Compensation Plan amended effective January 1, 2020.
10.7*Anthem, Inc. Board of Directors Compensation Program, as amended effective May 15, 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.7 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019.
10.8*Anthem Board of Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2014.
10.9* (a)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and each of the following: John E. Gallina, Peter D.
Haytaian, Gloria McCarthy and Thomas C. Zielinski, incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 10.41 to
the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2007.
 (b)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and Gail Boudreaux, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit A to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 6, 2017.
 (c)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and each of the following: Felicia F. Norwood,
Prakash Patel and Leah Stark incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9(d) to the Company’s Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
10.10*Offer Letter, by and between the Company and Gail Boudreaux, dated as of November 5, 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 6, 2017.
10.11 Blue Cross License Agreement by and between Blue Cross Blue Shield Association and the Company, including
revisions, if any, adopted by the Member Plans through November 21, 2019.
10.12 Blue Shield License Agreement by and between Blue Cross Blue Shield Association and the Company, including
revisions, if any, adopted by the Member Plans through November 21, 2019.
-150-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
21 Subsidiaries of the Company.
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
31.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Exchange Act Rules,
as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Exchange Act Rules,
as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101 The following materials from Anthem, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019,
formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline Extensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Balance Sheets;
(ii) the Consolidated Statements of Income; (iii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income; (iv) the
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows; (v) the Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity; (vi) the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements and (vii) Financial Statement Schedule II. The instance document does not
appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File formatted in Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.
* Indicates management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements.
(b) Exhibits
The response to this portion of Item 15 is set forth in paragraph (a) 3 above.
(c) Financial Statement Schedule
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant (Parent Company Only).
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY.
None.
-151-
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Balance Sheets
(In millions, except shar e data)December  31,
2019December  31,
2018
Assets  
Current assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,818 $ 1,290
Fixed maturity securities, current (amortized cost of $592 and $589) 602 573
Equity securities, current 253 86
Other invested assets, current 4 10
Other receivables 92 131
Income taxes receivable 170 —
Net due from subsidiaries 602 170
Securities lending collateral 17 35
Other current assets 462 320
Total current assets 4,020 2,615
Long-term investments:  
Equity securities 6 6
Other invested assets, long-term 651 616
Property and equipment, net 170 186
Deferred tax assets, net 216 209
Investments in subsidiaries 47,423 44,877
Other noncurrent assets 263 225
Total assets $ 52,749 $ 48,734
Liabilities and shar eholders’  equity  
Liabilities  
Current liabilities:  
Accounts payable and accrued expenses $ 887 $ 1,429
Security trades pending payable 9 —
Securities lending payable 17 35
Income taxes payable — 112
Current portion of long-term debt 1,598 849
Other current liabilities 237 235
Total current liabilities 2,748 2,660
Long-term debt, less current portion 17,762 17,192
Other noncurrent liabilities 511 341
Total liabilities 21,021 20,193
Commitments and contingencies—Note 5
Shar eholders’  equity  
Preferred stock, without par value, shares authorized - 100,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - none — —
Common stock, par value $0.01, shares authorized - 900,000,000; shares issued and outstanding -
252,922,161 and 257,395,577 3 3
Additional paid-in capital 9,448 9,536
Retained earnings 22,573 19,988
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (296) (986)
Total shar eholders’  equity 31,728 28,541
Total liabilities and shar eholders’  equity $ 52,749 $ 48,734
 
See accompanying notes.
-152-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Income
 Years ended December 31
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017
Revenues  
Net investment income $ 81$ 39$ 64
Net realized losses on financial instruments (65) (46) (18)
Other-than-temporary impairment losses on investments:  
Total other-than-temporary impairment losses on investments (23) (15) (7)
Portion of other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in other
comprehensive income (loss) 3 — —
Other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income (20) (15) (7)
Administrative fees and other revenue 22 2 —
Total revenues (losses) 18 (20) 39
Expenses  
General and administrative expense 88 86 437
Interest expense 723 723 727
Loss on extinguishment of debt 2 11 283
Total expenses 813 820 1,447
Loss before income tax credits and equity in net income of subsidiaries (795) (840) (1,408)
Income tax credits (251) (238) (216)
Equity in net income of subsidiaries 5,351 4,352 5,035
Net income $ 4,807$ 3,750$ 3,843
 See accompanying notes.
-153-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Comprehensive Income
 Years ended December 31
(in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Net income $ 4,807$ 3,750$ 3,843
Other comprehensive income, net of tax:  
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on investments 680 (418) 173
Change in non-credit component of other-than-temporary impairment losses on
investments — (2) 4
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on cash flow hedges (16) 37 (65)
Change in net periodic pension and postretirement costs 26 (90) 51
Foreign currency translation adjustments — (1) 3
Other comprehensive income (loss) 690 (474) 166
Total comprehensive income $ 5,497$ 3,276$ 4,009
 
See accompanying notes.
-154-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Cash Flows
 Years ended December  31
(In millions) 2019 2018  2017
Operating activities     
Net income $ 4,807 $ 3,750  $ 3,843
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Undistributed earnings of subsidiaries (1,561 ) (744) (2,437 )
Net realized losses on financial instruments 65 46 18
Other -than-temporary impairment losses recognized in income 20 15 7
Loss on extinguishment of debt 2 11 283
Deferred income taxes 2 (43) (33)
Amortization, net of accretion 37 43 25
Depreciation expense 69 70 69
Share-based compensation 294 226  170
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:    
Receivables, net 41 (73) (17)
Other invested assets, current 6 (5) (1)
Other assets (235) (225) (102)
Amounts due (from)/ to subsidiaries (432) 2,259  (1,034 )
Accounts payable and accrued expenses (608) 303  491
Other liabilities 186 154  (61)
Income taxes (282) 187  (6)
Other , net — 1 (2)
Net cash pr ovided by operating activities 2,411 5,975  1,213
Investing activities     
Purchases of investments (9,682 ) (800) (3,814 )
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls and redemptions of investments 9,457 1,865  2,595
Changes in collateral and settlement of non-hedging derivatives — — 65
Capitalization of subsidiaries (232) (4,379 ) (124)
Changes in securities lending collateral 18 (21) 25
Purchases of property and equipment, net of sales (54) (137) (44)
Other , net — 4 18
Net cash used in investing activities (493) (3,468 ) (1,279 )
Financing activities     
Net (repayments of) proceeds from commercial paper borrowings (297) (107) 175
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 2,473 835  5,458
Repayments of long-term borrowings (1,123 ) (1,684 ) (2,815 )
Changes in securities lending payable (18) 21 (25)
Changes in bank overdrafts 64 (107) 51
Premiums paid on equity call options (1) — —
Proceeds from sale of put options — 1 1
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under Equity Units stock purchase contracts — 1,250  —
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,701 ) (1,685 ) (1,998 )
Change in collateral and settlements of debt-related derivatives (34) 23 (149)
Cash dividends (856) (812) (737)
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under employee stock plans 187 173  225
Taxes paid through withholding of common stock under employee stock plans (84) (81) (47)
Net cash (used in) pr ovided by financing activities (1,390 ) (2,173 ) 139
Change in cash and cash equivalents 528 334  73
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 1,290 956  883
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 1,818 $ 1,290  $ 956
 
See accompanying notes.
-155-
Anthem, Inc.
(Parent Company Only)
Notes to Condensed Financial Statements
December 31, 2019
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data)
1. Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies
In the parent company only financial statements of Anthem, Inc., or Anthem, Anthem’s investment in subsidiaries is stated at
cost plus equity in undistributed earnings of the subsidiaries. Anthem’s share of net income of its unconsolidated subsidiaries is
included in income using the equity method of accounting.
Certain amounts presented in the parent company only financial statements are eliminated in the consolidated financial
statements of Anthem.
Anthem’s parent company only financial statements should be read in conjunction with Anthem’s audited consolidated
financial statements and the accompanying notes included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
2. Subsidiary Transactions
Dividends from Subsidiaries
Anthem received cash dividends from subsidiaries of $3,790, $3,606 and $2,268 during 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Dividends to Subsidiaries
Certain subsidiaries of Anthem own shares of Anthem common stock. Anthem paid cash dividends to subsidiaries related to
these shares of common stock in the amount of $38, $36 and $32 during 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Investments in Subsidiaries
Capital contributions to subsidiaries were $232, $4,379 and $124 during 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Amounts Due to and From Subsidiaries
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, Anthem reported amounts due from subsidiaries of $602 and $170, respectively. The
amounts due from subsidiaries primarily include amounts for allocated administrative expenses or daily cash management
activities. These items are routinely settled, and as such, are classified as current assets or liabilities.
Guarantees on Behalf of Subsidiaries
Anthem guarantees contractual or financial obligations or solvency requirements for certain of its subsidiaries. These
guarantees approximated $569 at December 31, 2019. There were no payments made on these guarantees in 2019.
3. Derivative Financial Instruments
The information regarding derivative financial instruments contained in Note 5, “Derivative Financial Instruments,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
4. Long-Term Debt
The information regarding long-term debt contained in Note 12, “Debt,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of
Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
-156-
5. Commitments and Contingencies
The information regarding commitments and contingencies contained in Note 13, “Commitments and Contingencies,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
6. Capital Stock
The information regarding capital stock contained in Note 14, “Capital Stock,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is incorporated herein
by reference.
7. Leases
Beginning in 2019, certain of our leases, including the lease for our principal executive offices located at 220 Virginia Avenue,
Indianapolis, Indiana, are obligations of Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company). At December 31, 2019, these leases had an aggregate
right-of-use asset of $99, a lease liability balance of $83, operating lease expense of $7 and future lease payments as follows: 2020,
$11; 2021, $11; 2022, $11; 2023, $12; 2024, $11; and thereafter $70. All other information regarding leases is contained in Note 17,
“Leases,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-157-
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
ANTHEM, INC.
  
By: /s/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX       
 Gail K. Boudreaux
President and Chief Executive Officer
Dated: February 19, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. 
Signature   Title Date
/s/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX   President and Chief Executive Officer, Director
(Principal Executive Officer)February 19, 2020
Gail K. Boudreaux  
/s/    JOHN E. GALLINA          Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 19, 2020
John E. Gallina  
/s/    RONALD W. PENCZEK          Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)February 19, 2020
Ronald W. Penczek  
/s/    ELIZABETH E. TALLETT Chair of the Board February 19, 2020
Elizabeth E. Tallett  
/s/ R. KERRY CLARK         Director February 19, 2020
R. Kerry Clark  
/s/ ROBERT L. DIXON, JR.          Director February 19, 2020
Robert L. Dixon, Jr.  
/s/    LEWIS HAY III       Director February 19, 2020
Lewis Hay III  
/s/    JULIE A. HILL          Director February 19, 2020
Julie A. Hill  
/s/    BAHIJA JALLAL   Director February 19, 2020
Bahija Jallal  
/s/    ANTONIO F. NERI Director February 19, 2020
Antonio F. Neri  
/s/    RAMIRO G. PERU          Director February 19, 2020
Ramiro G. Peru  
/s/ RYAN M. SCHNEIDER Director February 19, 2020
Ryan M. Schneider  
  
  
-158-
